CHAPTER I.
In
consenting to lay before the world the experience of a
common seaman, and, I may add, of one who has been such
a sinner as the calling is only too apt to produce, I trust
that no feeling of vanity has had an undue influence. I
love the seas; and it is a pleasure to me to converse about
them, and of the scenes I have witnessed, and of the
hardships
I have undergone on their bosom, in various parts of
the world. Meeting with an old shipmate who is disposed
to put into proper form the facts which I can give him, and
believing that my narrative may be useful to some of those
who follow the same pursuit as that in which I have been so
long engaged, I see no evil in the course I am now taking,
while I humbly trust it may be the means of effecting some
little good. God grant that the pictures I shall feel bound
to draw of my own past degradation and failings, contrasted
as they must be with my present contentment and hopes, may
induce some one, at least, of my readers to abandon the
excesses
so common among seamen, and to turn their eyes in
the direction of those great truths which are so powerful to
reform, and so convincing when regarded with humility, and
with a just understanding of our own weaknesses.
I know nothing of my family, except through my own
youthful recollections, and the accounts I have received from
my sister. My father I slightly remember; but of my
mother
I retain no distinct impressions. The latter must have
died while I was very young. The former, I was in the
habit of often seeing, until I reached my fifth or sixth year.
He was a soldier, and belonged to the twenty-third regiment
of foot, in the service of the King of Great Britain.
[1]
[1]
The writer left a blank for this regiment, and now inserts it from
memory. It is probable he is wrong.
The
fourth son of this monarch, Prince Edward as he was then
called, or the Duke of Kent as he was afterwards styled,
commanded the corps, and accompanied it to the British
American colonies, where it was stationed for many years.
I was born in Quebec, between the years 1792 and 1794;
probably in 1793. Of the rank of my father in the
regiment
,
I am unable to speak, though I feel pretty confident
he was a commissioned officer. He was much with the
prince; and I remember that, on parade, where I have often
seen him, he was in the habit of passing frequently from the
prince to the ranksa circumstance that induces my old
shipmate to think he may have been the adjutant. My
father, I have always understood, was a native of Hanover,
and the son of a clergyman in that country. My mother,
also, was said to be a German, though very little is now
known of her by any of the family. She is described to me
as living much alone, as being occupied in pursuits very
different
from those of my father, and as being greatly averse
to the life of a soldier.
I was baptized in the Church of England, and, from
earliest boyhood, have always been given to understand that
His Royal Highness, Prince Edward, the father of Queen
Victoria, stood for me at the font; Major Walker, of the
same regiment, being the other god-father, and Mrs. Walker,
his wife, my god-mother. My real names are Edward Robert
Meyers; those received in baptism having been given me
by my two sponsors, after themselves. This christening,
like my birth, occurred in Quebec. I have, however,
called myself Edward, or Ned, Myers, ever since I took to
the sea.
Before I was old enough to receive impressions to be
retained
,
the regiment removed to Halifax. My father
accompanied
it; and, of course, his two children, my sister Harriet
and myself, were taken to Nova Scotia. Of the period of
my life that was passed in Halifax, I retain tolerably distinct
recollections; more especially of the later years. The prince
and my father both remained with the regiment for a
considerable
time; though all quitted Halifax several years
before I left it myself. I remember Prince Edward perfectly
well. He sometimes resided at a house called the Lodge, a
little out of town; and I was often taken out to see him. He
also had a residence in town. He took a good deal of notice
of me; raising me in his arms, and kissing me. When he
passed our house, I would run to him; and he would lead
me through the streets himself. On more than one occasion,
he led me off, and sent for the regimental tailor;
directing
suits of clothes to be made for me, after his own taste.
He was a large man; of commanding presence, and
frequently
wore a star on the breast of his coat. He was not
then called the Duke of Kent, but Prince Edward, or
The
Prince. A lady lived with him at the Lodge; but who she
was, I do not know.
At this time, my mother must have been dead; for of
her
I retain no recollection whatever. I think, my father left
Halifax some time before the prince. Major Walker, too,
went to England; leaving Mrs. Walker in Nova Scotia, for
some time. Whether my father went away with a part of
the regiment to which he belonged, or not, I cannot say;
but I well remember a conversation between the prince, the
major and Mrs. Walker, in which they spoke of the loss of
a transport, and of Meyers's saving several men. This must
have been at the time when my father quitted Nova Scotia;
to which province, I think, he never could have returned.
Neither my sister, nor myself, ever saw him afterwards.
We have understood that he was killed in battle; though
when, or where, we do not know. My old shipmate, the
editor, however, thinks it must have been in Canada; as
letters were received from a friend in Quebec, after I had
quitted Nova Scotia, inquiring after us children, and stating
that the effects of my father were in that town, and ought to
belong to us. This letter gave my sister the first account
of his death; though it was not addressed to her, but to
those in whose care she had been left. This property was
never recovered; and my shipmate, who writes this account,
thinks there may have been legal difficulties in the way.
Previously to quitting the province of Nova Scotia, my
father placed Harriet and myself in the house of a Mr.
Marchinton, to live. This gentleman was a clergyman,
who had no regular parish, but who preached in a chapel
of his own. He sent us both to school, and otherwise took
charge of us. I am not aware of the precise time when the
prince left Halifax, but it must have been when I was five
or six years oldprobably about the year 1798 or 1799.
[2]
[2]
Edward, Duke of Kent, was born November 2, 1767, and made
a peer April 23, 1799; when he was a little turned of one-and-thirty.
It is probable that this creation took place on his return to England;
after passing some six or eight years in America and the West Indies.
He served in the West Indies with great personal distinction, during
his stay in this hemisphere.
Editor
.
From that time I continued at Mr. Marchinton's, attending
school, and busied, as is usual with boys of that age, until
the year 1805. I fear I was naturally disposed to idleness
and self-indulgence, for I became restive and impatient under
the restraints of the schoolmaster, and of the gentleman in
whose family I had been left. I do not know that I had any
just grounds of complaint against Mr. Marchinton; but his
rigorous discipline disgusted me; principally, I am now
inclined
to believe, because it was not agreeable to me to be kept
under any rigid moral restraint. I do not think I was very
vicious; and, I know, I was far from being of a captions
temperament; but I loved to be my own master; and I
particularly
disliked everything like religious government. Mr.
Marchinton, moreover, kept me out of the streets; and it was
my disposition to be an idler, and at play. It is possible he
may have been a little too severe for one of my
temperament
;
though, I fear, nature gave me a roving and
changeful
mind.
At that time the English cruisers sent in many American
vessels as prizes. Our house was near the water; and I
was greatly in the habit of strolling along the wharves,
whenever an opportunity occurred; Mr. Marchinton owning
a good deal of property in that part of the town. The
Cambrian
frigate had a midshipman, a little older than myself,
who had been a schoolmate of mine. This lad, whose name
was Bowen, was sent in as the nominal prize-master of a
brig loaded with coffee; and I no sooner learned the fact,
than I began to pay him visits. Young Bowen encouraged
me greatly, in a wish that now arose within me, to become
a sailor. I listened eagerly to the history of his adventures,
and felt the usual boyish emulation. Mr. Marchinton seemed
averse to my following the profession, and these visits
became
frequent and stealthy; my wishes, most probably,
2
increasing, in proportion as they seemed difficult of
accomplishment
.
I soon began to climb the rigging of the brig, ascending
to the mast-heads. One day Mr. Marchinton saw me quite
at the main-truck; and, calling me down, I got a severe
flogging for my dexterity and enterprise. It sometimes
happens that punishment produces a result exactly opposite
to that which was intended; and so it turned out in the
present
instance. My desire to be a sailor increased in
consequence
of this very flogging; and I now began serously to
think of running away, in order to get to sea, as well as to
escape a confinement on shore, that, to me, seemed
unreasonable
.
Another prize, called the Amsterdam Packet, a
Philadelphia
ship, had been sent in by, I believe, the Cleopatra,
Sir Robert Laurie. On board this ship were two American
lads, apprentices. With these boys I soon formed an
intimacy
;
and their stories of the sea, and their accounts of the
States, coupled with the restraints I fancied I endured, gave
rise to a strong desire to see their country, as well as to
become a sailor. They had little to do, and enjoyed great
liberty, going and coming much as they pleased. This
idleness seemed, to me, to form the summit of human
happiness
.
I did not often dare to play truant; and the school
became odious to me. According to my recollections, this
desire for a change must have existed near, or quite a
twelvemonth; being constantly fed by the arrival and
departure
of vessels directly before my eyes, ere I set about
the concocting of a serious plan to escape.
My project was put in execution in the summer of 1805,
when I could not have been more than eleven years old, if,
indeed, quite as old. I was in the market one day, and
overheard some American seamen, who had been brought
in, conversing of a schooner that was on the point of leaving
Halifax, for New York. This vessel belonged to North
Carolina, and had been captured by the Driver, some time
before, but had been liberated by a decision of the
Admiralty
Court. The men I overheard talking about her,
intended
taking their passages back to their own country in
the craft. This seemed to me a good opportunity to effect
my purpose, and I went from the market, itself, down to the
schooner. The mate was on board alone, and I took
courage
,
and asked him if he did not want to ship a boy. My
dress and appearance were both against me, as I had never
done any work, and was in the ordinary attire of a better
class lad on shore. The mate began to laugh at me, and to
joke me on my desire to go to sea, questioning me about
my knowledge. I was willing to do anything; but,
perceiving
that I made little impression, I resorted to bribery.
Prince Edward had made me a present, before he left
Halifax
,
of a beautiful little fowling-piece, which was in my own
possession; and I mentioned to the mate that I was the owner
of such an article, and would give it to him if he would
consent
to secrete me in the schooner, and carry me to New
York. This bait took, and I was told to bring the
fowling-piece
on board, and let the mate see it. That night I
carried
the bribe, as agreed on, to this man, who was perfectly
satisfied with its appearance, and we struck a bargain on
the spot. I then returned to the house, and collected a few
of my clothes. I knew that my sister, Harriet, was making
some shirts for me, and I stole into her room, and brought
away two of them, which were all I could find. My
wardrobe
was not large when I left the house, and I had taken
the precaution of carrying the articles out one at a time, and
of secreting them in an empty cask in the yard. When I
thought I had got clothes enough, I made them into a bundle,
and carried them down to the schooner. The mate then
cleared out a locker in the cabin, in which there were some
potatoes, and told me I must make up my mind to pass a
few hours in that narrow berth. Too thoughtless to raise
any objections, I cheerfully consented, and took my leave
of him with the understanding that I was to be on board,
again, early in the morning.
Before going to bed, I desired a black servant of Mr.
Marchinton's to call me about day-break, as I desired to go
out and pick berries. This was done, and I was up and
dressed before any other member of the family was stirring.
I lost no time, but quitted the house, and walked deliberately
down to the schooner. No one was up on board of her, and
I was obliged to give the mate a call, myself. This man
now seemed disposed to draw back from his bargain, and I
had to use a good deal of persuasion before I could prevail
on him to be as good as his word. He did not like to part
with the fowling-piece, but seemed to think it would be fairly
purchased, could he persuade me to run away. At length
he yielded, and I got into the locker, where I was covered
with potatoes.
I was a good while in this uncomfortable situation, before
there were any signs of the vessel's quitting the wharf. I
began to grow heartily tired of the confinement, and the
love of change revived within me in a new form. The
potatoes
were heavy for me to bear, and the confined air
rendered
my prison almost insupportable. I was on the point of
coming out of prison, when the noise on deck gave me the
comfortable assurance that the people had come on board,
and that the schooner was about to sail. I could hear men
conversing, and, after a period of time that seemed an age,
I felt satisfied the schooner was fairly under way. I heard
a hail from one of the forts as we passed down the harbour,
and, not long after, the Driver, the very sloop of war that
had sent the vessel in, met her, and quite naturally hailed
her old prize, also. All this I heard in my prison, and it
served to reconcile me to the confinement. As everything
was right, the ship did not detain us, and we were permitted
to proceed.
It was noon before I was released. Going on deck, I
found that the schooner was at sea. Nothing of Halifax was
visible but a tower or two, that were very familiar objects
to me. I confess I now began to regret the step I had taken,
and, could I have been landed, it is probable my roving
disposition
would have received a salutary check. It was too
late, however, and I was compelled to continue in the thorny
and difficult path on which I had so thoughtlessly entered.
I often look back to this moment, and try to imagine what
might have been my fortunes, had I never taken this unlucky
step. What the prince might have done for me, it is
impossible
to say; though I think it probable that, after the death
of my father, I should have been forgotten, as seems to have
been the case with my sister, who gradually fell from being
considered and treated as one of the family in which she
lived, into a sort of upper servant.
I have learned, latterly, that Mr. Marchinton had a great
search made for me. It was his impression I was drowned,
and several places were dragged for my body. This opinion
lasted until news of my being in New York reached the
family.
My appearance on deck gave rise to a great many jokes
between the captain of the schooner, and his mate. I was
a good deal laughed at, but not badly treated, on the whole.
My office was to be that of cookby no means a very
difficult
task in that craft, the camboose consisting of two pots
set in bricks, and the dishes being very simple. In the
cabin, sassafras was used for tea, and boiled pork and beef
composed the dinner. The first day, I was excused from
entering on the duties of my office, on account of
sea-sickness
;
but, the next morning, I set about the work in good
earnest. We had a long passage, and my situation was not
very pleasant. The schooner was wet, and the seas she
shipped would put out my fire. There was a deck load of
shingles, and I soon discovered that these made excellent
kindling wood; but it was against the rules of the craft to
burn cargo, and my friend the mate had bestowed a few
kicks on me before I learned to make the distinction. In
other respects, I did tolerably well; and, at the end of about
ten days, we entered Sandy Hook.
Such was my first passage at sea, or, at least, the first I
can remember, though I understand we were taken from
Quebec to Halifax by water. I was not cured of the wish
to roam by this experiment, though, at that age, impressions
are easily received, and as readily lost. Some idea may be
formed of my recklessness, and ignorance of such matters,
at this time, from the circumstance that I do not remember
ever to have known the name of the vessel in which I left
Nova Scotia. Change and adventure were my motives, and
it never occurred to me to inquire into a fact that was so
immaterial to one of my temperament. To this hour, I am
ignorant on the subject.
The schooner came up, and hauled in abreast of Fly
Market. She did not come close to the wharf, but made
fast, temporarily, at its end, outside of two or three other
vessels. This took place not long after breakfast. I set
about the preparations for dinner, which was ready, as usual,
at twelve o'clock. While the crew were eating this meal,
I had nothing to do, and, seeing a number of boys on the
wharf, I went ashore, landing for the first time in this, my
2 *
adopted country. I was without hat, coat, or shoes; my
feet having become sore from marching about among the
shingles. The boys were licking molasses from some
hogsheads
,
and I joined in the occupation with great industry. I
might have been occupied in this manner, and in talking
with the boys, an hour or more, when I bethought me of my
duty on board. On looking for the schooner, she was gone!
Her people, no doubt, thought I was below, and did not
miss me, and she had been carried to some other berth;
where, I did not know. I could not find her, nor did I ever
see her again.
Such, then, was my entrance on a new scene. Had I
known enough to follow the wharves, doubtless I should
have found the vessel; but, after a short search, I returned
to the boys and the molasses.
That I was concerned at finding myself in a strange
place, without a farthing in my pocketswithout hat, shoes
or coat, is certain  but it is wonderful how little
apprehension
I felt. I knew nothing, and feared nothing. While
licking the molasses, I told the boys my situation; and I met
with a great deal of sympathy among them. The word
passed from one to the other, that a poor English boy had
lost his vessel, and did not know where to go to pass the
night. One promised me a supper; and, as for lodgings,
the general opinion seemed to be, that I might find a berth
under one of the butchers' stalls, in the adjacent market. I
had different projects for myself, however.
There was a family of the name of Clark, then residing
in New York, that I had known in Halifax. I remembered
to have heard my sister, Harriet, speaking of them, not long
before I quitted home, and that she said they lived in, or
near, Fly Market. I knew we were at Fly Market; and
the name recalled these people. I inquired, accordingly, if
any one knew such a family; but met with no success in
discovering them. They were strangers; and no one knew
them. It was now near sunset; and I determined to look
for these people myself. On this errand, then, I set off;
walking up the market until I reached Maiden Lane. While
strolling along the street, I heard a female voice suddenly
exclaim: Lord! here is Edward Myers, without anything
on him! At the next instant, Susan Clark, one of the
daughters, came running into the street; and presently I was
in the house, surrounded by the whole family.
Of course, I was closely questioned; and I told the whole
truth. The Clarks were extremely kind to me, offering me
clothes, and desiring to keep me with them; but I did not
like the family, owing to old quarrels with the boys, and a
certain sternness in the father, who had made complaints of
my stealing his fruit, while in Halifax. I was innocent; and
the whole proceeding had made me regard Mr. Clark as a
sort of enemy. My principal motive, in inquiring for the
family, was to learn where a certain Dr. Heizer
[3]
[3]
This is Ned's pronunciation; though it is probable the name is
not spelt correctly. The names of Ned are taken a good deal at
random
;
and, doubtless, are often misspelled.
Editor
.
This gentleman was a German, who had formerly been in
the army; and I knew he was then in New York. In him
I had more confidence; and I determined to throw myself on
his kindness.
After declining a great many offers, I got the address of
Dr. Heizer, and proceeded in quest of his residence, just as
I was. It was moonlight, and I went through the streets
with boyish confidence. My route lay up Broadway, and
my destination was one of its corners and Hester Street.
In 1805, this was nearly out of town, being near Canal
street. I had been told to look for a bridge, which then
stood in Broadway, and which answered for a landmark, in
my new navigation. The bridge I found easily; and,
making inquiries at a house, I was told the family I sought
lived next door.
The Heizers were greatly surprised at my appearance.
I was questioned, of course; and told them the naked truth.
I knew concealment would be useless; was naturally frank,
notwithstanding what I had just done; and I began to feel
the want of friends. I was fed; and that same evening, Dr.
and Mrs. Heizer led me down Broadway, and equipped me
in a neat suit of clothes. Within a week, I was sent regularly to school.
I never knew what Dr. Heizer did, in relation to my
arrival. I cannot but think that he communicated the
circumstances
to Mr. Marchinton, who was well known to
him; though, Harriet tells me, the first intelligence they got
of me was of a much later date, and came from another
source. Let this be as it might, I was kindly treated; living,
in all respects, as if I were one of the family. There was no
son; and they all seemed to consider me as one.
I remained in this family the autumn of 1805, and the
winter and spring of 1806. I soon tired of school, and
began to play truant; generally wandering along the
wharves, gazing at the ships. Dr. Heizer soon learned this;
and, watching me, discovered the propensity I still retained
for the sea. He and Mrs. Heizer now took me aside, and
endeavoured to persuade me to return to Halifax; but I had
become more and more averse to taking this backward step.
To own the truth, I had fearful misgivings on the subject of
floggings; and I dreaded a long course of severity and
discipline
.
It is certain, that, while rigid rules of conduct are
very necessary to some dispositions, there are others with
which they do not succeed. Mine was of the latter class;
for, I think, I am more easily led, than driven. At all
events, I had a horror of going back; and refused to listen
to the proposal. After a good deal of conversation, and
many efforts at persuasion, Dr. Heizer consented to let me
go to sea, from New York; or affected to consent; I never
knew which.
The Leander, Miranda's flag-ship, in his abortive attempt
to create a revolution in Spanish-America, was then lying
in the Hudson; and Dr. Heizer, who was acquainted with
some one connected with her, placed me in this ship, with
the understanding I was to go in her to Holland. I passed
the day on board; going up to my new employer's house,
for my meals, and to sleep. This course of life may have
lasted a fortnight; when I became heartily tired of it. I
found I had a mistress, now, as well as a master. The
former set me to cleaning knives, boots, candlesticks, and
other similar employments; converting me into a sort of
scullion. My pride revolted at this. I have since thought
it possible, all this was done to create disgust, and to induce
me to return to Mr. Marchinton; but it had a very contrary
effect.
My desire was to be a sailor. One Sunday I had been
on board the ship, and, after assisting the mato to show the
bunting fore and aft, I went back to the house. Here my
mistress met me with a double allowance of knives to clean.
We had a quarrel on the subject; I protesting against all
such work. But to clean the knives I was compelled. About
half were thrown over the fence, into the adjoining yard;
and, cleaning what remained, I took my hat, went to the
doctor's, and saw no more of my mistress, or of the
Leander
.
CHAPTER II.
An
explanation took place. Dr. and Mrs. Heizer
remonstrated
about my conduct, and endeavoured, once more, to
persuade me to return to Mr. Marchinton's. A great deal
was told me of the kind intentions of that gentleman, and
concerning what I might expect from the protection and
patronage
of my god-father, the Duke of Kent. I cannot help
thinking, now, that much of the favour which was extended
towards me at that early period of life, was owing to the
circumstance that the prince had consented to stand for me
at my baptism. He was a great disciplinarianso great,
indeed, I remember to have heard, as to cause more than
one mutinyand my father being a German, and coming
from a people that carried military subordination to extremes,
it is highly probable I was indebted, for this compliment, to
a similarity of tastes between the two. I cared little for all
this, however, in 1805, and thought far less of being
protected
by a prince of the blood royal, than of going to sea,
and especially of escaping from the moral discipline of Mr.
Marchinton. Finding his arguments vain, Dr. Heizer sent
me to school again, where I continued a few months longer.
All this time, my taste for ships rather increased than
diminished. At every opportunity I was on the wharves,
studying the different craft, and endeavouring to understand
their rig. One day I saw a British ensign, and, while
looking
at it, with a feeling of strong disgust, I heard myself
called by name. A glance told me that I was seen by a
Halifax man, and I ran away, under the apprehension that
he might, by some means, seize me and carry me back. My
feelings on this head were all alive, and that very day one of
the young ladies said, in a melancholy way,
Edouard
,
Halifax. These girls spoke scarcely any English, having
been born in Martinique; and they talked much together in
French, looking at me occasionally, as if I were the subject
of their discourse. It is probable conscience was at the
bottom
of this conceit of mine; but the latter now became so
strong, as to induce me to determine to look out for a vessel
for myself, and be off again. With this view, I quitted a
negro who had been sent with me to market, under the
pretence
of going to school, but went along the wharves until I
found a ship that took my fancy. She was called the
Sterling
,
and there was a singularly good-looking mate on her
deck, of the name of Irish, who was a native of Nantucket.
The ship was commanded by Capt. John Johnston, of
Wiscasset
,
in Maine, and belonged to his father and himself.
I went on board the Sterling, and, after looking about for
some time, I ventured to offer myself to Mr. Irish, as a boy
who wished to ship. I was questioned, of course, but evaded
any very close answers. After some conversation, Capt.
Johnston came on board, and Mr. Irish told him what I
wanted. My examination now became much closer, and I
found myself driven to sheer fabrication in order to effect my
purposes. During my intercourse with different sea-going
lads of Halifax, I had learned the particulars of the capture
of the Cleopatra 32, by the French frigate Ville de Milan 38,
and her recapture by the Leander 50, which ship captured
the Ville de Milan at the same time. I said my father had
been a serjeant of marines, and was killed in the action
that I had run away when the ships got in, and that I wished
to be bound to some American ship-master, in order to
become
a regularly-trained seaman. This story so far imposed
on Capt. Johnston as to induce him to listen to my proposals,
and in part to accept them. We parted with an
understanding
that I was to get my clothes, and come on board the
vessel.
It was twelve at noon when I got back to Dr. Heizer's.
My first business was to get my clothes into the yard, a few
at a time; after which I ate my dinner with the family. As
soon as we rose from table, I stole away with my bundle,
leaving these kind people to believe I had returned to school.
I never saw one of them afterwards! On my return to New
York, several years later, I learned they had all gone to
Martinique to live. I should not have quitted this excellent
family in so clandestine a manner, had I not been haunted
with the notion that I was about to be sent back to Halifax,
a place I now actually hated.
Capt. Johnston received me good-naturedly, and that
night I slept and supped at the Old Coffee House, Old Slip
his own lodgings. He seemed pleased with me, and I was
delighted with him. The next day he took me to a
slop-shop
,
and I was rigged like a sailor, and was put in the
cabin, where I was to begin my service in the regular way.
A boy named Daniel McCoy was in the ship, and had been
out to Russia in her, as cabin-boy, the last voyage. He was
now to be sent into the forecastle, and was ordered to instruct
me in my duty.
I was now comparatively happy, though anxious to be
bound to Capt. Johnston, and still more so to be fairly at sea.
The Sterling had a good, old-fashioned cabin, as cabins went
in 1806; and I ran about her state-room, rummaged her
lockers, and scampered up and down her companion-way,
with as much satisfaction as if they had all belonged to a
palace. Dan McCoy was every day on board, and we had
the accommodations of the ship very much to ourselves.
Two or three days later, Capt. Johnston took me to the
proper place, and I was put under regular indentures, to
serve until I was twenty-one. I now felt more confidence
in my situation, knowing that Dr. Heizer had no legal
authority over me. The work I did, in no manner offended
my dignity, for it was on ship-board, and belonged properly
to my duty as a cabin-boy.
The Sterling soon began to take in her cargo. She was
to receive a freight of flour, for Cowes and a market. Not
only was the hold filled, but the state-room and cabin,
leaving
barely room to climb over the barrels to reach the berths.
A place was left, just inside of the cabin door, for the table.
Passengers were not common in that day, while commerce
was pushed to the utmost. Our sails were bending when
the consignee, followed by another merchant, came down
to the ship, accompanied by a youth, who, it was
understood
,
wished also to be received in the vessel. This
youth was named Cooper, and was never called by any other
appellation in the ship. He was accepted by Capt. Johnston,
signed the articles, and the next day he joined us, in sailor's
rig. He never came to the cabin, but was immediately
employed
forward, in such service as he was able to perform.
It was afterwards understood that he was destined for the
navy.
The very day that Cooper joined us, was one of deep
disgrace
to me. The small stores came on board for the cabin,
and Dan McCoy persuaded me to try the flavour of a bottle
of cherry-bounce. I did not drink much, but the little I
swallowed made me completely drunk. This was the first
time I ever was in that miserable and disgraceful plight;
would to God I could also say it was the last! The last it
was, however, for several years; that is some comfort. I
thank my Divine Master that I have lived to see the hour
when intoxicating liquors have ceased to have any command
over me, and when, indeed, they never pass my lips. Capt.
Johnston did not flog me for this act of folly, merely pulling
my ears a little, and sharply reprimanding me; both he and
Mr. Irish seeming to understand that my condition had
proceeded
from the weakness of my head. Dan was the
principal
sufferer, as, to say the truth, he ought to have been.
He was rope's-ended for his pains.
Next day the stevedores took the ship into the stream, and
the crew came on board. The assembling of the crew of a
merchantman, in that day, was a melancholy sight. The
men came off, bearing about them the signs of the excesses
of which they had been guilty while on shore; some listless
and stupid, others still labouring under the effects of liquor,
and some in that fearful condition which seamen themselves
term having the horrors. Our crew was neither better
nor worse than that of other ships. It was also a sample
of the mixed character of the crews of American vessels
during the height of her neutral trade. The captain,
chief-mate
,
cook, and four of those forward, were American born;
while the second-mate was a Portuguese. The boys were,
one Scotch, and one a Canadian; and there were a Spaniard,
a Prussian, a Dane, and an Englishman, in the forecastle.
There was also an Englishman who worked his passage,
having been the cooper of a whaler that was wrecked. As
Dan McCoy was sent forward, too, this put ten in the
forecastle
,
besides the cook, and left five aft, including the master
of another wrecked English vessel, whom we took out as a
passenger.
That afternoon we lifted our anchor, and dropped down
abreast of Governor's Island, where we brought up. Next
day all hands were called to get under way, and, as soon as
the anchor was short, the mate told Cooper and myself to
go up and loose the foretopsail. I went on one yard-arm,
and Cooper went on the other. In a few minutes the second
mate came up, hallooing to us to avast, and laughing.
Cooper was hard at work at the robins, and would soon
have had his half of the sail down in the top, had he been let
alone; while I was taking the gaskets from the yard, with
the intention of bringing them carefully down on deck, where
it struck me they would be quite safe. Luckily for us, the
men were too busy heaving, and too stupid, to be very
critical
,
and we escaped much ridicule. In a week we both
knew better.
The ship only got to the quarantine ground that day, but
in the morning we went to sea. Our passage was long and
stormy. The ship was on a bow-line most of the time, and
we were something like forty days from land to land.
Nothing
extraordinary occurred, however, and we finally made
the Bill of Portland. The weather came on thick, but we
found a pilot, and ran into St. Helen's Roads and anchored.
The captain got into his boat, and taking four men pulled
ashore, to look for his orders at Cowes.
That afternoon it cleared off, and we found a pilot lying
a little outside of us. About sunset a man-of-war's cutter
came alongside, and Mr. Irish was ordered to muster the
crew. The English lieutenant, who was tolerably bowsed
up, took his seat behind the cabin table, while the men came
down, and stood in the companion-way passage, to be
over-hauled
.
Most of the foreigners had gone in the boat, but
two of the Americans that remained were uncommonly
fine-looking
men, and were both prime seamen. One, whose
name was Thomas Cook, was a six-footer, and had the air
of a thorough sea-dog. He filled the lieutenant's eye
mightily
,
and Cook was very coolly told to gather his dunnage,
3
as he was wanted. Cook pointed to his protection, but the
lieutenant answeredOh! these things are nothing
anybody
can have one for two dollars, in New York. You are
an Englishman, and the King has need of your services.
Cook now took out of his pocket a certificate, that was
signed
by Sir John Beresford, stating that Thomas Cook had
been discharged from His Maj. Ship Cambrian, after a pretty
long service in her, because he had satisfactorily proved that
he was a native-born American. The lieutenant could not
very well dishonour this document, and he reluctantly let
Cook go, keeping his protection, however. He next
selected
Isaac Gaines, a native New Yorker, a man whose father
and friends were known to the captain. But Gaines had no
discharge like that of Cook's, and the poor fellow was obliged
to rowse up his chest and get into the cutter. This he did
with tears in his eyes, and to the regret of all on board, he
being one of the best men in the ship. We asked the boat's
crew to what vessel they belonged, and they gave us the
name of a sixty-four in the offing, but we observed, as they
pulled away from us, that they took the direction of another
ship. This was the last I ever saw, or heard, of Isaac
Gaines. Cook went on with us, and one day, while in
London
,
he went with Cooper to Somerset House to get an
order
for some prize-money, to which he was entitled for his
service in the Cambrian, as was shown by his discharge.
The clerk asked him to leave the certificate, and call a day
or two later, when he would have searched out the amount.
This was done, and Cook, being now without certificate or
protection, was pressed on his way back to the ship. We
never heard of him, either. Such was often the fate of
sailors, in that day, who were with you one day, and lost
for ever the next.
Captain Johnston did not get back to the ship for
four-and-twenty
hours. He brought orders for us to go up to
London; and, the wind being fair, and almost a gale, we got
under way, and were off as soon as possible. The next
morning we were in the straits of Dover; the wind light,
but fair. This was at a moment when all England was in
arms, in anticipation of an invasion from France. Forty
odd sail of vessels of war were counted from our ship, as the
day dawned, that had been cruising in the narrow waters,
during the night, to prevent a surprise.
We worked our way up to London, with the tides, and
were carried into London dock; where we discharged. This
was my first visit to the modern Babylon, of course; but I
had little opportunity of seeing much. I had one or two
cruises, of a Sunday, in tow of Cooper, who soon became a
branch pilot, in those waters, about the parks and west end;
but I was too young to learn much, or to observe much.
Most of us went to see the monument, St. Paul's, and the
lions; and Cooper put himself in charge of a beef-eater, and
took a look at the arsenals, jewels and armoury. He had
a rum time of it, in his sailor rig, but hoisted in a wonderful
deal of gibberish, according to his own account of his cruise.
Captain Johnston now got a freight for the ship, and we
hauled into the stream, abreast of the dock-gates, and took
in shingle ballast. The Prussian, Dane, second mate, and
the English cooper, all left us, in London. We got a
Philadelphian
,
a chap from Maine, who had just been discharged
from an English man-of-war, and an Irish lad, in their
places. In January we sailed, making the best of our way
for the straits of Gibraltar. The passage was stormythe
Bay of Biscay, in particular, giving us a touch of its
qualities. It was marked by only two incidents, however,
out of the usual way. While running down the coast of
Portugal, with the land in sight, we made an armed felucca
astern, and to windward. This vessel gave chase; and,
the captain disliking her appearance, we carried hard, in
order to avoid her. The weather was thick, and it blew
fresh, occasionally, in squalls. Whenever it lulled, the
felucca gained on us, we having, a very little, the advantage
in the puffs. At length the felucca began to fire; and,
finding
that his shot were coming pretty near, Captain Johnston,
knowing that he was in ballast, thought it wisest to heave-to.
Ten minutes after our maintopsail was aback, the felucca
ranged up close under our lee; hailed, and ordered us to
send a boat, with our papers, on board her. A more
rascally-looking
craft never gave such an order to an unarmed
merchantman. As our ship rose on a sea, and he fell into
the trough, we could look directly down upon his decks, and
thus form some notion of what we were to expect, when he
got possession of us. His people were in red caps and shirts,
and appeared to be composed of the rakings of such places
as Gibraltar, Cadiz and Lisbon. He had ten long guns;
and pikes, pistols and muskets, were plenty with him. On
the end of each latine-yard was a chap on the look-out, who
occasionally turned his eyes towards us, as if to anticipate
the gleanings. That we should be plundered, every one
expected; and it was quite likely we might be ill-treated.
As soon as we hove-to, Captain Johnston gave me the best
spy-glass, with orders to hand it to Cooper, to hide. The
latter buried it in the shingle ballast. We, in the cabin,
concealed a bag of guineas so effectually, that, after all was
over, we could not find it ourselves.
The jolly-boat had been stowed in the launch, on account
of the rough weather we had expected to meet, and tackles
had to be got aloft before we could hoist it out. This
consumed
some time, during which there was a lull. The
felucca
,
seeing us busy at this work, waited patiently until we
had got the boat over the side, and into the water. Cooper,
Dan McCoy, Big Dan, and Spanish Joe, then got into her;
and the captain had actually passed his writing-desk into the
boat, and had his leg on the rail, to go over the side himself,
when a squall struck the ship. The men were called out
of the boat to clew down the topsails, and a quarter of an
hour passed in taking care of the vessel. By this time the
squall had passed, and it lightened up a little. There lay
the felucca, waiting for the boat; and the men were
reluctantly
going into the latter again, when the commander of
the felucca waved his hand to us, his craft fell off and filled,
wing-and-wing, skimming away towards the coast, like a
duck. We stood gaping and staring at her, not knowing
what to make of this manuvre, when bang! went a
heavy gun, a little on our weather quarter. The shot passed
our wake, for we had filled our topsail, and it went skipping
from sea to sea, after the felucca. Turning our eyes in the
direction of the report, we saw a frigate running down upon
the felucca, carrying studding-sails on both sides, with the
water foaming up to her hawse-holes. As she passed our
stern, she showed an English ensign, but took no other
notice
of us, continuing on after the felucea, and occasionally
measuring her distance with a shot. Both vessels soon
disappeared
in the mist, though we heard guns for some time.
As for ourselves, we jogged along on our course, wishing
good luck to the Englishman. The felucca showed no
ensign
,
the whole day. Our guineas were found, some weeks
later, in a bread-locker, after we had fairly eaten our way
down to them.
The other adventure occurred very soon after this escape;
for, though the felucca may have had a commission, she was
a pirate in appearance, and most probably in her practices.
The thick westerly weather continued until we had passed
the Straits. The night we were abreast of Cape Trafalgar,
the captain came on deck in the middle watch, and, hailing
the forecastle, ordered a sharp look-out kept, as we must be
running through Lord Collingwood's fleet. The words were
hardly out of his mouth, when Spanish Joe sung out, sail
ho! There she was, sure enough, travelling right down
upon us, in a line that threatened to take us between the
fore and main masts. The captain ordered our helm hard
up, and yelled for Cooper to bring up the cabin lantern.
The youngster made one leap down the ladder, just scraping
the steps with his heels, and was in the mizzen rigging with
the light, in half a minute. That saved us. So near was
the stranger, that we plainly heard the officer of the deck
call out to his own quarter-master to port, hard a-port
hard
a-port, and be dd to you! Hard a-port it was, and
a two-decker came brushing along on our weather beam
so near, that, when she lifted on the seas, it seemed as if the
muzzles of her guns would smash our rails. The Sterling
did not behave well on this occasion, for, getting a yaw to
windward, she seemed disposed to go right into the
Englishman
,
before she would mind her helm. After the
man-of-war
hailed, and got our answer, her officer quaintly
remarked
that we were close on board him. It blew too
fresh for boats, and we were suffered to pass without being
boarded.
The ship proceeded up to Carthagena, and went in. Here
we were put in quarantine for several days. The port was
full of heavy ships of war, several of which were
three-deckers
;
and an arrival direct from London made quite a
sensation among them. We had divers visits from the
officers, though I do not know what it all amounted to,
3 *
From Carthagena we were sent down the coast to a little
place called Aguilas, where we began to take in a cargo of
barilla. At night we would discharge our shingle ballast
into the water, contrary to law; and, in the day, we took
in cargo. So clear was the water, that our night's work
might easily be seen next morning, lying beneath the ship.
As we lay in a roadstead, it mattered little, few vessels
touching at the port. While at this place, there was an
alarm of an attack from an English man-of-war that was
seen in the offing, and priests enough turned out to defend
an ordinary town.
We got about half our freight at this little village, and
then came down as low as Almeria, an old Moorish town,
just below Cape de Gatte, for the remainder. Here we lay
several weeks, finishing stowing our cargo. I went ashore
almost every day to market, and had an opportunity of seeing
something of the Spaniards. Our ship lay a good distance
off, and we landed at a quarantine station, half a mile, at
least, from the water-gate, to which we were compelled to
walk along the beach.
One of my journeys to the town produced a little
adventure
.
The captain had ordered Cooper to boil some pitch
at the galley. By some accident, the pot was capsized, and
the ship came near being burned. A fresh pot was now
provided, and Cooper and Dan McCoy were sent ashore, at
the station, with orders to boil down pitch on the land. There
was no wharf, and it was always necessary to get ashore
through a surf. The bay is merely an elbow, half the winds
blowing in from the open sea. Sometimes, therefore,
landing
is ticklish work and requires much skill. I went ashore
with the pitch, and proceeded into the town on my errands,
whilst the two lads lighted their fire and began to boil down.
When all was ready, it was seen there was a good deal of
swell, and that the breakers looked squally. The orders,
however, were to go off, on such occasions, and not to wait,
as delay generally made matters worse. We got into the
boat, accordingly, and shoved off. For a minute, or more,
things went well enough, when a breaker took the bows of
the jolly-boat, lifted her nearly on end, and turned her keel
uppermost. One scarcely knows how he gets out of such
a scrape. We all came ashore, however, heels over head,
people, pot, boat, and oars. The experiment was renewed,
less the pitch and a pair of new shoes of mine, and it met
with exactly the same result. On a third effort, the boat
got through the surf and we succeeded in reaching the ship.
These are the sorts of scenes that harden lads, and make
them fond of risks. I could not swim a stroke, and
certainly
would have been drowned had not the Mediterranean
cast me ashore, as if disdaining to take a life of so little
value to anybody but myself.
After lying several weeks at Almeria, the ship got under
way for England again. We had fresh westerly gales, and
beat to and fro, between Europe and Africa, for some time,
when we got a Levanter that shoved us out into the
Atlantic
at a furious rate. In the Straits we passed a squadron
of Portuguese frigates, that was cruising against the
Algerines
.
It was the practice of those ships to lie at the Rock
until it blew strong enough from the eastward to carry
vessels
through the Gut, when they weighed and kept in the
offing until the wind shifted. This was blockading the
Atlantic
against their enemies, and the Mediterranean against
their own ships.
We had a long passage and were short of salt provisions.
Falling in with an American in the Bay of Biscay, we got
a barrel of beef which lasted us in. When near the chops
of the channel, with a light southerly wind, we made a sail
in our wake, that came up with us hand over hand. She
went nearly two feet to our one, the barilla pressing the
Sterling down into the water, and making her very dull,
more especially in light airs. When the stranger got near
enough, we saw that he was pumping, the water running
out of his scuppers in a constant stream. He was several
hours in sight, the whole time pumping. This ship passed
within a cable's-length of us, without taking any more
notice
of us than if we had been a mile-stone. She was an
English two-decker, and we could distinguish the features
of her men, as they stood in the waist, apparently taking
breath after their trial at the pumps. She dropped a
hawse-bucket
,
and we picked it up, when she was about half a mile
ahead of us. It had the broad-arrow on it, and a
custom-house
officer seeing it, some time after, was disposed to seize
it as a prize.
We never knew the name of this ship, but there was
something proud and stately in her manner of passing us,
in her distress, without so much as a hail. It is true, we could have done her no good, and her object, doubtless, was
to get into dock as soon as possible. Some thought she had
been in action, and was going home to repair damages that
could not be remedied at sea.
Soon after this vessel was seen, we had proof how
difficult
it is to judge of a ship's size at sea. A vessel was made
ahead, standing directly for us. Mr. Irish soon pronounced
her a sloop of war. Half an hour later she grew into a
frigate
,
but when she came abeam she showed three tiers of
ports, being a ninety. This ship also passed without
deigning
to take any notice of us.
CHAPTER III.
We
made the Land's End in fine weather, and with a
fair wind. Instead of keeping up channel, however, our
ship hauled in for the land. Cooper was at the helm, and
the captain asked him if he knew of any one on board who
had ever been into Falmouth. He was told that
Philadelphia
Bill had been pointing out the different head-lands on
the forecastle, and that, by his own account, he had sailed a
long time out of the port. This Bill was a man of fifty,
steady, trust-worthy, quiet, and respected by every man in
the ship. He had taken a great liking to Cooper, whom he
used to teach how to knot and splice, and other niceties of
the calling, and Cooper often took him ashore with him, and
amused him with historical anecdotes of the different places
we visited. In short, the intimacy between them was as
great as well could be, seeing the difference in their
educations
and ages. But, even to Cooper, Bill always called
himself a Philadelphian. In appearance, indeed, he
resembled
one of those whom we call Yankees, in America, more
than anything else.
Bill was now sent for and questioned. He seemed
uneasy
,
but admitted he could take the ship into Falmouth.
There was nothing in the way, but a rock abreast
Pendennis
Castle, but it was easy to give that a berth. We now
learned that the captain had made up his mind to go into
this port and ride out the quarantine to which all
Mediterranean
vessels were subject. Bill took us in very quietly,
and the ship was ordered up a few miles above the town, to
a bay where vessels rode out their quarantine. The next
day a doctor's boat came alongside, and we were ordered to
show ourselves, and flourish our limbs, in order to make it
evident we were alive and kicking. There were four men
in the boat, and, as it turned out, every one of them
recognised
Bill, who was born within a few miles of the very spot
where the ship lay, and had a wife then living a great deal
nearer to him than he desired. It was this wifethere
happening
to be too much of herthat had driven the poor
fellow
to America, twenty years before, and which rendered
him unwilling to live in his native country. By private
means, Bill managed to have some communication with the
men in the boat, and got their promises not to betray him.
This was done by signs altogether, speaking being quite out
of the question.
We were near, or quite, a fortnight in quarantine; after
which the ship dropped down abreast of the town. This
was of a Saturday, and Sunday, a portion of the crew were
permitted to go ashore. Bill was of the number, and when
he returned he admitted that he had been so much excited
at finding himself in the place, that he had been a little
indiscreet. That night he was very uncomfortable, but
nothing occurred to molest any of us. The next morning
all seemed right, and Bill began to be himself again; often
wishing, however, that the anchor was a-weigh, and the
ship turning out of the harbour. We soon got at work, and
began to work down to the mouth of the haven, with a light
breeze. The moment we were clear of the points, or
head-lands
,
we could make a fair wind of it up channel. The
ship was in stays, pretty well down, under Pendennis, and
the order had been given to swing the head yards. Bill and
Cooper were pulling together at the foretopsail brace, when
the report of a musket was heard quite near the ship. Bill
let go the brace, turned as white as a sheet, and exclaimed,
I'm gone! At first, the men near him thought he was
shot, but a gesture towards the boat which had fired,
explained
his meaning. The order was given to belay the
head braces, and we waited the result in silence.
The press-gang was soon on board us, and its officer asked
to have the crew mustered. This humiliating order was
obeyed, and all hands of us were called aft. The officer
seemed easily satisfied, until he came to Bill. What
countryman
are
you?
he asked. An Americana
Philadelphian
,
answered Bill. You are an Englishman. No,
sir; I was born Over here, across the bay,
interrupted
the officer, with a cool smile, where your dear wife
is at this moment. Your name is  , and you are
well known in Falmouth. Get your clothes, and be ready
to go in the boat.
This settled the matter. Captain Johnston paid Bill his
wages, his chest was lowered into the boat, and the poor
fellow took an affectionate leave of his ship-mates. He told
those around him that his fate was sealed. He was too old
to outlive a war that appeared to have no end, and they
would never trust
him
on shore. My foot will never touch
the land again, he said to Cooper, as he squeezed his young
friend's hand, and I am to live and die, with a ship for my
prison.
The loss of poor Bill made us all sad; but there was no
remedy. We got into the offing, and squared away for the
river again. When we reached London, the ship discharged
down at Limehouse, where she lay in a tier of Americans
for some time. We then took in a little ballast, and went
up opposite to the dock gates once more. We next docked
and cleaned the ship, on the Deptford side, and then hauled
into the wet-dock in which we had discharged our flour.
Here the ship lay part of May, all of June, and most of
July, taking in freight for Philadelphia, as it offered. This
gave our people a good deal of spare time, and we were
allowed to go ashore whenever we were not wanted. Cooper
now took me in tow, and many a drift I had with him and
Dan McCoy up to St. Paul's, the parks, palaces, and the
Abbey. A little accident that happened about this time,
attached me to Cooper more than common, and made me
more desirous than ever to cruise in his company.
I was alone, on deck, one Sunday, when I saw a little
dog running about on board a vessel that lay outside of us.
Around the neck of this animal, some one had fastened a
sixpence, by a bit of riband rove through a hole. I thought
this sixpence might be made better use of, in purchasing
some cherries, for which I had a strong longing, and I gave
chase. In attempting to return to our own ship, with the
dog, I fell into the water, between the two vessels. I could
not swim a stroke; and I sang out, lustily, for help. As
good luck would have it, Cooper came on board at that
precise
instant; and, hearing my outcry, he sprang down
between
the ships, and rescued me from drowning. I thought
I was gone; and my condition made an impression on me
that never will be lost. Had not Cooper accidentally
appeared, just as he did, Ned Myers's yarn would have
ended with this paragraph. I ought to add, that the
sixpence
got clear, the dog swimming away with it.
I had another escape from drowning, while we lay in the
docks, having fallen overboard from the jolly-boat, while
making an attempt at sculling. I forget, now, how I was
saved; but then I had the boat and the oar to hold on to. In
the end, it will be seen by what a terrific lesson I finally
learned to swim.
One Sunday we were drifting up around the palace; and
then it was that I told Cooper that the Duke of Kent was my
godfather. He tried to persuade me to make a call; saying
I could do no less than pay this respect to the prince. I had
half a mind to try my hand at a visit; but felt too shy, and
too much afraid. Had I done as Cooper so strongly urged
me to do, one cannot say what might have been the
consequences
,
or what change might have been brought about in
my fortunes.
[4]
[4]
I well remember using these arguments to Ned; though less with
any expectations of being admitted, than the boy seemed to believe.
There was more roguery, than anything else, in my persuasion;
though it was mixed with a latent wish to see the interior of the
palace
.
Editor
.
One day Mr. Irish was in high glee, having received a
message from Captain Johnston, to inform him that the
latter
was pressed! The captain used to dress in a blue
long-tog
,
drab-breeches and top-boots, when he went ashore.
He thought he could pass for a gentleman from the
country
,
said Mr. Irish, laughing, but them pressgang chaps
smelt the tar in his very boots! Cooper was sent to the
rendezvous, with the captain's desk and papers, and the
latter was liberated. We all liked the captain, who was
kind and considerate in his treatment of all hands; but it
was fine fun for us to have the old fellow pressed
old
fellow
of six or eight-and-twenty, as he was then.
About the last of July, we left London, bound home. Our
crew had again undergone some changes. We shipped a
second mate, a New-England man. Jim Russel left us.
We had lost Bill; and, another Bill, a dull Irish lad, who
had gone to Spain, quitted us also. Our crew consisted of
only Spanish Joe; Big Dan; Little Dan; Stephen, the
Kennebunk
man; Cooper; a Swede, shipped in London; a man
whose name I have forgotten; and a young man who passed
by the name of Davis, but who was, in truth,  , a
son of the pilot who had brought us in, and taken us out,
each time we passed up or down the river. This Davis had
sailed in a coaster belonging to his father, and had got pressed
in Sir Home Popham's South-American squadron. They
made him a midshipman; but, disliking the sea, he was
determined
to go to America. We had to smuggle him out
of the country, on account of the pressgang; he making his
appearance on board us, suddenly, one night, in the river.
The Sterling was short-handed this passage, mustering
but four hands in a watch. Notwithstanding, we often
reefed in the watch, though Cooper and Little Dan were
both scarcely more than boys. Our mates used to go aloft, and
both were active, powerful men. The cook, too, was a
famous fellow at a drag. In these delicate times, when two
or three days of watch and watch knock up a set of young
men, one looks back with pride to a passage like this, when
fourteen men and boysfour of the latterbrought a good
sized ship across the ocean, reefing in the watch, weathering
many a gale, and thinking nothing of it. I presume half
our people, on a pinch, could have brought the Sterling in.
One of the boys I have mentioned was named John Pugh, a
little fellow the captain had taken as an apprentice in
London
,
and who was now at sea for the first time in his life.
We had a long passage. Every inch of the way to the
Downs was tide-work. Here we lay several days, waiting
for a wind. It blew fresh from the southwest half of that
summer, and the captain was not willing to go out with a
foul wind. We were surrounded with vessels of war, most
of the Channel Fleet being at anchor around us. This
made a gay scene, and we had plenty of music, and plenty
of saluting. One day all hands turned-to together, and fired
starboard and larboard, until we could see nothing but a few
mast-heads. What it all meant I never heard, but it made
a famous smoke, and a tremendous noise.
A frigate came in, and anchored just ahead of us. She
lowered a boat, and sent a reefer alongside to inform us that
she was His Majesty's ship ; that she had lost all her
anchors but the stream, and she might strike adrift, and he
advised us to get out of her way. The captain held on
that day, however, but next morning she came into us,
sure enough. The ships did not get clear without some
trouble, and we thought it wisest to shift our berth. Once
aweigh, the captain thought it best to turn out of the
Downs, which we did, working through the Straits, and
anchoring under Dungeness, as soon as the flood made.
Here we lay until near sun-set, when we got under way to
try our hand upon the ebb. I believe the skipper had made
up his mind to tide it down to the Land's End, rather than
remain idle any longer. There was a sloop of war lying
in-shore of us, a mile or so, and just as we stretched out
from under the land, she began to telegraph with a signal
station ashore. Soon after, she weighed, and came out,
also. In the middle watch we passed this ship, on opposite
tacks, and learned that an embargo had been laid, and that
we had only saved our distance by some ten or fifteen
minutes
!
This embargo was to prevent the intelligence of the
Copenhagen expedition from reaching the Danes. That very
day, we passed a convoy of transports, carrying a brigade
from Pendennis Castle to Yarmouth, in order to join the
main fleet. A gun-brig brought us to, and came near
pressing
the Swede, under the pretence that being allies of his
king, England had a right to his services. Had not the
man been as obstinate as a bull, and positively refused to
go, I do believe we should have lost him. He was ordered
into the boat at least half-a-dozen times, but swore he would
not budge. Cooper had a little row with this boarding
officer
,
but was silenced by the captain.
4
After the news received from the sloop of war, it may be
supposed we did not venture to anchor any where on English
ground. Keeping the channel, we passed the Isle of Wight
several times, losing on the flood, the distance made on the
ebb. At length we got a slant and fetched out into the
Atlantic
,
heading well to the southward, however. Our
passage
was long, even after we got clear, the winds carrying
us down as low as Corvo, which island we made, and then
taking us well north again. We had one very heavy blow
that forced us to scud, the Sterling being one of the wettest
ships that ever floated, when heading up to the sea.
When near the American coast, we spoke an English brig
that gave us an account of the affair between the Leopard
and the Chesapeake, though he made his own countrymen
come out second-best. Bitter were the revilings of Mr. Irish
when the pilot told us the real state of the case. As was
usual with this ship's luck, we tided it up the bay and river,
and got safe alongside of the wharf at Philadelphia, at last.
Here our crew was broken up, of course, and, with the
exception
of Jack Pugh, my brother apprentice, and Cooper, I
never saw a single soul of them afterwards. Most of them
went on to New York, and were swallowed up in the great
vortex of seamen. Mr. Irish, I heard, died the next voyage
he made, chief mate of an Indiaman. He was a prime
fellow
,
and fit to command a ship.
Such was my first voyage at sea, for I count the passage
round from Halifax as nothing. I had been kept in the
cabin, it is true, but our work had been of the most active
kind. The Sterling must have brought up, and been got
under way, between fifty and a hundred times; and as for
tacking, waring, chappelling round, and box-hauling, we had
so much of it by the channel pilots, that the old barky scarce
knew which end was going foremost. In that day, a ship
did not get from the Forelands up to London without some
trouble, and great was our envy of the large blocks and
light cordage of the colliers, which made such easy work
for their men. We singled much of our rigging, the second
voyage up the river, ourselves, and it was a great relief to
the people. A set of grass foresheets, too, that we bought
in Spain, got to be great favourites, though, in the end, they
cost the ship the life of a very valuable man.
Captain Johnston now determined to send me to
Wiscasset
,
that I might go to school. A Wiscasset schooner, called
the Clarissa, had come into Philadelphia, with freight from
the West Indies, and she was about to sail for home in
ballast
.
I was put on board as a passenger, and we sailed
about a week after the ship got in from London. Jack Pugh
staid behind, the Sterling being about to load for Ireland.
On board the Clarissa I made the acquaintance of a
Philadelphian
born, who was an apprentice to the master of the
schooner, of the name of Jack Mallet. He was a little older
than myself, and we soon became intimate, and, in time,
were fated to see many strange things in company.
The Clarissa went, by the Vineyard Sound and the Shoals,
into Boston. Here she landed a few crates, and then sailed
for Wiscasset, where we arrived after a pretty long passage.
I was kindly received by the mother and family of Captain
Johnston, and immediately sent to school. Shortly after,
we heard of the embargo, and, the Clarissa being laid up,
Jack Mallet became one of my school-mates. We soon
learned that the Sterling had not been able to get out, and,
ere long, Jack Pugh joined our party. A little later, Captain
Johnston arrived, to go into the commercial quarantine with
the rest of us.
This was the long embargo, as sailors called it, and it did
not terminate until Erskine's arrangement was made, in
1809. All this time I remained in Wiscasset, at school,
well treated, and, if anything, too much indulged. Captain
Johnston remained at home all this time, also, and, having
nothing else to do, he set about looking out for a wife. We
had, at school, Jack Pugh, Jack Mallet, and Bill Swett, the
latter being a lad a little older than myself, and a nephew
of the captain's. I was now sixteen, and had nearly gotten
my growth.
As soon as the embargo was removed, Captain Johnston,
accompanied by Swett, started for Philadelphia, to bring the
ship round to New York. From that place he intended to
sail for Liverpool, where Jack Pugh and myself were to join
him, sailing in a ship called the Columbia. This plan was
changed, however, and we were sent round by sea to join
the Sterling again, in the port where I had first found her.
As this was near three years after I had quitted the
Heizer's
so unceremoniously, I went to look for them. Their
old neighbours told me they had been gone to Martinique,
about a twelvemonth. This was the last intelligence I ever
heard of them. Bill Swett was now put into the cabin, and
Jack Pugh and myself were sent regularly to duty before
the mast. We lived in the steerage, and had cabin fare;
but, otherwise, had the fortunes of foremast Jacks. Our
freight was wheat in the lower hold, flour betwixt decks, and
cotton on deck. The ship was very deep. Our crew was
good, but both our mates were foreigners.
Nothing occurred until we got near soundings, when it
came on to blow very heavy from the southward and
westward
.
The ship was running under a close-reefed
main-topsail
and foresail, with a tremendous sea on. Just as night
set in, one Harry, a Prussian, came on deck from his supper
to relieve the wheel, and, fetching a lurch as he went aft, he
brought up against the launch, and thence down against our
grass fore-sheet, which had been so great a favourite in the
London passages. This rope had been stretched above the
deck load for a ridge rope, but, being rotten, it gave way
when the poor Prussian struck it, and he went into the sea.
We could do no more than throw him the sky-light, which
was large; but the ship went foaming ahead, leaving the
poor fellow to his fate, in the midst of the hissing waters.
Some of our people thought they saw poor Harry on the
sky-light, but this could not have made much difference in
such a raging sea. It was impossible to round-to, and as
for a boat's living, it was out of the question. This was the
first man I saw lost at sea, and, notwithstanding the severity
of the gale, and the danger of the ship herself, the fate of
this excellent man made us all melancholy. The captain
felt it bitterly, as was evident from his manner. Still, the
thing was unavoidable.
We had begun to shorten sail early in the afternoon, and
Harry was lost in the first dog-watch. A little later the
larboard fore-sheet went, and the sail was split. All hands
were called, and the rags were rolled up, and the gaskets
passed. The ship now laboured so awfully that she began
to leak. The swell was so high that we did not dare to
come by the wind, and the seas would come in, just about
the main chains, meet in board and travel out over her bows
in a way to threaten everything that could be moved. We
lads were lashed at the pumps, and ordered to keep at work;
and to make matters worse, the wheat began to work its
way into the pump-well. While things were in this state,
the main-top-sail split, leaving the ship without a rag of sail
on her.
The Sterling loved to be under water, even in moderate
weather. Many a time have I seen her send the water aft,
into the quarter-deck scuppers, and, as for diving, no loon
was quicker than she. Now, that she was deep and was
rolling her deck-load to the water, it was time to think of
lightening her. The cotton was thrown overboard as fast
as we could, and what the men could not start the seas did.
After a while we eased the ship sensibly, and it was well we
did; the wheat choking the pumps so often, that we had
little opportunity for getting out the water.
I do not now recollect at what hour of this fearful night,
Captain Johnston shouted out to us all to look outand
hold on. The ship was broaching-to. Fortunately she
did this at a lucky moment, and, always lying-to well,
though wet, we made much better weather on deck. The
mizzen-staysail was now set to keep her from falling off
into the troughs of the sea. Still the wind blew as hard as
ever. First one sail, then another, got loose, and a hard
time we had to keep the canvass to the yards. Then the
foretopmast went, with a heavy lurch, and soon after the
main, carrying with it the mizzen-top-gallant-mast. We
owed this to the embargo, in my judgment, the ship's
rigging
having got damaged lying dry so long. We were all
night clearing the wreck, and the men who used the
hatchets
,
told us that the wind would cant their tools so violently
that they sometimes struck on the eyes, instead of the edge.
The gale fairly seemed like a hard substance.
We passed a fearful night, working at the pumps, and
endeavouring to take care of the ship. Next morning it
moderated a little, and the vessel was got before the wind,
which was perfectly fair. She could carry but little sail;
though we got up top-gallant-masts for top-masts, as soon as
the sea would permit. About four, I saw the land myself,
and pointed it out to the mate. It was Cape Clear, and we
4 *
were heading for it as straight as we could go. We hauled
up to clear it, and ran into the Irish channel. A large fleet
of vessels had gathered in and near the chops of the
channel
,
in readiness to run into Liverpool by a particular day,
that had been named in the law opening the trade, and great
had been the destruction among them. I do not remember
the number of the ships we saw, but there must have been
more than a hundred. It was afterwards reported, that near
fifty vessels were wrecked on the Irish coast. Almost every
craft we fell in with was more or less dismasted, and one
vessel, a ship called the Liberty, was reported to have gone
down, with every soul on board her.
The weather becoming moderate, all hands of us went
into Liverpool, the best way we could. The Sterling had
good luck in getting up, though we lay some time in the
river before we were able to get into dock. When we got
out the cargo, we found it much damaged, particularly the
wheat. The last was so hot that we could not bear our feet
among it. We got it all out in a few days, when we went
into a dry dock, and repaired.
This visit to Liverpool scattered our crew as if it had
been so much dust in a squall. Most of our men were
pressed, and those that were not, ran. But one man, us
boys excepted, stuck by the ship. The chief mate  a
foreigner, though of what country I never could discover
lived at a house kept by a handsome landlady. To oblige
this lady, he ordered William Swett and myself to carry a
bucket-full of salt, each, up to her house. The salt came
out of the harness-cask, and we took it ashore openly, but
we were stopped on the quay by a custom-house officer, who
threatened to seize the ship. Such was the penalty for
landing
two buckets of Liverpool salt at Liverpool!
Captain Johnston had the matter explained, and he
discharged
the mate. Next day, the discharged man and the
second mate were pressed. We got the last, who was a
Swede, clear; and the chief mate, in the end, made his
escape, and found his way back to New York. Among
those impressed, was Jack Pugh, who having been bound
in London, we did not dare show his papers. The captain
tried hard to get the boy clear, but without success. I never
saw poor Jack after this; though I learn he ran from the
market-boat of the guard-ship, made his way back to
Wiscasset
,
where he stayed some time, then shipped, and was
lost at sea.
CHAPTER IV.
At
length we got a new crew, and sailed for home. We
had several passengers on board, masters of American ships
who could go back themselves, but not carry their vessels with
them, on account of certain liberties the last had taken with
the laws. These persons were called embargo captains.
One of them, a Captain B, kept Captain Johnston's
watch, and got so much into his confidence and favour, that
he gave him the vessel in the end. The passage home was
stormy and long, but offered nothing remarkable. A
non-importation
law had been passed during our absence, and
our ship was seized in New York in consequence of having
a cargo of English salt. We had taken the precaution,
however, to have the salt cleared in Liverpool, and put afloat
before the day named in the law, and got clear after a
detention
of two months. Salt rose so much in the interval,
that the seizure turned out to be a good thing for the
owners
.
While the ship was lying off the Battery, on her return
from this voyage, and before she had hauled in, a boat came
alongside with a young man in her in naval uniform. This
was Cooper, who, in pulling across to go aboard his own
vessel, had recognised our mast-heads, and now came to
look at us. This was the last time I met him, until the year
1843; or, for thirty-four years.
We now loaded with naval stores, and cleared again for
Liverpool. Bill Swett did not make this voyage with us,
the cook acting as steward. We had good passages out and
home, experiencing no detention or accidents. In the spring
of 1810, Captain Johnston gave the ship to Captain B,
who carried us to Liverpool for the third time. Nothing
took place this voyage either, worthy of being mentioned,
the ship getting back in good season. We now took in a
cargo of staves for Limerick. Off the Hook we were
brought-to by the Indian sloop-of-war, one of the Halifax
cruisers, a squadron in company. Several vessels were
coming out at the same time, and among them were several
of the clippers in the French trade. The Amiable Matilda
and the Colt went to windward of the Englishmen as if the
last had been at anchor; but the Tameahmeah, when
nearest
to the English, got her yards locked in stays, and was
captured. We saw all this, and felt, as was natural to men
who beheld such things enacted at the mouth of their own
port. Our passages both ways were pleasant, and nothing
occurred out of the usual course. I fell in with a
press-gang
,
however, in Limerick, which would have nabbed me,
but for a party of Irishmen, who showed fight and
frightened
the fellows so much that I got clear. Once before, I had
been in the hands of these vermin in Liverpool, but Captain
Johnston had got me clear by means of my indentures. I
was acting as second-mate this voyage.
On our return home, the ship was ordered to Charleston
to get a cargo of yellow pine, under a contract. Captain
B was still in command, my old master, Captain
Johnston
,
being then at home, occupied in building a new ship.
I never saw this kind-hearted and indulgent seaman until
the year 1842, when I made a journey to Wiscasset
expressly
to see him. Captain B and myself were never
very good friends, and I was getting to be impatient of his
authority; but I still stuck by the ship.
We had an ordinary run to Charleston, and began to
prepare for the reception of our cargo. At this time, there
were two French privateers on the southern coast, that did
a great deal of damage to our trade. One went into
Savannah
,
and got burned, for her pains; and the other came
into Charleston, and narrowly escaped the same fate. A
mob collectedmade a fire-raft, and came alongside of our
ship, demanding some tar. To own the truth, though then
clothed with all the dignity of a Dicky,
[5]
[5]
Second-mate.
I liked the fun,
and offered no resistance. Bill Swett had come in, in a ship
called the United States; and he was on board the Sterling,
at the time, on a visit to me. We two, off hatches, and
whipped a barrel of tar on deck; which we turned over to
the raftsmen, with our hearty good wishes for their success.
All this was, legally, very wrong; but, I still think, it was
not so very far from being morally just; at least, as regards
the privateersmen. The attempt failed, however, and those
implicated were blamed a great deal more than they would
have been, had they burned up the Frenchmen's eye-bolts.
It is bad to fail, in a legal undertaking; but success is
indispensable
for forgiveness, to one that is illegal.
That night, Captain B and the chief mate, came
down upon me, like a gust, for having parted with the tar.
They concluded their lecture, by threatening to work me
up. Bill Swett was by, and he got his share of the dose.
When we were left to ourselves, we held a council of war,
about future proceedings. Our crew had run, to a man, the
cook excepted, as usually happens, in Charleston; and we
brought in the cook, as a counsellor. This man told me,
that he had overheard the captain and mate laying a plan to
give me a threshing, as soon as I had turned in. Bill, now,
frankly proposed that I should run, as well as himself; for
he had already left his ship; and our plan was soon laid.
Bill went ashore, and brought a boat down under the bows
of the ship, and I passed my dunnage into her, by going
through the forecastle; I then left the Sterling, for ever,
never putting my foot on board of her again. I saw her,
once or twice, afterwards, at a distance, and she always
looked like a sort of home to me. She was subsequently
lost, on the eastern coast, Captain Johnston still owning her,
and being actually on board her, though only as a passenger.
I had been out in her twelve times, from country to country,
besides several short runs, from port to port. She always
seemed natural to me; and I had got to know every
timber
and stick about her. I felt more, in quitting this ship,
than I did in quitting Halifax. This desertion was the third
great error of my life. The first was, quitting those with
whom I had been left by my father; the second, abandoning
my good friends, the Heizers; and the third, leaving the
Sterling. Had Captain Johnston been in the ship, I never
should have dreamed of running. He was always kind to
me; and, if he failed in justice, it was on the side of
indulgence
.
Had I continued with him, I make no doubt, my
career would have been very different from what it has since
turned out to be; and, I fear, I must refer one of the very
bad habits, that afterwards marred my fortunes, that of
drinking too much, to this act. Still, it will be remembered,
I was only nineteen, loved adventure, and detested Captain
B.
After this exploit, Swett and I kept housed for a week.
He then got into a ship called the President, and I into
another
called the Tontine, and both sailed for New York,
where we arrived within a few days of each other. We
now shipped together in a vessel called the Jane, bound to
Limerick. This was near the close of the year 1811. Our
passage out was tremendously bad, and we met with some
serious accidents to our people. We were not far from the
mouth of the Irish channel when the ship broached-to, in
scudding under the foresail and main-top-sail, Bill Swett
being
at the helm. The watch below ran on deck and hauled
up the foresail, without orders, to prevent the ship from
going
down stern foremost, the yards being square. As the
ship came-to, she took a sea in, on her starboard side, which
drove poor Bill to leeward, under some water-casks and
boards, beating in two of his ribs. Both mates were
injured
also, and were off duty in consequence for several weeks.
The plank sheer was ripped off the vessel from aft to
amidships
,
as neatly as if it had been done by the carpenters.
We could look down among the timbers the same as if the
vessel were on the stocks.
The men braced up the after-yards, and then the ship was
lying-to under a close-reefed main-top-sail. After this, she
did well enough. We now passed the hurt below, and got
tarred canvass over the timber-heads, and managed to keep
out the water. Next day we made sail for our port. It
blowing too fresh to get a pilot, we ran into a roadstead at
the mouth of the Shannon, and anchored with both bowers.
We rode out the gale, and then went up to Limerick. Here
all hands got well, and returned to duty. In due time, we
sailed for home in ballast. As we came into the Hook, we
were hailed by a gun-boat, and heard of the Little
Embargo
.
The question now came up seriously between Bill and
myself, what was best to be done. I was for going to
Wiscasset
,
like two prodigals, own our fault, and endeavour to
amend. Bill thought otherwise. Now we were cast ashore,
without employment, he thought it more manly to try and
shift for ourselves. He had an uncle who was a captain of
artillery, and who was then stationed on Governor's Island,
and we took him into our councils. This gentleman treated
us kindly, and kept us with him on the island for two days.
Finding his nephew bent on doing something for himself, he
gave us a letter to Lt. Trenchard, of the navy, by whom
we were both shipped for the service. Swett got a
master's-mate's
berth, and I was offered the same, but felt too much
afraid of myself to accept it. I entered the navy, then, for
the first time, as a common Jack.
This was a very short time before war was declared, and
a large flotilla of gun-boats was getting ready for the New
York station. Bill was put on board of No. 112, and I was
ordered to No. 107, Sailing-Master Costigan. Soon after,
we were all employed in fitting the Essex for sea; and while
thus occupied the Declaration of War actually arrived. On
this occasion I got drunk, for the second time in my life. A
quantity of whiskey was started into a tub, and all hands
drank to the success of the conflict. A little upset me, then,
nor would I have drunk anything, but for the persuasions
of some of my Wiscasset acquaintances, of whom there
were several in the ship. I advise all young men, who feel
no desire to drink, to follow their own propensities, and not
to yield themselves up, body and soul, to the thoughtless
persuasions of others. There is no real good-fellowship in
swilling rum and whiskey; but the taste, once acquired, is
hard to cure. I never drank much, as to quantity, but a
little filled me with the love of mischief, and that little served
to press me down for all the more valuable years of my life;
valuable, as to the advancement of my worldly interests,
though I can scarcely say I began really to live, as a
creature
of God's should live, to honour his name and serve his
ends, until the year 1839.
After the Essex was fitted out, the flotilla cruised in the
Sound, and was kept generally on the look-out, about the
waters of New York. Towards the end of the season, our
boat, with several others, was lying abreast of the Yard,
when orders came off to meet the Yard Commander,
Captain
Chauncey, on the wharf. Here, this officer addressed
us, and said he was about to proceed to Lake Ontario, to
take command, and asking who would volunteer to go with
him. This was agreeable news to us, for we hated the
gun-boats
,
and would go anywhere to be quit of them. Every
man and boy volunteered. We got twenty-four hours'
liberty
,
with a few dollars in money, and when this scrape was
over every man returned, and we embarked in a sloop for
Albany. Our draft contained near 140 men, and was
commanded
by Mr. Mix, then a sailing-master, but who died a
commander a few years since. Messrs. Osgood and
Mallaby
were also with us, and two midshipmen, viz: Messrs.
Sands and Livingston. The former of these young
gentlemen
is now a commander, but I do not know what became
of Mr. Livingston. We had also two master's-mates,
Messrs. Bogardus and Emory.
On reaching Albany, we paid a visit to the Governor,
gave him three cheers, got some good cheer in return, and
were all stowed in wagons, a mess in each, before his door.
We now took to our land tacks, and a merry time we had
of it. Our first day's run was to a place called
Schenectady
,
and here the officers found an empty house, and
berthed us all together, fastening the doors. This did not
suit our notions of a land cruise, and we began to grumble.
There was a regular hard horse of a boatswain's-mate with
us, of the name of McNally. This man had been in the
service a long time, and was a thorough man-of-war's man.
He had collected twenty-four of us, whom he called his
`disciples,' and shamed am I to say, I was one. McNally
called all hands on the upper deck, as he called it, that is to
say, in the garret, and made us a speech. He said this was
no way to treat volunteers, and proposed that we should
unship the awning. We rigged pries, and, first singing
out, stand from under, hove one half of the roof into the
street, and the other into the garden. We then gave three
cheers at our success. The officers now came down, and
gave us a lecture. But we made out so good a case, that
they let us run till morning, when every soul was back and
mustered in the wagons. In this way we went through the
country, cracking our jokes, laughing, and noting all
oddities
that crossed our course. I believe we were ten or
twelve days working our way through the state, to Oswego.
At Onondago Lake we got into boats, and did better than in
the wagons. At a village on the lake shore, the people
were very bitter against us, and we had some difficulty.
The word went among us they were Scotch, from the
Canadas
,
but of this I know nothing. We heard in the morning,
however, that most of our officers were in limbo, and we
crossed and marched up a hill, intending to burn, sink, and
destroy, if they were not liberated. Mischief was prevented
by the appearance of Mr. Mix, with the other gentlemen,
and we pushed off without coming to blows.
It came on to rain very hard, and we fetched up at a
solitary
house in the woods, and tried to get quarters. These
were denied us, and we were told to shift for ourselves.
This we did in a large barn, where we made good stowage
until morning. In the night, we caught the owner coming
about with a lantern to set fire to the barn, and we carried
him down to a boat, and lashed him there until morning,
letting the rain wash all the combustible matter out of him.
That day we reached Oswego Falls, where a party of us
were stationed some time, running boats over, and carrying
stores across the portage.
When everything reached Oswego, all hands turned to,
to equip some lake craft that had been bought for the
service
.
These were schooners, salt droggers, of about sixty
or eighty tons. All we did at Oswego, however, was to
load these vessels, some six or eight in all, and put to sea.
I went off in one of the first, a vessel called the Fair
American
.
Having no armaments, we sailed in the night, to
avoid John Bull's cruisers, of which there were several out
at the time. As we got in with some islands, at no great
distance from Sackett's Harbour, we fell in with the Oneida's
launch, which was always kept in the offing at night,
rowing
,
or sailing, guard. Bill Swett was in her, and we then
met for the first time on fresh water. I now learned that
Jack Mallet was on the station, too, whom I had not fallen
in with since we parted at Wiscasset, more than three years
before. A fortnight later I found him, acting as
boatswain
5
of the Julia, Sailing-Master Trant, a craft I have every
reason to remember as long as I shall live.
The day after I reached the harbour, I was ordered on
board the Scourge. This vessel was English-built, and had
been captured before the war, and condemned, for violating
the revenue laws, under the name of the Lord Nelson, by
the Oneida 16, Lt. Com. Woolseythe only cruiser we then
had on the lake. This craft was unfit for her duty, but time
pressed, and no better offered. Bulwarks had been raised
on her, and she mounted eight sixes, in regular broadside.
Her accommodations were bad enough, and she was so
tender
,
that we could do little or nothing with her in a blow.
It was often prognosticated that she would prove our coffin.
Besides Mr. Osgood, who was put in command of this vessel,
we had Mr. Bogardus, and Mr. Livingston, as officers. We
must have had about forty-five souls on board, all told. We
did not get this schooner out that season, however.
The commodore arriving, and an expedition against
Kingston
being in the wind, a party of us volunteered from the
Scourge, to go on board the Oneida. This was in
November
,
rather a latish month for active service on those waters.
The brig went out in company with the Conquest, Hamilton,
Governor Tompkins, Pert, Julia, and Growler, schooners.
These last craft were all merchantmen, mostly without
quarters
,
and scarcely fit for the duty on which they were
employed
.
The Oneida was a warm little brig, of sixteen 24
lb. carronades, but as dull as a transport. She had been
built to cross the bars of the American harbours, and would
not travel to windward.
We went off the False Ducks, where we made the Royal
George, a ship the English had built expressly to overlay
the Oneida, two or three years before, and which was big
enough to eat us. Her officers, however, did not belong to
the Royal Navy; and we made such a show of schooners,
that, though she had herself a vessel or two in company, she
did not choose to wait for us. We chased her into the Bay
of Quint, and there we lost her in the darkness. Next
morning, however, we saw her at anchor in the channel that
leads to Kingston. A general chase now commenced, and
we ran down into the bay, and engaged the ship and
batteries
,
as close as we could well get. The firing was sharp
on both sides, and it lasted a great while. I was stationed
at a gun, as her second captain, and was too busy to see
much; but I know we kept our piece speaking as fast as we
could, for a good bit. We drove the Royal George from a
second anchorage, quite up to a berth abreast of the town;
and it was said that her people actually deserted her, at one
time. We gave her nothing but round-shot from our gun,
and these we gave her with all our hearts. Whenever we
noticed the shore, a stand of grape was added.
I know nothing of the damage done the enemy. We had
the best of it, so far as I could see; and I think, if the
weather
had not compelled us to haul off, something serious
might have been done. As it was, we beat out with flying
colours, and anchored a few miles from the light.
These were the first shot I ever saw fired in anger. Our
brig had one man killed and three wounded, and she was
somewhat injured aloft. One shot came in not far from my
gun, and scattered lots of cat-tails, breaking in the
hammock-cloths
.
This was the nearest chance I ran, that day;
and, on the whole, I think we escaped pretty well. On our
return to the harbour, the ten Scourges who had
volunteered
for the cruise, returned to their own schooner. None
of us were hurt, though all of us were half frozen, the water
freezing as fast as it fell.
Shortly after both sides went into winter quarters, and
both sides commenced building. We launched a ship called
the Madison, about this time, and we laid the keel of
another
,
that was named the Pike. What John Bull was
about is more than I can say, though the next season
showed he had not been idle. The navigation did not
absolutely
close, notwithstanding, until December.
Our vessels were moored about the harbour, and we were
all frozen in, as a matter of course. Around each craft,
however, a space was kept cut, to form a sort of ditch, in
order to prevent being boarded. Parties were regularly
stationed
to defend the Madison, and, in the days, we worked
at her rigging, and at that of the Pike, in gangs. Our
larboard
guns were landed, and placed in a block-house, while
the starboard were kept mounted. My station was that of
captain of one of the guns that remained.
The winter lasted more than four months, and we made
good times of it. We often went after wood, and
occasionally
we knocked over a deer. We had a target out on the
lake, and this we practised on, making ourselves rather
expert cannoneers. Now and then they rowsed us out on a
false alarm, but I know of no serious attempt's being made
by the enemy, to molest us.
The lake was fit to navigate about the middle of April.
Somewhere about the 20th
[6]
[6]
22d.
Editor
.
the soldiers began to embark,
to the number of 1700 men. A company came on board
the Scourge, and they filled us chock-a-block. It came on
to blow, and we were obliged to keep these poor fellows,
cramped as we were, most of the time on deck, exposed to
rain and storm. On the 25th we got out, rather a showy
force altogether, though there was not much service in our
small craft. We had a ship, a brig, and twelve schooners,
fourteen sail in all. The next morning we were off Little
York, having sailed with a fair wind. All hands anchored
about a mile from the beach. I volunteered to go in a boat,
to carry soldiers ashore. Each of us brought across the
lake two of these boats in tow, but we had lost one of ours,
dragging her after us in a staggering breeze. I got into
the one that was left, and we put half our soldiers in her,
and shoved off. We had little or no order in landing, each
boat pulling as hard as she could. The English blazed
away at us, concealed in a wood, and our men fired back
again from the boat. I never was more disappointed in
men, than I was in the soldiers. They were mostly tall,
pale-looking Yankees, half dead with sickness and the bad
weatherso mealy, indeed, that half of them could not take
their grog, which, by this time, I had got to think a bad
sign. As soon as they got near the enemy, however, they
became wide awake, pointed out to each other where to aim,
and many of them actually jumped into the water, in order
to get the sooner ashore. No men could have behaved
better
,
for I confess frankly I did not like the work at all. It
is no fun to pull in under a sharp fire, with one's back to
his enemy, and nothing but an oar to amuse himself with.
The shot flew pretty thick, and two of our oars were split.
This was all done with musketry, no heavy guns being used
at this place. I landed twice in this way, but the danger
was principally in the first affair. There was fighting up
on the bank, but it gave us no trouble. Mr. Livingston
commanded the boat.
When we got back to the schooner, we found her lifting
her anchors. Several of the smaller craft were now ordered
up the bay, to open on the batteries nearer to the town. We
were the third from the van, and we all anchored within
canister range. We heard a magazine blow up, as we stood
in, and this brought three cheers from us. We now had
some sharp work with the batteries, keeping up a steady fire.
The schooner ahead of us had to cut, and she shifted her
berth outside of us. The leading schooner, however, held
on. In the midst of it all, we heard cheers down the line,
and presently we saw the commodore pulling in among us,
in his gig. He came on board us, and we greeted him with
three cheers. While he was on the quarter-deck, a hot shot
struck the upper part of the after-port, cut all the
boarding-pikes
adrift from the main-boom, and wounded a man named
Lemuel Bryant, who leaped from his quarters and fell at my
feet. His clothes were all on fire when he fell, and, after
putting them out, the commodore himself ordered me to pass
him below. The old man spoke encouragingly to us, and a
little thing took place that drew his attention to my crew.
Two of the trucks of the gun we were fighting had been
carried away, and I determined to shift over its opposite.
My crew were five negroes, strapping fellows, and as strong
as jackasses. The gun was called the Black Joke. Shoving
the disabled gun out of the way, these chaps crossed the
deck, unhooked the breechings and gun-tackles, raised the
piece from the deck, and placed it in the vacant port. The
commodore commended us, and called out, that is quick
work, my lads! In less than three minutes, I am certain,
we were playing on the enemy with the fresh gun.
As for the old man, he pulled through the fire as coolly
as if it were only a snow-balling scrape, though many a poor
fellow lost the number of his mess in the boats that day.
When he left us, we cheered him again. He had not left
us long, before we heard an awful explosion on shore. Stones
as big as my two fists fell on board of us, though nobody
was hurt by them. We cheered, thinking some dire
calamity
5 *
had befallen the enemy. The firing ceased soon after
this explosion, though one English gun held on, under the
bank, for some little time.
CHAPTER V.
We
did not know the cause of the last explosion, until
after the firing ceased. I had seen an awful black cloud,
and objects in the air that I took for men; but little did we
imagine the explosion had cost us so dear. Our schooner
lay at no great distance from the common landing, and no
sooner were we certain of the success of the day, than Mr.
Osgood ordered his boat's crew called away, and he landed.
As I belonged to the boat, I had an early opportunity of
entering the town.
We found the place deserted. With the exception of our
own men, I found but one living being in it. This was an
old woman whom I discovered stowed away in a potatoe
locker, in the government house. I saw tables set, and
eggs in the cups, but no inhabitant. Our orders were of
the most severe kind, not to plunder, and we did not touch
a morsel of food even. The liquor, however, was too much
for our poor natures, and a parcel of us had broke bulk in
a better sort of grocery, when some officers came in and
stove the casks. I made sail, and got out of the company.
The army had gone in pursuit of the enemy, with the
exception
of a few riflemen, who, being now at liberty, found
their way into the place.
I ought to feel ashamed, and do feel ashamed of what
occurred that night; but I must relate it, lest I feel more
ashamed for concealing the truth. We had spliced the
main-brace pretty freely throughout the day, and the pull I
got in the grocery just made me ripe for mischief. When
we got aboard the schooner again, we found a canoe that
had drifted athwart-hawse and had been secured. My
gun's crew, the Black Jokers, wished to have some fun in
the town, and they proposed to me to take a cruise ashore.
We had few officers on board, and the boatswain, a
boatswain's
mate in fact, consented to let us leave. We all
went ashore in this canoe, then, and were soon alongside
of a wharf. On landing, we were near a large store,
and looking in at a window, we saw a man sitting asleep,
with a gun in the hollow of his arm. His head was on the
counter, and there was a lamp burning. One of the blacks
pitched through the window, and was on him in a moment.
The rest followed, and we made him a prisoner. The poor
fellow said he had come to look after his property, and he
was told no one would hurt him. My blacks now began to
look about them, and to help themselves to such articles as
they thought they wanted. I confess I helped myself to
some tea and sugar, nor will I deny that I was in such a
state as to think the whole good fun. We carried off one
canoe load, and even returned for a second. Of course
such an exploit could not have been effected without letting
all in the secret share; and one boat-load of plunder was
not enough. The negroes began to drink, however, and I
was sober enough to see the consequences, if they were
left ashore any longer. Some riflemen came in, too, and I
succeeded in getting my jokers away.
The recklessness of sailors may be seen in our conduct.
All we received for our plunder was some eight or ten
gallons
of whiskey, when we got back to the harbour, and this
at the risk of being flogged through the fleet! It seemed to
us to be a scrape, and that was a sufficient excuse for
disobeying
orders, and for committing a crime. For myself, I
was influenced more by the love of mischief, and a weak
desire to have it said I was foremost in such an exploit, than
from any mercenary motive. Notwithstanding the severity
of the orders, and one or two pretty sharp examples of
punishment
inflicted by the commodore, the Black Jokers were
not the only plunderers ashore that night. One
master's-mate
had the buttons taken off his coat, for stealing a feather
bed, besides being obliged to carry it back again. Of course
he was a shipped master's-mate.
I was ashore every day while the squadron remained in
the port. Our schooner never shifted her berth from the
last one she occupied in the battle, and that was pretty well
up the bay. I paid a visit to the gun that had troubled us
all so much, and which we could not silence, for it was
under a bank, near the landing-place. It was a long French
eighteen, and did better service, that day, than any other
piece of John Bull's. I think it hulled us several times.
I walked over the ground where the explosion took place.
It was a dreadful sight; the dead being so mutilated that it
was scarcely possible to tell their colour. I saw gun-barrels
bent nearly double. I think we saw Sir Roger Sheafe, the
British General, galloping across the field, by himself, a few
minutes before the explosion. At all events, we saw a
mounted officer, and fired at him. He galloped up to the
government-house, dismounted, went in, remained a short
time, and then galloped out of town. All this I saw; and
the old woman in the potato-locker told me the general had
been in the house a short time before we landed. Her account
agreed with the appearance of the officer I saw; though I
will not pretend to be certain it was General Sheafe.
I ought to mention the kindness of the commodore to the
poor of York. As most of the inhabitants came back to
their habitations the next day, the poor were suffering for
food. Our men were ordered to roll barrels of salt meat
and barrels of bread to their doors, from the government
stores that fell into our hands. We captured an immense
amount of these stores, a portion of which we carried away.
We sunk many guns in the lake; and as for the powder,
that
had taken care of itself. Among other things we took,
was the body of an English officer, preserved in rum, which,
they said, was General Brock's. I saw it hoisted out of the
Duke of Gloucester, the man-of-war brig we captured, at
Sackett's Harbour, and saw the body put in a fresh cask. I
am ashamed to say, that some of our men were inclined to
drink the old rum.
We burned a large corvette, that was nearly ready for
launching, and otherwise did the enemy a good deal of
harm. The inhabitants that returned were very submissive,
and thankful for what they received. As for the man of
the red store, I never saw him after the night he was
plundered
,
nor was anything ever said of the scrape.
Our troops had lost near three hundred men in the attack,
the wounded included; and as a great many of these green
soldiers were now sick from exposure, the army was much
reduced in force. We took the troops on board on the 1st
of May, but could not sail, on account of a gale, until the
8th, which made the matter worse. Then we got under
way, and crossed the lake, landing the soldiers a few miles
to the eastward of Fort Niagara. Our schooner now went
to the Harbour, along with the commodore, though some of
the craft remained near the head of the lake. Here we took
in another lot of soldiers, placed two more large batteaux in
tow, and sailed for the army again. We had good passages
both ways, and this duty was done within a few days. While
at the Harbour, I got a message to go and visit Bill Swett,
but the poor fellow died without my being able to see him.
I heard he was hurt at York, but never could come at the
truth.
On the 27th May, the army got into the batteaux, formed
in two divisions, and commenced pulling towards the mouth
of the Niagara. The morning was foggy, with a light wind,
and the vessels getting under way, kept company with the
boats, a little outside of them. The schooners were closest
in, and some of them opened on Fort George, while others
kept along the coast, scouring the shore with grape and
canister
as they moved ahead. The Scourge came to an
anchor
a short distance above the place selected for the landing,
and sprung her broadside to the shore. We now kept up a
steady fire with grape and canister, until the boats had got
in-shore and were engaged with the enemy, when we threw
round-shot, over the heads of our own men, upon the
English
.
As soon as Colonel Scott was ashore, we sprung our
broadside upon a two-gun battery that had been pretty busy,
and we silenced that among us. This affair, for our craft,
was nothing like that of York, though I was told the vessels
nearer the river had warmer berths of it. We had no one
hurt, though we were hulled once or twice. A little rigging
was cut; but we set this down as light work compared to
what the old Black Joke had seen that day month. There
was a little sharp fighting ashore, but our men were too
strong for the enemy, when they could fairly get their feet
on solid ground.
Just after we had anchored, Mr. Bogardus was sent aloft
to ascertain if any enemy were to be seen. At first he found
nobody; but, after a little while, he called out to have my
gun fired at a little thicket of brushwood that lay on an
inclined
plain, near the water. Mr. Osgood came and
elevated
the gun, and I touched it off. We had been looking
out for the blink of muskets, which was one certain guide to
find a soldier; and the moment we sent this grist of grape
and canister into those bushes, the place lighted up as if a
thousand muskets were there. We then gave the chaps the
remainder of our broadside. We peppered that wood well,
and did a good deal of harm to the troops stationed at the
place.
The wind blew on shore, and began to increase; and the
commodore now threw out a signal for the boats to land, to
take care of the batteaux that were thumping on the beach,
and then for their crews to assist in taking care of the
wounded. Of course I went in my own boat, Mr. Bogardus
having charge of her. We left the schooner, just as we
quitted our guns, black with powder, in our shirts and
trowsers
,
though we took the precaution to carry our
boarding-belts
,
with a brace of pistols each, and a cutlass. On
landing
,
we first hauled up the boats, taking some dead and
wounded men out of them, and laying them on the beach.
We were now ordered to divide ourselves into groups of
three, and go over the ground, pick up the wounded, and
carry them to a large house that had been selected as a
hospital
.
My party consisted of Bill Southard, Simeon Grant,
and myself, we being messmates. The first man we fell in
with, was a young English soldier, who was seated on the
bank, quite near the lake. He was badly hurt, and sat
leaning his head on his hands. He begged for water, and
I took his cap down to the lake and filled it, giving him a
drink; then washing his face. This revived him, and he
offered us his canteen, in which was some excellent Jamaica.
To us chaps, who got nothing better than whiskey, this was
a rare treat, and we emptied the remainder of his half pint,
at a pull a-piece. After tapping this rum, we carried the
poor lad up to the house, and turned him over to the doctors.
We found the rooms filled with wounded already, and the
American and English doctors hard at work on them.
As we left the hospital, we agreed to get a canteen a-piece,
and go round among the dead, and fill them with Jamaica.
When our canteens were about a third full, we came upon a
young American rifleman, who was lying under an
apple-tree
.
He was hit in the head, and was in a very bad way.
We were all three much struck with the appearance of this
young man, and I now remember him as one of the
handsomest
youths I had ever seen. His wound did not bleed,
though I thought the brains were oozing out, and I felt so
much sympathy for him, that I washed his hurt with the
rum. I fear I did him harm, but my motive was good. Bill
Southard ran to find a surgeon, of whom several were
operating out on the field. The young man kept saying
no use, and he mentioned father and mother,
Vermont
.
He even gave me the names of his parents, but I
was too much in the wind, from the use of rum, to
remember
them. We might have been half an hour with this
young rifleman, busy on him most of the time, when he
murmured a few words, gave me one of the sweetest smiles
I ever saw on a man's face, and made no more signs of life.
I kept at work, notwithstanding, until Bill got back with the
doctor. The latter cast an eye on the rifleman, pronounced
him dead, and coolly walked away.
There was a bridge, in a sort of a swamp, that we had
fired on for some time, and we now moved down to it, just
to see what we had done. We found a good many dead,
and several horses in the mire, but no wounded. We kept
emptying canteens, as we went along, until our own would
hold no more. On our return from the bridge, we went to
a brook in order to mix some grog, and then we got a full
view of the offing. Not a craft was to be seen!
Everything
had weighed and disappeared. This discovery knocked
us all a-back, and we were quite at a loss how to
proceed
.
We agreed, however, to pass through a bit of woods,
and get into the town, it being now quite late in the day.
There we knew we should find the army, and might get
tidings of the fleet. The battle-ground was now nearly
deserted
,
and to own the truth we were, all three, at least two
sheets in the wind. Still I remember everything, for my
stomach would never allow me to get beastly drunk; it
rejecting
any very great quantity of liquor. As we went
through the wood, open pine trees, we came across an
officer
lying dead, with one leg over his horse, which was dead
also. I went up to the body, turned it over, and examined
it for a canteen, but found none. We made a few idle
remarks
,
and proceeded.
In quitting the place, I led the party; and, as we went
through a little thicket, I heard female voices. This startled
me a little; and, on looking round, I saw a white female
dress, belonging to a person who was evidently
endeavouring
to conceal herself from us. I was now alone, and walked
up to the women, when I found two; one, a lady, in dress
and manner, and the other a person that I have always
supposed
was her servant. The first was in white; the last in
a dark calico. They were both under thirty, judging from
their looks; and the lady was exceedingly well-looking.
They were much alarmed; and, as I came up, the lady
asked me if I would hurt her. I told her no; and that no
person should harm her, while she remained with us. This
relieved her, and she was able to give an account of her
errand on the field of battle. Our looks, half intoxicated,
and begrimed with the smoke of a battle, as we were,
certainly were enough to alarm her; but I do not think one
of the three would have hesitated about fighting for a female,
that they thus found weeping, in this manner, in the open
field. The maid was crying also. Simeon Grant, and
Southard, did make use of some improper language, at first;
but I brought them up, and they said they were sorry, and
would go all lengths, with me, to protect the women. The
fact was, these men supposed we had fallen in with common
camp followers; but I had seen too much of officers' wives,
in my boyhood, not to know that this was one.
The lady then told her story. She had just come from
Kingston, to join her husband; having arrived but a few
hours before. She did not see her husband, but she had
heard he was left wounded on the field; and she had come
out in the hope of finding him. She then described him, as
an officer mounted, with a particular dress, and inquired if
we had met with any such person, on the field. We told
her of the horseman we had just left; and led her back to
the spot. The moment the lady saw the body, she threw
herself on it, and began to weep and mourn over it, in a very
touching manner. The maid, too, was almost as bad as
the mistress. We were all so much affected, in spite of the
rum, that, I believe, all three of us shed tears. We said all
we could, to console her, and swore we would stand by her,
until she was safe back among her friends.
It was a good bit before we could persuade the lady to
quit her husband's body. She took a miniature from his
neck, and I drew his purse and watch from him and handed
them to her. She wanted me to keep the purse, but this we
all three refused, up and down. We had hauled our manly
tacks aboard, and had no thoughts of plunder. Even the
maid urged us to keep the money, but we would have
nothing
to do with it. I shall freely own my faults; I hope I
shall be believed when I relate facts that show I am not
altogether without proper feelings.
The officer had been hit somewhere about the hip, and
the horse must have been killed by another grape-shot, fired
from the same gun. We laid the body of the first over in
such a manner as to get a good look at him, but we did not
draw the leg from under the horse.
[7]
[7]
When Myers related this circumstance, I remembered that a
Lieutenant-Colonel
Meyers had been killed in the affair at Fort George,
something in the way here mentioned. On consulting the American
official account, I found that my recollection was just, so far as this
a Lieutenant-Colonel Meyers was reported as wounded and taken
prisoner. I then recollected to have been present at a conversation
between Major-General Lewis and Major Baker, his adjutant-general,
shortly after the battle, in which the question arose whether the same
shot had killed Colonel Meyers that killed his horse. General Lewis
thought not; Major Baker thought it had. On my referring to the
official account as reporting this gentleman to have been only
wounded
,
I was told it was a mistake, he having been
killed
. Now for the
probabilities. Both Ned and his sister understand that their father
was slain in battle, about this time. Ned thought this occurred at
Waterloo, but the sister thinks not. Neither knew anything of the
object of my inquiry. The sister says letters were received from
Quebee
in relation to the father's personal effects. It would be a strange
thing, if Ned had actually found his own father's body on the field,
in this extraordinary manner! I pretend not to say it is so; but it
must be allowed it looks very much like it. The lady may have been
a wife, married between the years 1796 and 1813, when Mr. Meyers
had got higher rank. This occurrence was related by Ned without
the slightest notion of the inference that I have here drawn.
Editor
.
When we succeeded in persuading the lady to quit her
husband's body, we shaped our course for the light-house.
Glad were we three tars to see the mast-heads of the
shipping
6
in the river, as we came near the banks of the Niagara.
The house at the light was empty; but, on my hailing, a
woman's
voice answered from the cellar. It was an old
woman
who had taken shelter from shot down in the hold, the
rest of the family having slipped and run. We now got
some milk for the lady, who continued in tears most of the
time. Sometimes she would knock off crying for a bit,
when she seemed to have some distrust of us; but, on the
whole, we made very good weather in company. After
staying about half an hour at the light-house, we left it for
the town, my advice to the lady being to put herself under
the protection of some of our officers. I told her if the
news of what had happened reached the commodore, she
might depend on her husband's being buried with the honours
of war, and said such other things to comfort her as came
to the mind of a man who had been sailing so near the
wind.
I forgot to relate one part of the adventure. Before we
had got fairly clear of the woods, we fell in with four of
Forsyth's men, notoriously the wickedest corps in the army.
These fellows began to crack their jokes at the expense of
the two females, and we came near having a brush with
them. When we spoke of our pistols, and of our
determination
to use them, before we would let our convoy come
to harm, these chaps laughed at our pop-guns, and told us
they had such things as `rifles.' This was true enough,
and had we come to broadsides, I make no doubt they
would have knocked us over like so many snipes. I began
to reason with them, on the impropriety of offending
respectable
females; and one of the fellows, who was a kind of
a corporal, or something of that sort, shook my hand, said
I was right, and offered to be friends. So we spliced the
main-brace, and parted. Glad enough was the lady to be
rid of them so easily. In these squalls she would bring up
in her tears, and then when all went smooth again, she
would break out afresh.
After quitting the light, we made the best of our way for
the town. Just as we reached it, we fell in with a party of
soldier-officers, and we turned the lady and her woman over
to their care. These gentlemen said a good word in our
favour, and here we parted company with our convoy, I
never hearing, or seeing, anything of either afterwards.
By this time it was near dark, and Bill Southard and I
began to look out for the Scourge. She was anchored in
the river, with the rest of the fleet, and we went down upon
a wharf to make a signal for a boat. On the way we saw
a woman crying before a watch-maker's shop, and a party
of Forsyth's close by. On enquiry, we learned these
fellows
had threatened to rob her shop. We had been such
defenders of the sex, that we could not think of deserting
this woman, and we swore we would stand by her, too.
We should have had a skirmish here, I do believe, had not
one or two rifle officers hove in sight, when the whole party
made sail from us. We turned the woman over to these
gentlemen, who said, ay, there are some of our vagabonds,
again. One of them said it would be better to call in their
parties, and before we reached the water we heard the
bugle
sounding the recall.
They had given us up on board the schooner. A report
of some Indians being out had reached her, and we three
were set down as scalped. Thank God, I've got all the
hair on my head yet, and battered as my old hulk has got
to be, and shattered as are my timbers, it is as black as a
raven's wing at this moment. This, my old ship-mate, who
is logging this yarn, says he thinks is a proof my mother
was a French Canadian, though such is not the fact, as it
has been told to me.
Those riflemen were regular scamps. Just before we
went down to the wharf, we saw one walking sentinel
before
the door of a sort of barracks. On drawing near and
asking what was going on inside, we were told we had
nothing
to do with their fun ashore, that we might look in at a
window, however, but should not go in. We took him at
his word; a merry scene it was inside. The English
officers'
dunnage had been broken into, and there was a party
of the corps strutting about in uniform coats and feathers.
We thought it best to give these dare-devils a berth, and so
we left them. One was never safe with them on the field
of battle, friend or enemy.
We met a large party of marines on the wharf, marching
up under Major Smith. They were going to protect the
people of the town from further mischief. Mr. Osgood was
glad enough to see us, and we got plenty of praise for what
we had done with the women. As for the canteens, we had
to empty them, after treating the crew of the boat that was
sent to take us off. I did not enter the town after that
night.
We lay some time in the Niagara, the commodore going
to the harbour to get the Pike ready. Captain Crane took
the rest of us off Kingston, where we were joined by the
commodore, and made sail again for the Niagara. Here
Colonel Scott embarked with a body of troops, and we went
to Burlington Bay to carry the heights. They were found
to be too strong; and the men, after landing, returned to the
vessels. We then went to York, again, and took possession
of the place a second time. Here we destroyed several
boats, and stores, set fire to the barracks, and did the enemy
a good deal of damage otherwise; after which we left the
place. Two or three days later we crossed the lake and
landed the soldiers, again, at Fort Niagara.
Early in August, while we were still in the river, Sir
James Yeo hove in sight with two ships, two brigs, and two
schooners. We had thirteen sail in all, such as they were,
and immediately got under way, and manuvred for the
weather-gauge. All the enemy's vessels had regular
quarters
,
and the ships were stout craft. Our squadron sailed
very unequally, some being pretty fast, and others as dull
as droggers. Nor were we more than half fitted out. On
board the Scourge the only square-sail we had, was made
out of an English marque we had laid our hands on at
York, the first time we were there. I ought to say, too,
that we got two small brass guns at York, four-pounders, I
believe, which Mr. Osgood clapped into our two spare ports
forward. This gave us ten guns in all, sixes and fours.
I remember that Jack Mallet laughed at us heartily for the
fuss we made with our pop-guns, as he called them, while
we were working upon the English batteries, saying we
might just as well have spared our powder, as for any good
we did. He belonged to the Julia, which had a long
thirty-two
,
forward, which they called the Old Sow, and one
smart eighteen aft. She had two sixes in her waist, also;
but
they
disdained to use
them
.
While we were up at the harbour, the last time, Mr. Mix,
who had married a sister of Mr. Osgood, took a party of us
in a boat, and we went up Black River, shooting. The two
gentlemen landed, and as we were coming down the river,
we saw something swimming, which proved to be a bear.
We had no arms, but we pulled over the beast, and had a
regular squaw-fight with him. We were an hour at work
with this animal, the fellow coming very near mastering us.
I struck at his nose with an iron tiller fifty times, but he
warded the blow like a boxer. He broke our boat-hook,
and once or twice, he came near boarding us. At length a
wood-boat gave us an axe, and with this we killed him.
Mr. Osgood had this bear skinned, and said he should send
the skin to his family. If he did, it must have been one of
the last memorials it ever got from him.
CHAPTER VI.
I left
the two fleets manuvring for the wind, in the
last chapter. About nine o'clock, the Pike got abeam of the
Wolfe, Sir James Yeo's own ship, hoisted her ensign, and
fired a few guns to try the range of her shot. The distance
was too great to engage. At this time our sternmost vessels
were two leagues off, and the commodore wore round, and
hauled up on the other tack. The enemy did the same;
but, perceiving that our leading ships were likely to weather
on him, he tacked, and hauled off to the northward. We
stood on in pursuit, tacking too; but the wind soon fell, and
about sunset it was quite calm.
Throughout the day, the Scourge had as much as she
could do to keep anywhere near her station. As for the old
Oneida, she could not be kept within a long distance of her
proper berth. We were sweeping, at odd times, for hours
that day. Towards evening, all the light craft were doing
the same, to close with the commodore. Our object was to
get together, lest the enemy should cut off some of our small
vessels during the night.
6 *
Before dark the whole line was formed again, with the
exception of the Oneida, which was still astern, towing.
She ought to have been near the commodore, but could not
get there. A little before sunset, Mr. Osgood ordered us to
pull in our sweeps, and to take a spell. It was a lovely
evening, not a cloud visible, and the lake being as smooth
as a looking-glass. The English fleet was but a short
distance
to the northward of us; so near, indeed, that we could
almost count their ports. They were becalmed, like
ourselves
,
and a little scattered.
We took in our sweeps as ordered, laying them athwart
the deck, in readiness to be used when wanted. The vessels
ahead and astern of us were, generally, within speaking
distance
.
Just as the sun went below the horizon, George
Turnblatt, a Swede, who was our gunner, came to me, and
said he thought we ought to secure our guns; for we had
been cleared for action all day, and the crew at quarters.
We were still at quarters, in name; but the petty officers
were allowed to move about, and as much license was given
to the people as was wanted. I answered that I would gladly
secure mine if he would get an order for it; but as we were
still at quarters, and there lay John Bull, we might get a
slap at him in the night. On this the gunner said he would
go aft, and speak to Mr. Osgood on the subject. He did so,
but met the captain (as we always called Mr. Osgood) at the
break of the quarter-deck. When George had told his
errand, the captain looked at the heavens, and remarked
that the night was so calm, there could be no great use in
securing the guns, and the English were so near we should
certainly engage, if there came a breeze; that the men
would sleep at their quarters, of course, and would be ready
to take care of their guns; but that he might catch a turn
with the side-tackle-falls around the pommelions of the guns,
which would be sufficient. He then ordered the boatswain
to call all hands aft, to the break of the quarter-deck.
As soon as the people had collected, Mr. Osgood said
You must be pretty well fagged out, men; I think we may
have a hard night's work, yet, and I wish you to get your
suppers, and then catch as much sleep as you can, at your
guns. He then ordered the purser's steward to splice the
main-brace. These were the last words I ever heard from
Mr. Osgood. As soon as he gave the order, he went below,
leaving the deck in charge of Mr. Bogardus. All our old
crew were on board but Mr. Livingston, who had left us,
and Simeon Grant, one of my companions in the cruise over
the battle-ground at Fort George. Grant had cut his hand
off, in a saw-mill, while we were last at the Harbour, and
had been left behind in the hospital. There was a pilot on
board, who used to keep a look-out occasionally, and
sometimes
the boatswain had the watch.
The schooner, at this time, was under her mainsail, jib,
and fore-top-sail. The foresail was brailed, and the foot
stopped, and the flying-jib was stowed. None of the
halyards
were racked, nor sheets stoppered. This was a
precaution
we always took, on account of the craft's being so
tender.
We first spliced the main-brace and then got our suppers,
eating between the guns, where we generally messed, indeed.
One of my messmates, Tom Goldsmith, was captain of the
gun next to me, and as we sat there finishing our suppers, I
says to him, Tom, bring up that rug that you pinned at
Little York, and that will do for both of us to stow
ourselves
away under. Tom went down and got the rug,
which was an article for the camp that he had laid hands
on, and it made us a capital bed-quilt. As all hands were
pretty well tired, we lay down, with our heads on
shot-boxes
,
and soon went to sleep.
In speaking of the canvass that was set, I ought to have
said something of the state of our decks. The guns had
the side-tackles fastened as I have mentioned. There was
a box of canister, and another of grape, at each gun,
besides
extra stands of both, under the shot-racks. There
was also one grummet of round-shot at every gun, besides
the racks being filled. Each gun's crew slept at the gun
and its opposite, thus dividing the people pretty equally on
both sides of the deck. Those who were stationed below,
slept below. I think it probable that, as the night grew
cool, as it always does on the fresh waters, some of the men
stole below to get warmer berths. This was easily done in
that craft, as we had but two regular officers on board, the
acting boatswain and gunner being little more than two of
ourselves.
I was soon asleep, as sound as if lying in the bed of a
king. How long my nap lasted, or what took place in the
interval, I cannot say. I awoke, however, in consequence
of large drops of rain falling on my face. Tom Goldsmith
awoke at the same moment. When I opened my eyes, it
was so dark I could not see the length of the deck. I arose
and spoke to Tom, telling him it was about to rain, and that
I meant to go down and get a nip, out of a little stuff we
kept in our mess-chest, and that I would bring up the bottle
if he wanted a taste. Tom answered, this is nothing;
we 're neither pepper nor salt. One of the black men
spoke, and asked me to bring up the bottle, and give him a
nip, too. All this took half a minute, perhaps. I now
remember
to have heard a strange rushing noise to windward
as I went towards the forward hatch, though it made no
impression on me at the time. We had been lying between
the starboard guns, which was the weather side of the
vessel
,
if there were any weather side to it, there not being a
breath of air, and no motion to the water, and I passed
round to the larboard side, in order to find the ladder, which
led up in that direction. The hatch was so small that two
men could not pass at a time, and I felt my way to it, in no
haste. One hand was on the bitts, and a foot was on the
ladder, when a flash of lightning almost blinded me. The
thunder came at the next instant, and with it a rushing of
winds that fairly smothered the clap.
The instant I was aware there was a squall, I sprang for
the jib-sheet. Being captain of the forecastle, I knew where
to find it, and throw it loose at a jerk. In doing this, I
jumped on a man named Leonard Lewis, and called on him
to lend me a hand. I next let fly the larboard, or lee
topsail-sheet
,
got hold of the clew-line, and, assisted by Lewis,
got the clew half up. All this time I kept shouting to the
man at the wheel to put his helm hard down. The water
was now up to my breast, and I knew the schooner must go
over. Lewis had not said a word, but I called out to him to
shift for himself, and belaying the clew-line, in hauling myself
forward of the foremast, I received a blow from the jib-sheet
that came near breaking my left arm. I did not feel the
effect of this blow at the time, though the arm has since
been operated on, to extract a tumour produced by this very
injury.
All this occupied less than a minute. The flashes of
lightning were incessant, and nearly blinded me. Our decks
seemed on fire, and yet I could see nothing. I heard no
hail, no order, no call; but the schooner was filled with
the shrieks and cries of the men to leeward, who were lying
jammed under the guns, shot-boxes, shot, and other heavy
things that had gone down as the vessel fell over. The
starboard second gun, from forward, had capsized, and come
down directly over the forward hatch, and I caught a glimpse
of a man struggling to get past it. Apprehension of this
gun had induced me to drag myself forward of the mast,
where I received the blow mentioned.
I succeeded in hauling myself up to windward, and in
getting into the schooner's fore-channels. Here I met
William
Deer, the boatswain, and a black boy of the name of
Philips, who was the powder-boy of our gun. Deer, she's
gone! I said. The boatswain made no answer, but walked
out on the fore-rigging, towards the mast-head. He
probably
had some vague notion that the schooner's masts would
be out of water if she went down, and took this course as
the safest. The boy was in the chains the last I saw of him.
I now crawled aft, on the upper side of the bulwarks,
amid a most awful and infernal din of thunder, and shrieks,
and dazzling flashes of lightning; the wind blowing all the
while like a tornado. When I reached the port of my own
gun, I put a foot in, thinking to step on the muzzle of the
piece; but it had gone to leeward with all the rest, and I
fell through the port, until I brought up with my arms. I
struggled up again, and continued working my way aft. As
I got abreast of the main-mast, I saw some one had let run
the halyards. I soon reached the beckets of the sweeps,
and found four in them. I could not swim a stroke, and it
crossed my mind to get one of the sweeps to keep me afloat.
In striving to jerk the becket clear, it parted, and the forward
ends of the four sweeps rolled down the schooner's side
into the water. This caused the other ends to slide, and all
the sweeps got away from me. I then crawled quite aft, as
far as the fashion-piece. The water was pouring down the
cabin companion-way like a sluice; and as I stood, for an
instant, on the fashion-piece, I saw Mr. Osgood, with his
head and part of his shoulders through one of the cabin
windows, struggling to get out. He must have been within
six feet of me. I saw him but a moment, by means of a
flash of lightning, and I think he must have seen me. At
the same time, there was a man visible on the end of the
main-boom, holding on by the clew of the sail. I do not
know who it was. This man probably saw me, and that I
was about to spring; for he called out, Don't jump
overboard
!don't
jump overboard! The schooner is righting.
I was not in a state of mind to reflect much on anything.
I do not think more than three or four minutes, if as many,
had passed since the squall struck us, and there I was
standing
on the vessel's quarter, led by Providence more than
by any discretion of my own. It now came across me that
if the schooner should right she was filled, and must go
down, and that she might carry me with her in the suction.
I made a spring, therefore, and fell into the water several
feet from the place where I had stood. It is my opinion the
schooner sunk as I left her. I went down some distance
myself, and when I came up to the surface, I began to swim
vigorously for the first time in my life. I think I swam
several yards, but of course will not pretend to be certain
of such a thing, at such a moment, until I felt my hand hit
something hard. I made another stroke, and felt my hand
pass down the side of an object that I knew at once was a
clincher-built boat. I belonged to this boat, and I now
recollected that she had been towing astern. Until that
instant I had not thought of her, but thus was I led in the
dark to the best possible means of saving my life. I made
a grab at the gunwale, and caught it in the stern-sheets.
Had I swum another yard, I should have passed the boat,
and missed her altogether! I got in without any difficulty,
being all alive and much excited.
My first look was for the schooner. She had disappeared,
and I supposed she was just settling under water. It rained
as if the flood-gates of heaven were opened, and it lightened
awfully. It did not seem to me that there was a breath of
air, and the water was unruffled, the effects of the rain
excepted
.
All this I saw, as it might be, at a glance. But
my chief concern was to preserve my own life. I was
cockswain of this very boat, and had made it fast to the
taffrail that same afternoon, with a round turn and two
half-hitches
,
by its best painter. Of course I expected the vessel
would drag the boat down with her, for I had no knife to
cut the painter. There was a gang-board in the boat,
however
,
which lay fore and aft, and I thought this might keep
me afloat until some of the fleet should pick me up. To
clear this gang-board, then, and get it into the water, was
my first object. I ran forward to throw off the lazy-painter
that was coiled on its end, and in doing this I caught the
boat's painter in my hand, by accident. A pull satisfied me
that it was all clear! Some one on board must have cast
off this painter, and then lost his chance of getting into the
boat by an accident. At all events, I was safe, and I now
dared to look about me.
My only chance of seeing, was during the flashes; and
these left me almost blind. I had thrown the gang-board
into the water, and I now called out to encourage the men,
telling them I was in the boat. I could hear many around
me, and, occasionally, I saw the heads of men, struggling
in the lake. There being no proper place to scull in, I got
an oar in the after rullock, and made out to scull a little, in
that fashion. I now saw a man quite near the boat; and,
hauling in the oar, made a spring amidships, catching this
poor fellow by the collar. He was very near gone; and I
had a great deal of difficulty in getting him in over the
gunwale
.
Our joint weight brought the boat down, so low, that
she shipped a good deal of water. This turned out to be
Leonard Lewis, the young man who had helped me to clew
up the fore-topsail. He could not stand, and spoke with
difficulty. I asked him to crawl aft, out of the water; which
he did, lying down in the stern-sheets.
I now looked about me, and heard another; leaning over
the gunwale, I got a glimpse of a man, struggling, quite
near the boat. I caught him by the collar, too; and had to
drag him in very much in the way I had done with Lewis.
This proved to be Lemuel Bryant, the man who had been
wounded by a hot shot, at York, as already mentioned,
while the commodore was on board us. His wound had not
yet healed, but he was less exhausted than Lewis. He could
not help me, however, lying down in the bottom of the boat,
the instant he was able.
For a few moments, I now heard no more in the water;
and I began to scull again. By my calculation, I moved a
few yards, and must have got over the spot where the
schooner went down. Here, in the flashes, I saw many
heads, the men swimming in confusion, and at random. By
this time, little was said, the whole scene being one of
fearful
struggling and frightful silence. It still rained; but the
flashes were less frequent, and less fierce. They told me,
afterwards, in the squadron, that it thundered awfully; but
I cannot say I heard a clap, after I struck the water. The
next man caught the boat himself. It was a mulatto, from
Martinique, who was Mr. Osgood's steward; and I helped
him in. He was much exhausted, though an excellent
swimmer; but alarm nearly deprived him of his strength.
He kept saying, Oh! Masser Ned  Oh! Masser Ned!
and lay down in the bottom of the boat, like the two others;
I taking care to shove him over to the larboard side, so as
to trim our small craft.
I kept calling out, to encourage the swimmers, and
presently
I heard a voice, saying, Ned, I'm here, close by
you. This was Tom Goldsmith, a messmate, and the very
man under whose rug I had been sleeping, at quarters. He
did not want much help, getting in, pretty much, by himself.
I asked him, if he were able to help me. Yes, Ned, he
answered, I 'll stand by you to the last; what shall I do? I
told him to take his tarpaulin, and to bail the boat, which,
by this time, was a third full of water. This he did, while
I sculled a little ahead. Ned, says Tom, she's gone
down with her colours flying, for her pennant came near
getting a round turn about my body, and carrying me down
with her. Davy has made a good haul, and he gave us a
close shave; but he didn't get you and me. In this manner
did this thoughtless sailor express himself, as soon as
rescued
from the grasp of death! Seeing something on the
water, I asked Tom to take my oar, while I sprang to the
gunwale, and caught Mr. Bogardus, the master's mate, who
was clinging to one of the sweeps. I hauled him in, and
he told me, he thought, some one had hold of the other end
of the sweep. It was so dark, however, we could not see
even that distance. I hauled the sweep along, until I found
Ebenezer Duffy, a mulatto, and the ship's cook. He could
not swim a stroke; and was nearly gone. I got him in,
alone, Tom bailing, lest the boat, which was quite small,
should swamp with us.
As the boat drifted along, she reached another man,
whom I caught also by the collar. I was afraid to haul
this person in amidships, the boat being now so deep, and
so small, and so I dragged him ahead, and hauled him in
over the bows. This was the pilot, whose name I never
knew. He was a lake-man, and had been aboard us the
whole summer. The poor fellow was almost gone, and like
all the rest, with the exception of Tom, he lay down and
said not a word.
We had now as many in the boat as it would carry, and
Tom and myself thought it would not do to take in any
more. It is true, we saw no more, everything around us
appearing still as death, the pattering of the rain excepted.
Tom began to bail again, and I commenced hallooing. I
sculled about several minutes, thinking of giving others a
tow, or of even hauling in one or two more, after we got
the water out of the boat; but we found no one else. I
think it probable I sculled away from the spot, as there was
nothing to guide me. I suppose, however, that by this time,
all the Scourges had gone down, for no more were ever
heard from.
Tom Goldsmith and myself now put our heads together
as to what was best to be done. We were both afraid of
falling into the enemy's hands, for, they might have bore
up in the squall, and run down near us. On the whole,
however, we thought the distance between the two
squadrons
was too great for this; at all events, something must
be done at once. So we began to row, in what direction
even we did not know. It still rained as hard as it could
pour, though there was not a breath of wind. The lightning
came now at considerable intervals, and the gust was
evidently
passing away towards the broader parts of the lake.
While we were rowing and talking about our chance of
falling in with the enemy, Tom cried out to me to avast
pulling. He had seen a vessel by a flash, and he thought
she was English, from her size. As he said she was a
7
schooner, however, I thought it must be one of our own
craft, and got her direction from him. At the next flash I
saw her, and felt satisfied she belonged to us. Before we
began to pull, however, we were hailed boat ahoy! I
answered. If you pull another stroke, I 'll fire into you
came backwhat boat's that? Lay on your oars, or I 'll
fire into you. It was clear we were mistaken ourselves
for an enemy, and I called out to know what schooner it
was. No answer was given, though the threat to fire was
repeated, if we pulled another stroke. I now turned to Tom
and said, I know that voice  that is old Trant. Tom
thought we were in the wrong shop. I now sung out,
This is the Scourge's boatour schooner has gone down,
and we want to come alongside. A voice next called from
the schoonerIs that you, Ned? This I knew was my
old ship-mate and school-fellow, Jack Mallet, who was
acting
as boatswain of the Julia, the schooner commanded by
sailing-master James Trant, one of the oddities of the
service
,
and a man with whom the blow often came as soon as
the word. I had known Mr. Trant's voice, and felt more
afraid he would fire into us, than I had done of anything
which had occurred that fearful night. Mr. Trant, himself,
now called out  Oh-ho; give way, boys, and come
alongside. This we did, and a very few strokes took us
up to the Julia, where we were received with the utmost
kindness. The men were passed out of the boat, while I
gave Mr. Trant an account of all that had happened. This
took but a minute or two.
Mr. Trant now inquired in what direction the Scourge
had gone down, and, as soon as I had told him, in the best
manner I could, he called out to Jack MalletOh-ho,
Mallet
take
four hands, and go in the boat and see what you
can dotake a lantern, and I will show a light on the
water's
edge, so you may know me. Mallet did as ordered,
and was off in less than three minutes after we got
alongside
.
Mr. Trant, who was much humoured, had no officer
in the Julia, unless Mallet could be called one. He was an
Irishman by birth, but had been in the American navy ever
since the revolution, dying a lieutenant, a few years after
this war. Perhaps no man in the navy was more generally
known, or excited more amusement by his oddities, or more
respect for his courage. He had come on the lake with the
commodore, with whom he was a great pet, and had been
active in all the fights and affairs that had yet taken place.
His religion was to hate an Englishman.
Mr. Trant now called the Scourges aft, and asked more
of the particulars. He then gave us a glass of grog all
round, and made his own crew splice the main-brace. The
Julias now offered us dry clothes. I got a change from
Jack Reilly, who had been an old messmate, and with whom
I had always been on good terms. It knocked off raining,
but we shifted ourselves at the galley fire below. I then
went on deck, and presently we heard the boat pulling back.
It soon came alongside, bringing in it four more men that
had been found floating about on sweeps and gratings. On
inquiry, it turned out that these men belonged to the
Hamilton
,
Lt. Wintera schooner that had gone down in the
same squall that carried us over. These men were very
much exhausted, too, and we all went below, and were told
to turn in.
I had been so much excited during the scenes through
which I had just passed, and had been so much stimulated
by grog, that, as yet, I had not felt much of the depression
natural to such events. I even slept soundly that night, nor
did I turn out until six the next morning.
When I got on deck, there was a fine breeze; it was a
lovely day, and the lake was perfectly smooth. Our fleet was
in a good line, in pretty close order, with the exception of
the Governor Tompkins, Lieutenant Tom Brown, which was
a little to leeward, but carrying a press of sail to close with
the commodore. Mr. Trant perceiving that the Tompkins
wished to speak us in passing, brailed his foresail and let
her luff up close under our lee. Two of the schooners,
the Hamilton and the Scourge, have gone down in the night,
called out Mr. Brown; for I have picked up four of the
Hamilton's. Oh-ho!answered Mr. TrantThat's
no news at all! for I have picked up
twelve;
eight of the
Scourge's, and four of the Hamilton'saft fore-sheet.
These were all that were ever saved from the two
schooners
,
which must have had near a hundred souls on board
them. The two commanders, Lieutenant Winter and Mr.
Osgood were both lost, and with Mr. Winter went down
I believe, one or two young gentlemen. The squadron
could not have moved much between the time when the
accidents happened and that when I came on deck, or we
must have come round and gone over the same ground
again, for we now passed many relics of the scene, floating
about in the water. I saw spunges, gratings, sweeps, hats,
&c., scattered about, and in passing ahead we saw one of
the latter that we tried to catch; Mr. Trant ordering it
done, as he said it must have been Lieutenant Winter's.
We did not succeed, however; nor was any article taken
on board. A good look-out was kept for men, from aloft,
but none were seen from any of the vessels. The lake had
swallowed up the rest of the two crews; and the Scourge,
as had been often predicted, had literally become a coffin to
a large portion of her people.
There was a good deal of manuvring between the two
fleets this day, and some efforts were made to engage; but,
to own the truth, I felt so melancholy about the loss of so
many ship-mates, that I did not take much notice of what
passed. All my Black Jokers were drowned, and nothing
remained of the craft and people with which and whom I
had been associated all summer. Bill Southard, too, was
among the lost, as indeed were all my messmates but Tom
Goldsmith and Lemuel Bryant. I had very serious and
proper impressions for the moment; but my new shipmates,
some of whom had been old shipmates in other crafts,
managed
to cheer me up with grog. The effect was not durable,
and in a short time I ceased to think of what had happened.
I have probably reflected more on the merciful manner in
which my life was spared, amid a scene so terrific, within
the last five years, than I did in the twenty-five that
immediately
followed the accidents.
The fleet went in, off the Niagara, and anchored. Mr.
Trant now mustered the remaining Scourges, and told us
he wanted just our number of hands, and that he meant to
get an order to keep us in the Julia. In the meantime, he
should station and quarter us. I was stationed at the braces,
and quartered at the long thirty-two as second loader. The
Julia mounted a long thirty-two, and an eighteen on pivots,
besides two sixes in the waist. The last were little used, as
I have already mentioned. She was a small, but a fast
schooner, and had about forty souls on board. She was
altogether a better craft than the Scourge, though destitute
of any quarters, but a low rail with wash-boards, and
carrying
fewer guns.
CHAPTER VII.
I NEVER knew what became of the four Hamiltons that
were picked up by the Julia's boat, though I suppose they
were put in some other vessel along with their shipmates;
nor did I ever learn the particulars of the loss of this schooner,
beyond the fact that her topsail-sheets were stoppered, and
her halyards racked. This much I learned from the men
who were brought on board the Julia, who said that their
craft was ready, in all respects, for action. Some seamen
have thought this wrong, and some right; but, in my
opinion, it made but little difference in such a gust as that
which passed over us. What was remarkable, the Julia,
which could not have been far from the Scourge when we
went over, felt no great matter of wind, just luffing up, and
shaking her sails, to be rid of it!
We lay only one night off the mouth of the Niagara.
The next morning the squadron weighed, and stood out in
pursuit of the English. The weather was very variable,
and we could not get within reach of Sir James all that
day. This was the 9th of August. The Scourge had gone
down on the night of the 7th, or the morning of the 8th, I
never knew which. On the morning of the 10th, however,
we were under the north shore, and to windward of John
Bull. The Commodore now took the Asp, and the Madison
the Fair American, in tow, and we all kept away, expecting
certainly a general action. But the wind shifted, bringing
the English to windward. The afternoon was calm; or
had variable airs. Towards sunset, the enemy was
becalmed
under the American shore, and we got a breeze
from the southward. We now closed, and at 6 formed our
line for engaging. We continued to close until 7, when
7 *
the wind came out fresh at S. W., putting John again to
windward.
I can hardly tell what followed, there was so much
manuvring
and shifting of berths. Both squadrons were
standing across the lake, the enemy being to windward, and
a little astern of us. We now passed within hail of the
commodore, who gave us orders to form a new line of
battle
,
which we did in the following manner. One line,
composed
of the smallest schooners, was formed to windward,
while the ships, brig, and two heaviest schooners, formed
another line to leeward. We had the weathermost line,
having the Growler, Lieutenant Deacon, for the vessel next
astern of us. This much I could see, though I did not
understand
the object. I now learn the plan was for the
weather line to engage the enemy, and then, by edging
away, draw them down upon the lee line, which line
contained
our principal force. According to the orders, we
ought to have rather edged off, as soon as the English
began to fire, in order to draw them down upon the
commodore
;
but it will be seen that our schooner pursued a very
different course.
It must have been near midnight, when the enemy began
to fire at the Fair American, the sternmost vessel of our
weather line. We were a long bit ahead of her, and did
not engage for some time. The firing became pretty smart
astern, but we stood on, without engaging, the enemy not
yet being far enough ahead for us. After a while, the four
sternmost schooners of our line kept off, according to orders,
but the Julia and Growler still stood on. I suppose the
English kept off, too, at the same time, as the commodore
had expected. At any rate, we found ourselves so well up
with the enemy, that, instead of bearing up, Mr. Trant
tacked in the Julia, and the Growler came round after us.
We now began to fire on the headmost ships of the enemy,
which were coming on towards us. We were able to lay
past the enemy on this tack, and fairly got to windward of
them. When we were a little on John Bull's weather bow,
we brailed the foresail, and gave him several rounds, within
a pretty fair distance. The enemy answered us, and, from
that moment, he seemed to give up all thoughts of the
vessels
to leeward of him, turning his whole attention on the
Julia and Growler.
The English fleet stood on the same tack, until it had got
between us and our own line, when it went about in chase
of us. We now began to make short tacks to windward;
the enemy separating so as to spread a wide clew, in order
that they might prevent our getting past, by turning their
line and running to leeward. As for keeping to windward,
we had no difficultyoccasionally brailing our foresail, and
even edging off, now and then, to be certain that our shot
would tell. In moderate weather, the Julia was the fastest
vessel in the American squadron, the Lady of the Lake
excepted; and the Growler was far from being dull. Had
there been room, I make no doubt we might have kept clear
of John Bull, with the greatest ease; touching him up with
our long, heavy guns, from time to time, as it suited us. I
have often thought that Mr. Trant forgot we were between
the enemy and the land, and that he fancied himself out at
sea. It was a hazy, moonlight morning, and we did not see
anything of the main, though it turned out to be nearer to
us than we wished.
All hands were now turning to windward; the two
schooners still edging off, occasionally, and firing. The
enemy's shot went far beyond us, and did us some mischief,
though nothing that was not immediately repaired. The
main throat-halyards, on board the Julia, were shot away,
as was the clew of the mainsail. It is probable the enemy
did not keep his luff, towards the last, on account of the land.
Our two schooners kept quite near each other, sometimes
one being to windward, sometimes the other. It happened
that the Growler was a short distance to windward of us,
when we first became aware of the nature of our critical
situation. She up helm, and, running down within hail,
Lieutenant Deacon informed Mr. Trant he had just sounded
in two fathoms, and that he could see lights ashore. He
thought there must be Indians, in great numbers, in this
vicinity, and that we must, at all events, avoid the land.
What do you think we had best do? asked Lieutenant
Deacon. Run the gauntlet, called out Mr. Trant. Very
well, sir: which shall lead? I'll lead the van, answered
Mr. Trant, and then all was settled.
We now up helm, and steered for a vacancy among the
British vessels. The enemy seemed to expect us, for they
formed in two lines, leaving us room to enter between them.
When we bore up, even in these critical circumstances, it
was under our mainsail, fore-top-sail, jib, flying-jib, and
foresail
.
So insufficient were the equipments of these small
craft, that we had neither square-sail nor studding-sails on
board us. I never saw a studding-sail in any of the
schooners
,
the Scourge excepted.
The Julia and Growler now ran down, the former
leading
,
half a cable's-length apart. When we entered between
the two lines of the enemy, we were within short
canisterrange
,
and got it smartly on both tacks. The two English
ships were to leeward, each leading a line; and we had a
brig, and three large, regular man-of-war schooners, to get
past, with the certainty of meeting the Wolfe and Royal
George, should we succeed in clearing these four craft. Both
of us kept up a heavy fire, swivelling our guns round, so as
not to neglect any one. As we drew near the ships,
however
,
we paid them the compliment of throwing all the heavy
shot at them, as was due to their rank and size.
For a few minutes we fared pretty well; but we were no
sooner well entered between the lines, than we got it, hot
and hard. Our rigging began to come down about our ears,
and one shot passed a few feet above our heads, cutting both
topsail-sheets, and scooping a bit of wood as big as a
thirty-two
pound shot, out of the foremast. I went up on one side,
myself, to knot one of these sheets, and, while aloft,
discovered
the injury that had been done to the spar. Soon after,
the tack of the mainsail caught fire, from a wad of one of
the Englishmen; for, by this time, we were close at it. I
think, indeed, that the nearness of the enemy alone
prevented
our decks from being entirely swept. The grape and
canister were passing just above our heads like hail, and the
foresail was literally in ribands. The halyards being gone,
the mainsail came down by the run, and the jib settled as
low as it could. The topsail-yard was on the cap, and the
schooner now came up into the wind.
All this time, we kept working the guns. The old man
went from one gun to the other, pointing each himself, as it
was ready. He was at the eighteen when things were
getting
near the worst, and, as he left her, he called out to her
crew to fill herfill her to the muzzle! He then came
to our gun, which was already loaded with one round, a
stand of grape, and a case of canister shot. This I know,
for I put them all in with my own hands. At this time, the
Melville, a brig of the enemy's, was close up with us, firing
upon our decks from her fore-top. She was coming up on
our larboard quarter, while a large schooner was nearing us
fast on the starboard. Mr. Trant directed our gun to be
elevated so as to sweep the brig's forecastle, and then he
called out, Now's the time, ladsfire at the bs! fire
away at 'em! But no match was to be found! Some one
had thrown both overboard. By this time the brig's
jib-boom
was over our quarter, and the English were actually
coming on board of us. The enemy were now all round us.
The Wolfe, herself, was within hail, and still firing. The
last I saw of any of our people, was Mallet passing forward,
and I sat down on the slide of the thirty-two, myself, sullen
as a bear. Two or three of the English passed me, without
saying anything. Even at this instant, a volley of bullets
came out of the brig's fore-top, and struck all around me;
some hitting the deck, and others the gun itself. Just then,
an English officer came up, and saidWhat are you doing
here, you Yankee? I felt exceedingly savage, and
answered
,
Looking at your fools firing upon their own men.
Take that for your sauce, he said, giving me a thrust
with his sword, as he spoke. The point of the cutlass just
passed my hip-bone, and gave me a smart flesh-wound. The
hurt was not dangerous, though it bled freely, and was some
weeks in healing. I now rose to go below, and heard a hail
from one of the shipsthe Wolfe, as I took her to be.
Have you struck? demanded some one. The officer who
had hurt me now called out, Don't fire into us, sir, for I'm
on board, and have got possession. The officer from the
ship next asked, Is there anybody alive on board her?
To which the prize-officer answered, I don't know, sir;
I've seen but one man, as yet.
I now went down below. First, I got a bandage on my
wound, to stop the bleeding, and then I had an opportunity
to look about me. A party of English was below, and
some of our men having joined them, the heads were knock
ed out of two barrels of whiskey. The kids and bread-bags
were procured, and all hands, without distinction of country,
sat down to enjoy themselves. Some even began to sing,
and, as for good-fellowship, it was just as marked, as it
would have been in a jollification ashore.
In a few minutes the officer who had hurt me jumped
down among us. The instant he saw what we were at, he
sang outHalloo! here's high life below stairs! Then
he called to another officer to bear a hand down and see the
fun. Some one sung out from among ourselves to dowse
the glim. The lights were put out, and then the two
officers
capsized the whiskey. While this was doing, most of
the Englishmen ran up the forward hatch. We Julias all
remained below.
In less than an hour we were sent on board the enemy's
vessels. I was carried to the Royal George, but Mr. Trant
was taken on board the Wolfe. The Growler had lost her
bowsprit, and was otherwise damaged, and had been forced
to strike also. She had a man killed, and I believe one or
two wounded.
[8]
[8]
It is supposed that Capt. Deacon died, a few years since, in
consequence
of an injury he received on board the Growler, this night.
A shot struck her main-boom, within a short distance of one of his
ears, and he ever after complained of its effects. At his death this
side of his head was much swollen and affected.
Editor
.
On board of us, not a man, besides myself,
had been touched! We seemed to have been preserved by
a miracle, for every one of the enemy had a slap at us, and,
for some time, we were within pistol-shot. Then we had
no quarters at all, being perfectly exposed to grape and
canister. The enemy must have fired too high, for nothing
else could have saved us.
In July, while I still belonged to the Scourge, I had been
sent with a boat's crew, under Mr. Bogardus, on board an
English flag of truce that had come into the Harbour.
While in this vessel, our boat's crew were
hail-fellows-well-met
with the Englishmen, and we had agreed among
us to take care of each other, should either side happen to
be taken. I had been on board the Royal George but a
short time, when two of these very men came up to me with
some grog and some grub; and next morning they brought
me my bitters. I saw no more of them, however, except
when they came to shake hands with us at the gang-way, as
we were leaving the ship.
After breakfast, next morning, we were all called aft to
the ward-room, one at a time. I was pumped as to the
force of the Americans, the names of the vessels, the
numbers
of the crews, and the names of the commanders. I
answered a little saucily, and was ordered out of the
ward-room
.
As I was quitting the place, I was called back by
one of the lieutenants, whose appearance I did not like from
the first. Although it was now eight years since I left
Halifax
,
and we had both so much altered, I took this gentleman
for Mr. Bowen, the very midshipman of the Cleopatra, who
had been my schoolmate, and whom I had known on board
the prize-brig I have mentioned.
This officer asked me where I was born. I told him New
York. He said he knew better, and asked my name. I
told him it was what he found it on the muster-roll, and that
by which I had been called. He said I knew better, and
that I should hear more of this, hereafter. If this were my
old schoolfellow, he knew that I was always called Edward
Robert Meyers, whereas I had dropped the middle name,
and now called myself Myers. He may not, however, have
been the person I took him for, and might have mistaken
me for some one else; for I never had an opportunity of
ascertaining any more about him.
We got into Little York, and were sent ashore that
evening
.
I can say nothing of our squadron, having been kept
below the whole time I was on board the Royal George. I
could not find out whether we did the enemy any harm, or
not, the night we were taken; though I remember that a
sixty-eight pound carronade, that stood near the gang-way
of the Royal George, was dismounted, the night I passed
into her. It looked to me as if the trucks were gone. This
I know, that the ship was more than usually screened off;
though for what reason I will not pretend to say.
At York, we were put in the gaol, where we were kept three
weeks. Our treatment was every way bad, with the
exception
that we were not crowded. As to food, we were kept
six upon four the whole time I was prisoner.
[9]
[9]
By this, Ned means six men had to subsist on the usual allow
ance of four men; a distinction that was made between men on duty
and men off. Prisoners, too, are commonly allowed to help themselves
in a variety of ways.
Editor
.
The bread
was bad, and the pork little better. While in this gaol, a
party of drunken Indians gave us a volley, in passing; but
luckily it did us no harm.
At the end of three weeks, we received a haversack
apiece, and two days' allowance. Our clothes were taken
from us, and the men were told they would get them below;
a thing that happened to very few of us, I believe. As for
myself, I was luckily without anything to lose; my effects
having gone down in the Scourge. All I had on earth was
a shirt and two handkerchiefs, and an old slouched hat, that
I had got in exchange for a Scotch cap that had been given
to me in the Julia. I was without shoes, and so continued
until I reached Halifax. All this gave me little concern;
my spirits being elastic, and my disposition gay. My great
trouble was the apprehension of being known, through the
recollections of the officer I have mentioned.
We now commenced our march for Kingston, under the
guard of a company of the Glengarians and a party of
Indians. The last kept on our flanks, and it was understood
they would shoot and scalp any man who left the ranks.
We marched two and two, being something like eighty
prisoners
.
It was hard work for the first day or two, the road
being nothing but an Indian trail, and our lodging-places
the open air. My feet became very sore, and, as for food,
we had to eat our pork raw, there being nothing to cook in.
The soldiers fared no better than ourselves, however, with
the exception of being on full allowance. It seems that our
provisions were sent by water, and left for us at particular
places; for every eight-and-forty hours we touched the lake
shore, and found them ready for us. They were left on the
beach without any guard, or any one near them. In this
way we picked up our supplies the whole distance.
At the dpt, Mr. Bogardus and the pilot found a boat,
and managed to get into her, and put out into the lake.
After being absent a day and night, they were driven in by
rough weather, and fell into the hands of a party of
dragoons
who were escorting Sir George Prevost along the lake
shore. We found them at a sort of tavern, where were the
English Governor and his escort at the time. They were
sent back among us, with two American army officers, who
had fallen into the hands of the Indians, and had been most
foully treated. One of these officers was wounded in the
arm.
The night of the day we fell in with Sir George Prevost,
we passed through a hamlet, and slept just without it. As
we entered the village the guard played Yankee Doodle,
winding up with the Rogue's March. As we went through
the place, I got leave to go to a house and ask for a drink
of milk. The woman of this house said they had been
expecting
us for two days, and that they had been saving their
milk expressly to give us. I got as much as I wanted, and
a small loaf of bread in the bargain, as did several others
with me. These people seemed to me to be all well affected
to the Americans, and much disposed to treat us kindly.
We slept on a barn floor that night.
We were much provoked at the insult of playing the
Rogue's March. Jack Reilly and I laid a plan to have our
revenge, should it be repeated. Two or three days later
we had the same tune, at another village, and I caught up
a couple of large stones, ran ahead, and dashed them through
both ends of the drum, before the boy, who was beating it,
knew what I was about. Jack snatched the fife out of the
other boy's hand, and it was passed from one to another
among us, until it reached one who threw it over the railing
of a bridge. After this, we had no more music, good or
bad. Not a word was said to any of us about this affair,
and I really think the officers were ashamed of themselves.
After a march of several days we came to a hamlet, not
a great distance from Kingston. I saw a good many geese
about, and took a fancy to have one for supper. I told
Mallet
if he would cook a goose, I would tip one over. The
matter was arranged between us, and picking up a club I
made a dash at a flock, and knocked a bird over. I caught
up the goose and ran, when my fellow-prisoners called out
to me to dodge, which I did, behind a stump, not knowing
from what quarter the danger might come. It was well I
did, for two Indians fired at me, one hitting the stump, and
the other ball passing just over my head. A militia officer
8
now gallopped up, and drove back the Indians who were
running up to me, to look after the scalp, I suppose. This
officer remonstrated with me, but spoke mildly and even
kindly. I told him I was hungry, and that I wanted a warm
mess. But you are committing a robbery, he said. If
I am, I 'm robbing an enemy. You do not know but it
may be a friend, was his significant answer. Well, if I
am,
he
'll not grudge me the goose, says I. On hearing
this, the officer laughed, and asked me how I meant to cook
the goose. I told him that one of my messmates had
promised
to do this for me. He then bade me carry the goose
into the ranks, and to come to him when we halted at night.
I did this, and he gave us a pan, some potatoes, onions, &c.,
out of which we made the only good mess we got on our
march. I may say this was the last hearty and really
palatable
meal I made until I reached Halifax, a period of
several
weeks.
While Jack Mallet was cooking the goose, I went in
behind
a pile of boards, attended by a soldier to watch me,
and, while there, I saw an ivory rule lying on the boards,
with fifteen pence alongside of it. These I pinned, as a
lawful prize, being in an enemy's country. The money
served to buy us some bread. The rule was bartered for
half a gallon of rum. This made us a merry night, taking
all things together.
We made no halt at Kingston, though the Indians left us.
We now marched through a settled country, with some
militia for our guards. Our treatment was much better than
it had been, the people of the country treating us kindly.
When we were abreast of the Thousand Islands, Mr.
Bogardus
and the pilot made another attempt to escape, and
got fairly off. These were the only two who did succeed.
How they effected it I cannot say, but I know they escaped.
I never saw either afterwards.
At the Long Sault, we were all put in boats, with a
Canadian
pilot in each end. The militia staid behind, and
down we went; they say at the rate of nine miles in fifteen
minutes. We found a new guard at the foot of the rapids.
This was done, beyond a doubt, to save us and themselves,
though we thought hard of it at the time, for it appeared to
us, as if they thrust us into a danger they did not like to
run themselves. I have since heard that even ladies
travelling
,
used to go down these formidable rapids in the same
way; and that, with skilful pilots, there is little or no
danger
.
When we reached Montreal we were confined in a gaol,
where we remained three weeks. There was an American
lady confined in this building, though she had more liberty
than we, and from her we received much aid. She sent us
soap, and she gave me bandages &c., for my hurt.
Occasionally
she gave us little things to eat. I never knew her
name, but heard she had two sons in the American army,
and that she had been detected in corresponding with them.
We remained at Montreal two or three weeks, and then
were sent down to Quebec, where we were put on board of
prison-ships. I was sent to the Lord Cathcart, and most
of the Julia's men with me. Our provisions were very bad,
and the mortality among us was great. The bread was
intolerably bad. Mr. Trant came to see us, privately, and
he brought some salt with him, which was a great relief to
us. Jack Mallet asked him whether some of us might not
go to work on board a transport, that lay just astern of us,
in order to get something better to eat. Mr. Trant said yes,
and eight of us went on board this craft, every day, getting
provisions and grog for our pay. At sunset, we returned
regularly to the Cathcart. I got a second shirt and a pair
of trowsers in this way.
About a fortnight after this arrangement, the Surprise,
32, and a sloop-of-war, came in, anchoring some distance
below the town. These ships sent their boats up to the
prison-ships to examine them for men. After going through
those vessels, they came on board the transport, and finding
us fresh, clean, fed and tolerably clad, they pronounced us
all Englishmen, and carried us on board the frigate. We
were not permitted even to go and take leave of our
shipmates
.
Of the eight men thus taken, five were native
Americans, one was from Mozambique, one I suppose to
have been an English subject born, but long settled in
America; and, as for me, the reader knows as much of my
origin as I know myself.
We were asked if we would go to duty on board the
Surprise
,
and we all refused. We were then put in close
confinement
,
on the berth-deck, under the charge of a sentry.
In a day or two, the ship sailed; and off Cape Breton we
met with a heavy gale, in which the people suffered severely
with snow and cold. The ship was kept off the land, with
great difficulty. After all, we prisoners saved the ship,
though I think it likely the injury originally came from
some of us. The breechings of two of the guns had been
cut, and the guns broke adrift in the height of the gale. All
the crew were on deck, and the sentinel permitting it, we
went up and smothered the guns with hammocks. We
were now allowed to go about deck, but this lasted a short
time, the whole of us being sent below, again, as soon as
the gale abated.
On reaching Halifax, we were all put on board of the
Regulus transport, bound to Bermuda. Here we eight were
thrown into irons, under the accusation of being British
subjects. At the end of twenty-four hours, however, the
captain came to us, and offered to let us out of irons, and
to give us ship's treatment, if we would help in working the
vessel to Bermuda. I have since thought we were ironed
merely to extort this arrangement from us. We consulted
together; and, thinking a chance might offer to get
possession
of the Regulus, which had only a few Canadians in
her, and was to be convoyed by the Pictou schooner, we
consented. We were now turned up to duty, and I got the
first pair of shoes that had been on my feet since the Scourge
sunk from under me.
The reader will imagine I had not been in the harbour
of Halifax, without a strong desire to ascertain something
about those I had left behind me, in that town. I was
nervously
afraid of being discovered, and yet had a feverish
wish to go ashore. The manner in which I gratified this
wish, and the consequences to which it led, will be seen in
the sequel.
CHAPTER VIII.
Jack Mallet
had long known my history. He was
my confidant, and entered into all my feelings. The night
we went to duty on board the transport, a boat was lying
alongside of the ship, and the weather being thick, it afforded
a good opportunity for gratifying my longing. Jack and
myself got in, after putting our heads together, and stole off
undetected. I pulled directly up to the wharf of Mr.
Marchinton
,
and at once found myself at home. I will not
pretend
to describe my sensations, but they were a strange
mixture of apprehension, disquiet, hope, and natural
attachment
.
I wished much to see my sister, but was afraid to
venture on that.
There was a family, however, of the name of Fraser, that
lived near the shore, with which I had been well acquainted,
and in whose members I had great confidence. They were
respectable in position, its head being called a judge, and
they were all intimate with the Marchintons. To the
Frasers
,
then, I went; Jack keeping me company. I was
afraid, if I knocked, the servant would not let me in,
appearing
,
as I did, in the dress of a common sailor; so I
opened the street-door without any ceremony, and went
directly to that of the parlour, which I entered before there
was time to stop me. Jack brought up in the entry.
Mrs. Fraser and her daughter were seated together, on a
settee, and the judge was reading at a table. My sudden
apparition astonished them, and all three gazed at me in
silence. Mr. Fraser then said, In the name of heaven,
where did you come from, Edward! I told him I had
been in the American service, but that I now belonged to an
English transport that was to sail in the morning, and that
I had just come ashore to inquire how all hands did;
particularly
my sister. He told me that my sister was living,
a married woman, in Halifax; that Mr. Marchinton was
dead, and had grieved very much at my disappearance;
that I was supposed to be dead. He then gave me much
advice as to my future course, and reminded me how much
I had lost by my early mistakes. He was particularly
8 *
anxious I should quit my adopted country, and wished me
to remain in Halifax. He offered to send a servant with
me to find my sister, but I was afraid to let my presence be
known to so many. I begged my visit might be kept a
secret, as I felt ashamed of being seen in so humble
circumstances
.
I was well treated, as was Jack Mallet, both of
us receiving wine and cake, &c. Mr. Fraser also gave me
a guinea, and as I went away, Mrs. Fraser slipped a pound
note into my hand. The latter said to me, in a whisper
I know what you are afraid of, but I shall tell Harriet of
your visit; she will be secret.
I staid about an hour, receiving every mark of kindness
from these excellent and respectable people, leaving them to
believe we were to sail in the morning. When we got
back to the transport no one knew of our absence, and
nothing
was ever said of our taking the boat. The Regulus
did not sail for twenty hours after this, but I had no more
communication with the shore. We got to sea, at last, two
transports, under the convoy of the Pictou.
During the whole passage, we eight prisoners kept a sharp
look-out for a chance to get possession of the ship. We
were closely watched, there being a lieutenant and his boat's
crew on board, besides the Canadians, the master, mate, &c.
All the arms were secreted, and nothing was left at hand,
that we could use in a rising.
About mid passage, it blowing fresh, with the ship under
double-reefed topsails, I was at the weather, with one of the
Canadians at the lee, wheel. Mallet was at work in the
larboard
,
or weather, mizen chains, ready to lend me a hand.
At this moment the Pictou came up under our lee, to speak
us in relation to carrying a light during the night. Her
masts swung so she could not carry one herself, and her
commander wished us to carry our top-light, he keeping near
it, instead of our keeping near him. The schooner came
very close to us, it blowing heavily, and Mallet called out,
Ned, now is your time. Up helm and into him. A couple
of seas will send him down. This was said loud enough
to be heard, though all on deck were attending to the
schooner; and, as for the Canadian, he did not understand
English. I managed to get the helm hard up, and Mallet
jumped inboard. The ship fell off fast; but the lieutenant,
who was on board as an agent, was standing in the
companion-way
with his wife, and, the instant he saw what I had
done, he ran aft, struck me a sharp blow, and put the helm
hard down with his own hands. This saved the Pictou,
though there was a great outcry on board her. The
lieutenant's
wife screamed, and there was a pretty uproar for a
minute, in every direction. As the Regulus luffed-to, her
jib-boom-end just cleared the Pictou's forward rigging, and
a man might almost have jumped from the ship to the
schooner, as we got alongside of each other. Another
minute
,
and we should have travelled over His Majesty's
schooner, like a rail-road car going over a squash.
The lieutenant now denounced us, and we prisoners were
all put in irons. I am merely relating facts. How far we
were right, I leave others to decide; but it must be
remembered
that Jack had, in that day, a mortal enmity to a British
man-of-war, which was a little too apt to lay hands on all
that she fell in with, on the high seas. Perhaps severe
moralists
might say that we had entered into a bargain with the
captain of the Regulus, not to make war on him during the
passage; in answer to which, we can reply that we were
not attacking
him
, but the Pictou. Our intention, it must
be confessed, however, was to seize the Regulus in the
confusion
.
Had we been better treated as prisoners, our
tempers
might not have been so savage. But we got no good
treatment, except for our own work; and, being hedged in
in this manner, common sailors reason very much as they
feel. We were not permitted to go at large again, in the
Regulus, in which the English were very right, as Jack
Mallet, in particular, was a man to put his shipmates up to
almost any enterprise.
The anchor was hardly down, at Bermuda, before a signal
was made to the Goliah, raze, for a boat, and we were sent
on board that ship. This was a cruising vessel, and she
went to sea next morning. We were distributed about the
ship, and ordered to go to work. The intention, evidently,
was to swallow us all in the enormous maw of the British
navy. We refused to do duty, however, to a man; most
of our fellows being pretty bold, as native Americans. We
were a fortnight in this situation, the greater part of the time
playing green, with our tin pots slung round our necks. We
did so much of this, that the people began to laugh at us, as
real Johnny Raws, though the old salts knew better. The
last even helped us along, some giving us clothes, extra grog,
and otherwise being very kind to us. The officers treated
us pretty well, too, all things considered. None of us got
flogged, nor were we even threatened with the gangway.
At length the plan was changed. The boatswain was asked
if he got anything out of us, and, making a bad report, we
were sent down to the lower gun-deck, under a sentry's
charge, and put at six upon four, again. Here we remained
until the ship went into Bermuda, after a six weeks' cruise.
This vessel, an old seventy-four cut down, did not answer,
for she was soon after sent to England. I overheard her
officers, from our berth near the bulkhead, wishing to fall in
with the President, Commodore Rodgersa vessel they
fancied
they could easily handle. I cannot say they could not,
but one day an elderly man among them spoke very
rationally
on the subject, saying, they
might
, or they might
not
,
get the best of it in such a fight. For his part, he did not
wish to see any such craft, with the miserable crew they had
in the Goliah.
We found the Ramilies, Sir Thomas Hardy, lying in
Bermuda roads. This ship sent a boat, which took us
on board the Ardent, 64, which was then used as a
prison-ship
.
About a week before we reached this vessel an
American midshipman got hold of a boat, and effected his
escape, actually making the passage between Bermuda and
Cape Henry all alone, by himself.
[10]
[10]
The name of this young officer was King. He is now dead,
having been lost in the Lynx, Lt. Madison.
Editor
.
In consequence of this
unusual occurrence, a bright look out was kept on all the
boats, thus defeating one of our plans, which was to get off
in the same way. When we reached the Ardent, we found
but four Americans in her. After we had been on board
her about a week, three men joined us, who had given
themselves up on board English men-of-war, as native
Americans. One of these men, whose name was Baily,
had been fourteen years in the English service, into which
he had been pressed, his protection having been torn up
before
his face. He was a Connecticut man, and had given
himself up at the commencement of the war, getting three
dozen for his pains. He was then sent on the Halifax
station
,
where he gave himself up again. He received three
dozen more, then had his shirt thrown over his back and
was sent to us. I saw the back and the shirt, myself, and
Baily said he would keep the last to be buried with him.
Bradbury and Patrick were served very much in the same
manner. I saw all their backs, and give the remainder of
the story, as they gave it to me. Baily and Bradbury got
off in season to join the Constitution, and to make the last
cruise in her during this war. I afterwards fell in with
Bradbury, who mentioned this circumstance to me.
It is good to have these things known, for I do believe the
English nation would be averse to men's receiving such
treatment, could they fairly be made to understand it. It
surely is bad enough to be compelled to fight the battles of
a foreign country, without being flogged for not fighting
them when they happen to be against one's own people. For
myself, I was born, of German parents, in the English
territory
,
it is true; but America was, and ever has been, the
country of my choice, and, while yet a child, I may say, I
decided for myself to sail under the American flag; and, if
my father had a right to make an Englishman of me, by
taking service under the English crown, I think I had a
right to make myself what I pleased, when he had left me
to get on as I could, without his counsel and advice.
After being about three weeks in the Ardent, we eight
prisoners were sent on board the Ramilies, to be tried as
Englishmen who had been fighting against their king. The
trial took place on board the Asia, 74, a flag-ship; but we
lived in the Ramilies, during the time the investigation was
going on. Sir Thomas Hardy held several conversations
with me, on the quarter-deck, in which he manifested great
kindness of feeling. He inquired whether I was really an
American; but I evaded any direct answer. I told him,
however, that I had been an apprentice, in New York, in
the employment of Jacob Barker; which was true, in one
sense, as Mr. Barker was the consignee of the Sterling, and
knew of my indentures. I mentioned him, as a person
more likely to be known than Captain Johnston. Sir
Thomas
said he had some knowledge of Mr. Barker; and, I
think, I have heard that they were, in some way, connected.
This was laying an anchor to-windward, as it turned out, in
the end.
We were all on board the Asia, for trial, or investigation,
two days, before I was sent for into the cabin. I was very
much frightened; and scarce knew what I said, or did. It is
a cruel thing to leave sailors without counsel, on such
occasions
;
though the officers behaved very kindly and
considerately
to me; and, I believe, to all of us. There were
several officers seated round a table; and all were in swabs.
They said, the gentleman who presided, was a Sir Borlase
Warren, the admiral on the station.
[11]
[11]
If this be true, this could hardly have been a court, but must have
been a mere investigation; as Sir John Borlase Warren was
commander-in-chief
,
and would scarcely sit in a court of his own
ordering
.
Editor
.
This gentleman,
whoever he was, probably saw that I was frightened. He
slewed himself round, in his chair, and said to me; My
man, you need not be alarmed; we know
who
you are, and
what
you are; but your apprenticeship will be of great
service
to you. This was not said, however, until Sir Thomas
Hardy had got out the story of my being an apprentice in
Jacob Barker's employ, again, before them all, in the cabin.
I was told to send for a copy of my indentures, by one of
the white-washed Swedes, that sailed between Bermuda and
New York. This I did, that very day. I was in the cabin
of the Asia, half an hour, perhaps; and I felt greatly relieved,
when I got out of it. It was decided, in my presence, to
send me back among the prisoners, on board the Ardent.
The same decision was made, as to the whole eight of us,
that had come on in the Regulus.
When we got back to the Ramilies, Sir Thomas Hardy
had some more conversation with me. I have thought, ever
since, that he knew something about my birth, and of my
being the prince's godson. He wished me to join the British
service, seemingly, very much, and encouraged me with the
hope of being promoted. But, it is due to myself, to say, I
held out against it all. I do not believe America had a
truer heart, in her service, than mine; and I do not think an
English commission would have bought me. I have nothing
to hope, from saying this, for I am now old, and a cripple;
but, as I have sat down to relate the truth, let the truth be
told, whether it tell for, or against me.
We were now sent back to the Ardent; where we
remained
three weeks, or a month, longer. During this time
we got our papers from New York; I receiving a copy of
my indentures, together with the sum of ten dollars; which
reached me through Sir Thomas Hardy, as I understood.
Nothing more was ever said, to any of the eight, about their
being Englishmen; the whole of us being treated as prisoners
of war. Prisoners arrived fast, until we had four hundred
in the Ardent. The old Ruby, a forty-four, on two decks,
was obliged to receive some of them. Most of these prisoners
were privateersmen; though there were a few soldiers, and
some citizens that had been picked up in Chesapeake Bay.
Before we left Bermuda, the crew of a French frigate was
put into the Ardent, to the number of near four hundred
men. In the whole, we must have had eight hundred souls,
and all on one deck. This was close stowage, and I was
heartily glad when I quitted the ship.
Soon after the French arrived, four hundred of us
Americans
were put on board transports, and we sailed for
Halifax
,
under the convoy of the Ramilies. A day or two after
we got out, we fell in with an American privateer, which
continued hovering around us for several days. As this
was a bold fellow, frequently coming within gun-shot, and
sporting his sticks and canvass in all sorts of ways, Sir
Thomas Hardy felt afraid he would get one of the four
transports, and he took all us prisoners into the Ramilies.
We staid in the ship the rest of the passage, and when we
went into Halifax it was all alone, the four transports
having
disappeared. Two of them subsequently got in; but I
think the other two were actually taken by that saucy
fellow.
The prisoners, at first, had great liberty allowed them, on
board the Ramilies. On all occasions, Sir Thomas Hardy
treated the Americans well. A party of marines was
stationed
on the poop, and another on the forecastle, and the
ship's people had arms; but this was all the precaution that
was used. The opportunity tempted some of our men to
plan a rising, with a view to seize the ship. Privateer
officers were at the head of this scheme, which was
communicated
to me, among others, soon after the plot was laid.
Most of the prisoners knew of the intention, and everybody
seemed to enter into the affair with hearty good-will. Our
design was to rise at the end of the second dog-watch,
overcome
the crew, and carry the ship upon our own coast. If
unable to pass the blockading squadrons, we intended to run
her ashore. The people of the Ramilies outnumbered us by
near one-half, and they had arms, it is true; but we trusted
to the effect of a surprise, and something to the disposition
of most English sailors to get quit of their own service.
Had the attempt been made, from what I saw of the crew,
I think our main trouble would have been with the officers
and the marines. We were prevented from trying the
experiment
,
however, in consequence of having been betrayed
by some one who was in the secret, the whole of us being
suddenly sent into the cable tiers and amongst the water
casks, under the vigilant care of sentinels posted in the
wings. After that, we were allowed to come on deck
singly
,
only, and then under a sentinel's charge. When Sir
Thomas spoke to us concerning this change of treatment,
he did not abuse us for our plan, but was mild and
reasonable
,
while he reminded us of the necessity of what he was
doing. I have no idea he would have been in the least
injured, had we got possession of the ship; for, to the last,
our people praised him, and the treatment they received,
while under his orders.
Before we were sent below, Sir Thomas spoke to me
again, on the subject of my joining the English service. He
was quite earnest about it, and reasoned with me like a
father; but I was determined not to yield. I did not like
England, and I did like America. My birth in Quebec was
a thing I could not help; but having chosen to serve under
the American flag, and having done so now for years, I did
not choose to go over to the enemy.
At Halifax, fifteen or twenty of us were sent on board the
old Centurion, 44, Lord Anson's ship, as retaliation-men.
We eight were of the number. We found something like
thirty more in the ship, all retaliation-men, like ourselves.
Those we found in the Centurion did not appear to me to
be foremast Jacks, but struck me as being citizens from
ashore. We were well treated, however, suffering no other
confinement than that of the ship. We were on six upon
four, it is true, like other prisoners, but our own country
gave us small stores, and extra bread and beef. In the way
of grub, we fared like sailor kings. At the end of three
weeks, we eight lakesmen were sent to Melville Island,
among the great herd of prisoners. I cannot explain the
reason of all these changes; but I know that when the gate
was shut on us, the turnkey said we had gone into a home
that would last as long as the war lasted.
Melville is an island of more than a mile in circumference,
with low, rocky shores. It lies about three miles from the
town of Halifax, but not in sight. It is connected with the
main by a bridge that is thrown across a narrow passage
of something like a quarter of a mile in width. In the
centre
of the island is an eminence, which was occupied by the
garrison, and had some artillery. This eminence
commanded
the whole island. Another post on the main, also,
commanded the prisoners' barracks. These barracks were
ordinary wooden buildings, enclosed on the side of the island
with a strong stone wall, and on the side of the post on the
main, by high, open palisades. Of course, a sufficient guard
was maintained.
It was said there were about twelve hundred Americans
on the island, when I passed the gate. Among them were
a few French, some of whom were a part of the crew of the
Ville de Milan, the ship that had been taken before I first
left Halifax; or more than eight years previously to this time.
This did, indeed, look like the place's being a home to a
poor fellow, and I did not relish the circumstance at all.
Among our people were soldiers, sailors, and
'long-shoremen
.
There was no difference in the treatment, which, for
a prison, was good. We got only six upon four from the
English, of course; but our own country made up the
difference
here, as on board the Centurion. They had a prison
dress, with one leg of the trowsers yellow and the other blue,
&c.; but we would not stand that. Our agent managed the
matter so that we got regular jackets and trowsers of the
true old colour. The poor Frenchmen looked like
peacocks
in their dress, but we did not envy them their finery.
I had been on the island about a fortnight, when I was
9
told by Jack Mallet that a woman, whom he thought to be
my sister, was at the gate. Jack knew my whole history,
and came to his opinion from a resemblance that he saw
between me and the person who had inquired for me. I
refused to go to the gate, however, to see who it was, and
Jack was sent back to tell the woman that I had been left
behind at Bermuda. He was directed to throw in a few
hints about the expediency of her not coming back to look
for me, and that it would be better if she never named me.
All this was done, I getting a berth from which I could see
the female. I knew her in a moment, although she was
married, and had a son with her, and my heart was very
near giving way, especially when I saw her shedding
tears. She went away from the gate, however, going up
on the ramparts, from which she could look down into the
prison-yard. There she remained an hour, as if she wished
to satisfy her own eyes as to the truth of Jack's story; but I
took good care to keep out of her sight.
As I knew there was little hope of an exchange of
prisoners
,
I now began to think of the means of making my
escape. Jack Mallet dared not attempt to swim, on
account
of the rheumatism and cramps, having narrowly
escaped
drowning at Bermuda, and he could not join in our
schemes. As for myself, I have been able to swim ever
since danger taught me the important lesson, the night the
Scourge went down. Money would be necessary to aid me
in escaping, and Jack and I put our heads together, in order
to raise some. I had still the ten dollars given me by Sir
Thomas Hardy, and I commenced operations by purchasing
shares in a dice-board, a
vingt et un
table, and a quino
table.
[12]
[12]
Ned means Loto, probably.
Editor
.
Jack Mallet and I, also, set up a shop, on a capital
of three dollars. We sold smoked herring, pipes, tobacco,
segars, spruce beer, and, as chances of smuggling it in
offered, now and then a little Jamaica. All this time, the
number of the prisoners increased, until, in the end, we got
to have a full prison, when they began to send them to Eng
land. Only one of the Julias was sent away, however, all
the rest remaining at Melville Island, from some cause I
cannot explain.
I cannot say we made money very fast. On every
shilling
won at dice, we received a penny; at
vingt et un
, the
commission was the same; as it was also at the other
games. New cards, however, brought a little higher rate.
All this was wrong I
now
know, but
then
it gave me very
little trouble. I hope I would not do the same thing over
again, even to make my escape from Melville Island, but
one never knows to what distress may drive him.
Some person among the American prisonersa soldier it
was said  commenced counterfeiting Spanish dollars. I
am afraid most of us helped to circulate them. We thought
it no harm to cheat the people of the canteens, for we knew
they were doing all they could to cheat us. This was
prison
morality, in war-time, and I say nothing in its favour;
though, for myself, I will own I felt more of the
consciousness
of wrong-doing in holding the shares in the gambling
establishments, than in giving bad dollars for poor rum.
The counterfeiting business was destroyed by one of the
dollars happening to break, as some of the officers were
pitching them; when, on examination, it turned out that
most of the money in the prison was bad. It was said the
people of the canteens had about four hundred of the dollars,
when they came to overhaul their lockers. A good many
found their way into Halifax.
My trade lasted all winter(that of 1813  14,) and by
March I had gained the sum of eighty French crowns.
Dollars I was afraid to hold on account of the base money.
The ice now began to give way, and a few of us, who had
been discussing the matter all winter, set about forming
serious
plans to escape. My confederates were a man of the
name of Johnson, who had been taken in the Snapdragon
privateer, and an Irishman of the name of Littlefield.
Barnet
,
the Mozambique man, joined us also, making four in all.
It was quite early in the month, when we made the attempt.
Our windows were long, and had perpendicular bars of
wrought iron to secure them, but no cross-bars. There was
no glass; but outside shutters, that we could open at our
pleasure. Outside of the windows were sentinels, and there
were two rows of pickets between us and the shore.
I put my crowns in a belt around my waist. Another
belt, or skin, was filled with rum, for the double purpose
of buoying me in the water, and of comforting me when
ashore. At that day, I found rum one of the great blessings
of life; now I look upon it as one of the greatest evils. My
companions made similar provisions of money and rum,
though neither was as rich as myself. I left Mallet and
Leonard Lewis my heirs at law if I escaped, and my
trustees
should I be caught. Lewis was a young man of better
origin than most in the prison, and I have always thought
some calamity drove him to the seas. He was in ill health,
and did not appear to be destined to a long life. He would
have joined us, heart and hand, but was not strong enough
to endure the fatigue which we well knew we must undergo,
before we could get clear.
The night selected for the attempt was so cold, dark, and
dismal, as to drive all the sentinels into their boxes. It
rained hard, in the bargain. About eight, or as soon as the
lights were out, we got the lanyards of our hammocks
around two of the window bars, and using a bit of fire-wood
for a heaver, we easily brought them together. This left
room for our bodies to pass out, without any difficulty. Jack
Mallet, and those we left behind, hove the bars straight
again, so that the keepers were at a loss to know how we
had got off. We met with no obstacle between the prison
and the water. The pickets we removed, having cut them
in the day-time. In a word, all four of us reached the shore
of the Island in two or three minutes after we had taken
leave of our messmates. The difficulty lay before us. We
entered into the water, at once, and began to swim. When
I was a few rods from the place of landing, which was quite
near the guard-house, on the main, Johnson began to sing
out that he was drowning. I told him to be quiet, but it was
of no use. The guard on the main heard him, and
commenced
firing, and of course we swam all the harder.
Three of us were soon ashore, and, knowing the roads well,
I led them in a direction to avoid the soldiers. By running
into the woods, we got clear, though poor Johnson fell again
into the hands of the enemy. He deserved it for bawling as
he did; it being the duty of a man in such circumstances to
die with a shut mouth.
CHAPTER IX.
The
three who had escaped ran, for a quarter of a mile,
in the woods, when we brought up, and took a drink.
Hearing
no more firing, or any further alarm, we now consulted
as to our future course. There were some mills at the head
of the bay, about four miles from the guard-house, and I led
the party thither. We reached the place towards morning, and
found a berth in them before any one was stirring. We hid
ourselves in an old granary; but no person appeared near
the place throughout the next day. We had put a little
bread and a few herrings in our hats, and on these we
subsisted
.
The rum cheered us up, and, if rum ever did good,
I think it was to us on that occasion. We slept soundly,
with one man on the look-out; a rule we observed the whole
time we were out. It stopped raining in the course of the
day, though the weather was bitter cold.
Next night we got under way, and walked in a direction
which led us within three miles of the town. In doing this,
we passed the Prince's Lodge, a place where I had often
been, and the sight of which reminded me of home, and of
my childish days. There was no use in regrets, however,
and we pushed ahead. The men saw my melancholy, and
they questioned me; but I evaded the answer, pretending
that nothing ailed me. There was a tavern about a league
from the town, kept by a man of the name of Grant, and
Littlefield ventured into it. He bought a small cheese and a
loaf of bread; getting off clear, though not unsuspected.
This helped us along famously, and we pushed on as fast as
we could. Before morning we came near a bridge, on which
there was a sentinel posted, with a guard-house near its end.
To avoid this danger, we turned the guard-house, striking
the river above the bridge. Here we met two Indians, and
fell into discourse with them. Our rum now served us a
better turn than ever, buying the Indians in a minute. We
told these chaps we were deserters from the Bulwark, 74,
and begged them to help us along. At first, they thought
we were Yankees, whom they evidently disliked, and that
9 *
right heartily; but the story of the desertion took, and made
them disposed to serve us.
These two Indians led us down to the bed of the river,
and actually carried us beneath the bridge, on the side of
the river next the guard, where we found a party of about
thirty of these red-skins, men, women and children. Here
we stayed no less than three days; faring extremely well,
having fish, bread, butter, and other common food. The
weather was very bad, and we did not like to turn out in it,
besides, thinking the search for us might be less keen after
a short delay. All this time, we were within a few rods of
the guard, hearing the sentinels cry all's well, from
half-hour
to half-hour. We were free with our rum, and, as
much as we dared to be, with our money. These people
never betrayed us.
The third night we left the bridge, guided by a young
Indian. He led us about two miles up the river, passing
through the Maroon town in the night, after which he left
us. We wished him to keep on with us for some distance
further, but he refused. He quitted us near morning, and
we turned into a deserted log-house, on the banks of the
river, where we passed the day. The country was thinly
populated, and the houses we saw were poor and mean.
We must now have been about five-and-twenty miles from
Halifax.
Our object was to cross the neck of land between the
Atlantic and the Bay of Fundy, and to get to Annapolis
Royal, where we expected to be able to procure a boat, by
fair means if we could, by stealth if necessary, and cross
over to the American shore. We had still a long road
before
us, and had some little difficulty to find the way. The
Indians, however, gave us directions that greatly assisted
us; and we travelled a long bit, and pretty fast all that
night. In the morning, the country had more the
appearance
of being peopled and cultivated, and I suspected we
were getting into the vicinity of Horton, a place through
which it would be indispensable to pass. The weather became
bad again, and it was necessary to make a halt. Coming
near a log-house, we sent Littlefield ahead to make some
inquiries of a woman who appeared to be in it alone. On
his return, he reported well of the woman. He had told
her we were deserters from the Bulwark, and had promised
to pay her if she would let us stay about her premises that
day, and get us something to eat. The woman had
consented
to our occupying an out-house, and had agreed to
buy the provisions. We now took possession of the
out-house
,
where the woman visited us, and getting some money,
she left us in quest of food. We were uneasy during her
absence, but she came back with some meat, eggs, bread,
and butter, at the end of an hour, and all seemed right. We
made two comfortable meals in this out-house, where we
remained until near evening. I had the look-out about noon,
and I saw a man hanging about the house, and took the
alarm. The man did not stay long, however, and I got a
nap as soon as he disappeared. About four we were all up,
and one of us taking a look, saw this same man, and two
others, go into the house. The woman had already told us
that a party of soldiers had gone ahead, in pursuit of three
Yankee runaways; that four had broken prison, but one
had been retaken, and the rest were still out. This left
little
doubt that she knew who we were; and we thought it
best to steal away, at once, lest the men in the house should
be consulting with her, at that very moment, about selling
us for the reward, which we know was always four pounds
ahead. The out-house was near the river, and there was a
good deal of brush growing along the banks, and we
succeeded
in getting away unseen.
We went down to the margin, under the bank, and
pursued
our way along the stream. Before it was dark we
came in sight of the bridge, for which we had been
travelling
ever since we left the other bridge, and were sorry to
see a sentry-box on it. We now halted for a council, and
came to a determination to wait until dark, and then
advance
.
This we did, getting under this bridge, as we had
done with the other. We had no Indians, however, to
comfort
and feed us.
I had known a good deal of this part of the country when
a boy, from the circumstance that Mr. Marchinton had a
large farm, near a place called Cornwallis, on the Bay,
where I had even spent whole summers with the family.
This bridge I recollected well; and I remembered there was
a ford a little on one side of it, when the tide was out. The
tides are tremendous in this part of the world, and we did
not dare to steal a boat here, lest we should be caught in one
of the bores, as they are called, when the tide came in. It
was now half ebb, and we resolved to wait, and try the
ford.
It was quite dark when we left the bridge, and we had a
delicate bit of work before us. The naked flats were very
wide, and we sallied out, with the bridge as our guide. I
was up to my middle in mud, at times, but the water was
not very deep. We must have been near an hour in the
mud, for we were not exactly on the proper ford, of course,
and made bad navigation of it in the dark. But we were
afraid to lose sight of the bridge, lest we should get all adrift.
At length we reached the firm ground, covered with mud
and chilled with cold. We found the road, and the village
of Horton, and skirted the last, until all was clear. Then
we took to the road, and carried sail hard all night.
Whenever
we saw any one, we hid ourselves, but we met few
while travelling. Next morning we walked until we came
to a deserted saw-mill, which I also remembered, and here
we halted for the day. No one troubled us, nor did I see
any one; but Littlefield said that a man drove a herd of
cattle past, during his watch on deck.
I told my companions that night, if they would be busy,
we might reach Cornwallis, where I should be at home. We
were pretty well fagged, and wanted rest, for Jack is no
great traveller ashore; and I promised the lads a good snug
berth at Mr. Marchinton's farm. We pushed ahead briskly,
in consequence, and I led the party up to the farm, just as
day was dawning. A Newfoundland dog, named Hunter,
met us with some ferocity; but, on my calling him by name,
he was pacified, and began to leap on me, and to caress me.
I have always thought that dog knew me, after an absence
of so many years. There was no time to waste with dogs,
however, and we took the way to the barn. We had wit
enough not to get on the hay, but to throw ourselves on a
mow filled with straw, as the first was probably in use.
Here we went to sleep, with one man on the look-out. This
was the warmest and most comfortable rest we had got since
quitting the island, from which we had now been absent
eight or nine days.
We remained one night and two days in this barn. The
workmen entered it often, and even stayed some time on the
barn-floor; but no one seemed to think of ascending our
mow. The dog kept much about the place, and I was greatly
afraid he would be the means of betraying us. Our
provisions
were getting low, and, the night we were at the farm,
I sallied out, accompanied by Barnet, and we made our way
into the dairy. Here we found a pan of bread, milk, cheese,
butter, eggs, and codfish. Of course, we took our fill of
milk; but Barnet got hold of a vessel of sour cream, and
came near hallooing out, when he had taken a good pull at
it. As we returned to the barn, the geese set up an outcry,
and glad enough was I to find myself safe on the mow again,
without being discovered. Next day, however, we overheard
the men in the barn speaking of the robbery, and
complaining
,
in particular, of the uselessness of the dog. I did not
know any of these persons, although a young man appeared
among them, this day, who I fancied had been a playfellow
of mine, when a boy. I could not trust him, or any one
else there; and all the advantage we got from the farm, was
through my knowledge of the localities, and of the habits of
the place.
I had never been further on the road between Halifax and
Annapolis, than to Cornwallis. The rest of the distance
was unknown to me, though I was familiar with the route
which went out of Cornwallis, and which was called the
Annapolis
road. It was a fine star-light evening, and we made
good headway. We all felt refreshed, and journeyed on full
stomachs. We did not meet a soul, though we travelled
through a well-settled country. The next morning we halted
in a wood, the weather being warm and pleasant. Here we
slept and rested as usual, and were off again at night.
Littlefield
pinned three fowls as we went along, declaring that
he intended to have a warm mess next day, and he got off
without discovery. About four o'clock in the morning, we
fell in with a river, and left the highway, following the banks
of the stream for a short distance. It now came on to blow
and rain, with the wind on shore, and we saw it would not
do to get a boat and go out in such a time. There was a
rising ground, in a thick wood, near us, and we went up the
hill to pass the day. We had seen two men pulling ashore
in a good-looking boat, and it was our determination to get
this boat, and shape our course down stream to the Bay, as
soon as it moderated. From the hill, we could overlook the
river, and the adjacent country. We saw the fishermen
land, take their sail and oars out of the boat, haul the latter
up, turn her over, and stow their sails and oars beneath her.
They had a breaker of fresh water, too, and everything
seemed fitted for our purposes. We liked the craft, and,
what is more, we liked the cruise.
We could not see the town of Annapolis, which turned
out to be up-stream from us, though we afterwards
ascertained
that we were within a mile or two of it. The
fishermen
walked in the direction of the town, and disappeared.
All we wanted now was tolerably good weather, with a fair
wind, or, at least, with less wind. The blow had driven in
the fishermen, and we thought it wise to be governed by
their experience. Nothing occurred in the course of the
day, the weather remaining the same, and we being exposed
to the rain, with no other cover than trees without leaves.
There were many pines, however, and they gave us a little
shelter.
At dusk, Littlefield lighted a fire, and began to cook his
fowls. The supper was soon ready, and we eat it with a
good relish. We then went to sleep, leaving Barnet on the
look-out. I had just got into a good sleep, when I was
awoke by the tramp of horses, and the shouting of men.
On springing up, I found that a party of five horsemen were
upon us. One called outHere they arewe 've found
them at last. This left no doubt of their errand, and we
were all retaken. Our arms were tied, and we were made
to mount behind the horsemen, when they rode off with us,
taking the road by which we had come. We went but a
few miles that night, when we halted.
We were taken the whole distance to Halifax, in this
manner, riding on great-coats, without stirrups, the horses
on a smart walk. We did not go by Cornwallis, which, it
seems, was not the nearest road; but we passed through
Horton, and crossed the bridge, beneath which we had
waded through the mud. At Horton we passed a night.
We were confined in a sort of a prison, that was covered
with mud. We did not like our berths; and, finding that
the logs, of which the building was made, were rotten, we
actually worked our way through them, and got fairly out.
Littlefield, who was as reckless an Irishman as ever lived,
swore he would set fire to the place; which he did, by
returning
through the hole we had made, and getting up into
a loft, that was dry and combustible. But for this silly act,
we might have escaped; and, as it was, we did get off for
the rest of the night, being caught, next morning, nearly
down, again, by the bridge at Windsor.
This time, our treatment was a good deal worse, than at
first. A sharp look-out was kept, and they got us back to
Halifax, without any more adventures. We were pretty
well fagged; though we had to taper off with the black hole,
and bread and water, for the next ten days; the regular
punishment for such misdemeanors as ours. At the end of
the ten days, we were let out, and came together again.
Our return brought about a great deal of discussion; and,
not a little criticism, as to the prudence of our course. To
hear the chaps talk, one would think every man among
them could have got off, had he been in our situation; though
none of them did any better; several having got off the
island, in our absence, and been retaken, within the first
day or two. While I was in prison, however, I remember
but one man who got entirely clear. This was a
privateers-man
,
from Marblehead; who did get fairly off; though he
was back again, in six weeks, having been taken once more,
a few days out.
We adventurers were pretty savage, about our failure;
and, the moment we were out of the black hole, we began
to lay our heads together for a new trial. My idea was, to
steer a different course, in the new attempt; making the best
of our way towards Liverpool, which lay to the southward,
coastwise. This would leave us on the Atlantic, it was
true; but our notion was, to ship in a small privateer, called
the Liverpool, and then run our chance of getting off from
her; as she was constantly crossing over to the American
coast. As this craft was quite small, and often had but few
hands in her, we did not know but we might get hold of the
schooner itself. Then there was some probability of being
put in a coaster; which we might run away with. At all
events, any chance seemed better to us, than that of
remaining
in prison, until the end of a war that might last years,
or until we got to be grey-headed. I remembered, when the
Ville de Milan was brought into Halifax; this was a year, or
two, before I went to sea; and yet here were some of her
people still, on Melville Island!
I renewed my trade as soon as out of the Black Hole,
but did not give up the idea of escaping. Leonard Lewis
and Jack Mallet were the only men we let into the secret.
They both declined joining us; Mallet on account of his
dread of the water, and Lewis, because certain he could not
outlive the fatigue; but they wished us good luck, and aided
us all they could. With Johnson we would have no further
concern.
The keepers did not ascertain the means by which we had
left the barracks, though they had seen the cut pickets of
course. We did not attempt, therefore, to cut through again,
but resolved to climb. The English had strengthened the
pickets with cross-pieces, which were a great assistance to
us
, and I now desire to express my thanks for the same.
We waited for a warm, but dark and rainy night in May,
before we commenced our new movement. We had still
plenty of money, I having brought back with me to prison
forty crowns, and having driven a thriving trade in the
interval
.
We got out through the bars, precisely as we had
done before, and at the very same window. This was a
small job. After climbing the pickets, either Littlefield or
Barnet dropped on the outside, a little too carelessly, and
was overheard. The sentinel immediately called for the
corporal of the guard, but we were in the water, swimming
quite near the bridge, and some little distance from the
guard-house
on the main. There was a stir on the island, while
we were in the water, but we all got ashore, safe and
unseen
.
We took to the same woods as before, but turned south
instead
of west. Our route brought us along by the
waterside
,
and we travelled hard all that night. Littlefield
pretended
to be our guide, but we got lost, and remained two
days and nights in the woods, without food, and completely
at fault as to which way to steer. At length we ventured
out into a high-way, by open day-light, and good luck threw
an old Irish seaman, who then lived by fishing, in our way.
After a little conversation, we told this old man we were
deserters from a vessel of war, and he seemed to like us all
the better for it. He had served himself, and had a son
impressed, and seemed to like the English navy little better
than we did ourselves. He took us to a hut on the beach,
and fed us with fish, potatoes, and bread, giving us a very
comfortable and hearty meal. We remained in this hut
until sunset, receiving a great deal of useful advice from the
old man, and then we left him. We used some precaution
in travelling, sleeping in the woods; but we kept moving
by day as well as by night, and halting only when tired,
and a good place offered. We were not very well off for
food, though we brought a little from the fisherman's hut,
and found quantities of winter-berries by the way-side.
We entered Liverpool about eight at night, and went
immediately
to the rendezvous of the privateer, giving a little
girl a shilling to be our guide. The keeper of the
rendezvous
received us gladly, and we shipped immediately. Of
course we were lodged and fed, in waiting for the schooner
to come in. Each of us got four pounds bounty, and both
parties seemed delighted with the bargain. To own the
truth, we now began to drink, and the next day was pretty
much a blank with us all. The second day, after breakfast,
the landlord rushed into our room with a newspaper in his
hand, and broke out upon us, with a pretty string of names,
denouncing us for having told him we were deserters, when
we were only runaway Yankees! The twelve pounds
troubled
him, and he demanded it back. We laughed at him,
and advised him to be quiet and put us aboard the privateer.
He then told us the guard was after us, hot-foot, and that it
was too late. This proved to be true enough, for, in less
than an hour an officer and a platoon of men had us in
custody. We had some fun in hearing the officer give it to
the landlord, who still kept talking about his twelve pounds.
The officer told him plainly that he was rightly served, for
attempting to smuggle off deserters, and I suppose this was
the reason no one endeavoured to get the money away from
us, except by words. We kept the twelve pounds, right or
wrong.
We were now put in a coaster, and sent to Halifax by
water. We were in irons, but otherwise were well enough
10
treated. We were kept in the Navy-yard guard-house, at
Halifax, several hours, and were visited by a great many
officers. These gentlemen were curious to hear our story,
and we let them have it, very frankly. They laughed, and
said, generally, we were not to be blamed for trying to get
off, if their own look-outs were so bad as to let us. We did
not tell them, however, by what means we passed out of the
prison-barracks. Among the officers who came and spoke
to us, was an admiral, Sir Isaac Coffin. This gentleman
was a native American, and was then in Halifax to assist
the Nantucket men, whom he managed to get exchanged.
His own nephew was said to be among them; but him he
would not serve, as he had been captured in a privateer.
Had he been captured in a man-of-war, or a merchant-man,
he would have done all he could for him; but, as it was, he
let him go to Dartmoorat least, this was the story in the
prison. The old gentleman spoke very mildly to us, and
said he could not blame us for attempting to escape. I do
not think he had ever heard of the twelve pounds; though
none of the navy officers were sorry that the
privateer's-men
should be punished. As for us, we considered them
all enemies alike, on whom it was fair enough to live in a
time of war.
We were sent back to the island, and were quarantined
again; though it was for twenty days, this time. When we
got pratique, we learned that some one had told of the
manner
in which we got out of prison, and cross-bars had been
placed in all the windows, making them so many nine of
diamonds. This was blocking the channel, and there was
no more chance for getting off in that way.
A grand conspiracy was now formed, which was worthy
of the men in prison. The plan was to get possession of
Halifax itself, and go off in triumph. We were eighteen
hundred prisoners in all; though not very well off for
officers
.
About fifty of us entered into the plan, at first; nor
did we let in any recruits for something like six weeks.
A Mr. Crowninshield, of Salem, was the head man among
us, he having been an officer in a privateer. There were a
good many privateer officers in the prison, but they were
berthed over-head, and were intended to be separated from
us at night. The floor was lifted between us, however, and
we held our communications by these means. The officers
came down at night, and lent us a hand with the work.
The scheme was very simple, though I do not think it
was at all difficult of execution. The black-hole cells were
beneath the prison, and we broke through the floor, into one
of them, from our bay. A large mess-chest concealed the
process, in the day-time. We worked in gangs of six,
digging
and passing up the dirt into the night-tubs. These
tubs we were permitted to empty, every morning, in a tide's
way, and thus we got rid of the dirt. At the end of two
months we had dug a passage, wide enough for two abreast,
some twenty or thirty yards, and were nearly ready to
come up to the surface. We now began to recruit,
swearing
in each man. On tho whole, we had got about four
hundred names, when the project was defeated, by that
great enemy which destroys so many similar schemes,
treachery. We were betrayed, as was supposed by one of
our own number.
Had we got out, the plan was to seize the heights of the
island, and get possession of the guns. This effected, it
would have been easy to subdue the guard. We then
would have pushed for Citadel Hill, which commanded
Halifax
.
Had we succeeded there, we should have given John
Bull a great deal of trouble, though no one could say what
would have been the result. Hundreds would probably
have got off, in different craft, even had the great plan
failed. We were not permitted to try the experiment,
however
,
for one day we were all turned out, and a party of
English officers, army and navy, entered the barracks,
removed
the mess-chest, and surveyed our mine at their
leisure. A draft of six hundred was sent from the prison
that day, and was shipped for Dartmoor; and, by the end
of the week, our whole number was reduced to some three
or four hundred souls. One of the Julias went in this draft,
but all the rest of us were kept at Halifax. For some
reason
or other, the English seemed to keep their eyes on us.
I never gave up the hope of escaping, and the excitement
of the hope was beneficial to both body and mind. We
were too well watched, however, and conversation at
night was even forbidden. Most of the officers were gone,
and this threw me pretty much on my own resources. I
have forgotten to say that Lemuel Bryant, the man who
fell at the breech of my gun, at Little York, and whom I
afterwards hauled into the Scourge's boat, got off, very early
after our arrival at Halifax. He made two that got quite
clear, instead of the one I have already mentioned.
Bryant's
escape was so clever, as to deserve notice.
One day a party of some thirty soldiers was called out
for exchange, under a capitulation. Among the names was
that of Lemuel Bryant, but the man happened to be dead.
Our Bryant had found this out, beforehand, and he rigged
himself soldier-fashion, and answered to the name. It is
probable he ascertained the fact, by means of some relation
ship, which brought him in contact with the soldier previously
to his death. He met with no difficulty, and I have never
seen him since. I have heard he is still living, and that he
receives a pension for the hurt he received at York. Well
does he deserve it, for no man ever had a narrower chance
for his life.
Nothing new, worthy of notice, occurred for several
months, until one evening in March, 1815, we heard a
great rejoicing in Halifax; and, presently, a turnkey
appeared
on the walls, and called out that England and
America
had made peace! We gave three cheers, and passed
the night happy enough. We had a bit of a row with the
turnkeys about locking us in again, for we were fierce for
liberty; but we were forced to submit for another night.
CHAPTER X.
The
following morning, eight of the names that stood
first on the prison-roll were called off, to know if the men
would consent to work a liberated Swedish brig to New
York. I was one of the eight, as was Jack Mallet and
Barnet. Wilcox, one of those who had gone with us to
Bermuda, had died, and the rest were left on the island. I
never fell in with Leonard Lewis, Littlefield, or any of the
rest of those chaps, after I quitted the prison. Lewis, I
think, could not have lived long; and as for Littlefield, I
heard of him, afterwards, as belonging to the Washington 74.
The Swede, whose name was the Venus, was lying at the
end of Marchinton's wharf, a place that had been so familiar
to me in boyhood. We all went on board, and I was not
sorry to find that we were to haul into the stream
immediately
.
I had an extraordinary aversion to Halifax, which
my late confinement had not diminished, and had no wish
to see a living soul in it. Jack Mallet, however, took on
himself the office of paying my sister a visit, and of telling
her where I was to be found. This he did contrary to my
wishes, and without my knowledge; though I think he
meant to do me a favour. The very day we hauled into the
stream, a boat came alongside us, and I saw, at a glance,
that Harriet was in it. I said a few words to her, requesting
her not to come on board, but promising to visit her that
evening, which I did.
I stayed several hours with my sister, whom I found living
with her husband. She did not mention my father's name
to me, at all; and I learned nothing of my other friends, if
I ever had any, or of my family. Her husband was a tailor,
and they gave me a good outfit of clothes, and treated me
with great kindness. It struck me that the unaccountable
silence of my father about us children, had brought my
sister
down in the world a little, but it was no affair of mine;
and, as for myself, I cared for no one. After passing the
evening with the family, I went on board again, without
turning to the right or left to see a single soul more. Even
the Frasers were not visited, so strong was my dislike to
have anything to do with Halifax.
The Venus took on board several passengers, among
whom were three or four officers of the navy. Lieutenant
Rapp, and a midshipman Randolph were among them, and
there were also several merchant-masters of the party. We
sailed two days after I joined the brig, and had a ten or
twelve days' passage. The moment the Venus was
alongside
the wharf, at New York, we all left, and found ourselves
free men once more. I had been a prisoner nineteen months,
and that was quite enough for me for the remainder of my
life.
We United States' men reported ourselves, the next day,
10 *
to Captain Evans, the commandant of the Brooklyn Yard,
and, after giving in our names, we were advised to go on
board the Epervier, which was then fitting out for the
Mediterranean
,
under the command of Captain Downes. To
this we objected, however, as we wanted a cruise ashore,
before we took to the water again. This was a lucky
decision
of ours, though scarcely to be defended as to our views:
the Epervier being lost, and all hands perishing, a few
months later, on her return passage from the Straits.
Captain Evans then directed us to report ourselves daily,
which we did. But the press of business at Washington
prevented our cases from being attended to; and being
destitute
of money, while wages were high, we determined,
with Captain Evans' approbation, to make a voyage, each,
in the merchant service, and to get our accounts settled on
our return. Jack Mallet, Barnet and I, shipped, therefore,
in another brig called the Venus, that was bound on a sealing
voyage, as was thought, in some part of the world where
seals were said to be plenty. We were ignorant of the
work, or we might have discovered there was a deception
intended, from the outfit of the vessel. She had no salt
even, while she had plenty of cross-cut saws, iron dogs,
chains, &c. The brig sailed, however, and stood across the
Atlantic, as if in good earnest. When near the Cape de
Verds, the captain called us aft, and told us he thought the
season too far advanced for sealing, and that, if we would
consent, he would run down to St. Domingo, and make an
arrangement with some one there to cut mahogany on shares,
with fustick and lignum-vit. The secret was now out;
but what could we poor salts do? The work we were asked
to do turned out to be extremely laborious; and I suppose
we had been deceived on account of the difficulty of getting
men, just at that time, for such a voyage. There we were,
in the midst of the ocean, and we agreed to the proposal,
pretty much as a matter of course.
The brig now bore up, and stood for St. Domingo. She
first went in to the city of St. Domingo, where the
arrangements
were made, and Spaniards were got to help to cut the
wood, when we sailed for a bay, of which I have forgotten
the name, and anchored near the shore. The trees were
sawed down, about ten miles up a river, and floated to its
bar, across which they had to be hauled by studding-sail
halyards, through the surf; one man hauling two logs at a
time, made into a sort of raft. Sharks abounded, and we
had to keep a bright look-out, lest they got a leg while we
were busy with the logs. I had a narrow escape from two
while we lay at St. Domingo. A man fell overboard, and
I went after him, succeeding in catching the poor fellow. A
boat was dropped astern to pick us up, and, as we hauled
the man in, two large sharks came up close alongside. This
affair had set us drinking, and I got a good deal of punch
aboard. The idea of remaining in the brig was unpleasant
to me, and I had thought of quitting her for some days. A
small schooner bound to America, and short of hands, lay
near us; and I had told the captain I would come and join
him that night. Jack Mallet and the rest tried to persuade
me not to go, but I had too much punch and grog in me to
listen to reason. When all hands aft were asleep, therefore,
I let myself down into the water, and swam quite a
cable's-length
to the schooner. One of the men was looking out
for me. He heard me in the water, and stood ready to
receive
me. As I drew near the schooner, this man threw me
a rope, and helped me up the side, but, as soon as I was on
the deck, he told me to look behind me. I did so, and there
I saw an enormous shark swimming about, a fellow that
was sixteen or eighteen feet long. This shark, I was told,
had kept company with me as long as I had been in
sight from the schooner. I cannot well describe the effect
that was produced on me by this discovery. When I
entered
the water, I was under the influence of liquor, but this
escape sobered me in a minute; so much so, indeed, that I
insisted on being put in a boat, and sent back to the brig,
which was done. I was a little influenced in this, however,
by some reluctance that was manifested to keep me on board
the schooner. I got on board the Venus without being
discovered
,
and came to a resolution to stick by the craft until
the voyage was up.
We filled up with mahogany, and took in a heavy
declload
,
in the course of four months, which was a most
laborious
process. When ready, the brig sailed for New York.
We encountered a heavy gale, about a week out, which swept
away our deck-load, bulwarks, &c. At this time, the
master
,
supercargo, mate, cook, and three of the crew, were
down with the fever; leaving Mallet, Barnet and myself, to
take care of the brig. We three brought the vessel up as
far as Barnegat, where we procured assistance, and she
arrived safe at the quarantine ground.
As soon as we got pratique, Mallet, Barnet and myself,
went up to town to look after our affairs, leaving the brig
below. The owners gave us thirty dollars each, to begin
upon. We ascertained that our landlord had received our
wages from government, and held it ready for us, sailor
fashion. I also sold my share in the Venus' voyage for one
hundred and twenty dollars. This gave me, in all, about
five hundred dollars, which money lasted me between five
and six weeks! How true is it, that sailors make their
money like horses, and spend it like asses! I cannot say
this prodigal waste of my means afforded me any
substantial
gratification. I have experienced more real pleasure
from one day passed in a way of which my conscience could
approve, than from all the loose and thoughtless follies, in
which I was then in the habit of indulging when ashore, of
a whole life. The manner in which this hard-earned gold
was thrown away, may serve to warn some brother tar of
the dangers that beset me; and let the reader understand the
real wants of so large a body of his fellow-creatures.
On turning out in the morning, I felt an approach to that
which seamen call the horrors, and continued in this
state, until I had swallowed several glasses of rum. I had
no appetite for breakfast, and life was sustained principally
by drink. Half of the time I ate no dinner, and when I did,
it was almost drowned in grog. Occasionally I drove out
in a coach, or a gig, and generally had something extra to
pay for damages. One of these cruises cost me forty
dollars
,
and I shall always think I was given a horse that sailed
crab-fashion, on purpose to do me out of the money. At night,
I generally went to the play, and felt bound to treat the
landlord
and his family to tickets and refreshments. We always
had a coach to go in, and it was a reasonable night that cost
me only ten dollars. At first I was a sort of king among
beggars; but as the money went, Ned's importance went
with it, until, one day, the virtuous landlord intimated to
me that it would be well, as I happened to be sober, to
over-haul
our accounts. He then began to read from his books,
ten dollars for this, twenty dollars for that, and thirty for the
other, until I was soon tired, and wanted to know how much
was left. I had still fifty dollars, even according to his
account
of the matter; and as that might last a week, with
good management, I wanted to hear no more about the items.
All this time, I was separated from my old shipmates,
being left comparatively among strangers. Jack Mallet had
gone to join his friends in Philadelphia, and Barnet went
south, whither I cannot say. I never fell in with either of
them again, it being the fate of seamen to encounter the
greatest risks and hardships in company, and then to cut
adrift from each other, with little ceremony, never to meet
again. I was still young, being scarcely two-and-twenty
and might, even then, have hauled in my oars, and come to
be an officer and a man.
As I knew I must go to sea, as soon as the accounts were
balanced, I began to think a little seriously of my prospects.
Dissipation had wearied me, and I wanted to go a voyage
of a length that would prevent my falling soon into the same
course of folly and vice. I had often bitter thoughts as to
my conduct, nor was I entirely free from reflection on the
subject of my peculiar situation. I might be said to be
without
a friend, or relative, in the world. When my hat was
on, my house was thatched. Of my father, I knew
nothing
;
I have since ascertained he must then have been
dead. My sister was little to me, and I never expected to
see her again. The separation from all my old lakers, too,
gave me some trouble, for I never met with one of them
after parting from Barnet and Mallet, with the exception of
Tom Goldsmith and Jack Reilly. Tom and I fell in with
each other, on my return from St. Domingo, in the streets
of New York, and had a yarn of two hours, about old times.
This was all I ever saw of Tom. He had suffered a good
deal with the English, who kept him in Kingston, Upper
Canada, until the peace, when they let him go with the rest.
As for Reilly, we have been in harbour together, in our old
age, and I may speak of him again.
Under the feelings I have mentioned, as soon as the looks
of my landlord let me know that there were no more shot in
the locker, I shipped in a South Sea whaler, named the
Edward
,
that was expected to be absent between two and three
years. She was a small vessel, and carried only three
boats. I got a pretty good outfit from my landlord, though
most of the articles were second-hand. We parted good
friends, however, and I came back to him, and played the
same silly game more than once. He was not a bad
landlord
,
as landlords then went, and I make no doubt he took
better care of my money than I should have done myself.
On the whole, this class of men are not as bad as they seem,
though there are precious rascals among them. The
respectable
sailor landlord is quite as good, in his way, as
one could expect, all things considered.
The voyage I made in the Edward was one of very little
interest, the ship being exceedingly successful. The usage
and living were good, and the whaling must have been good
too, or we never should have been back again, as soon as
we were. We went round the Horn, and took our first
whale between the coast of South America and that of New
Holland. I must have been present at the striking of thirty
fish, but never met with any accident. I pulled a mid-ship
oar, being a new hand at the business, and had little else to
do, but keep clear of the line, and look out for my paddle.
The voyage is now so common, and the mode of taking
whales is so well known, that I shall say little about either.
We went off the coast of Japan, as it is called, though a
long bit from the land, and we made New Holland, though
without touching. The return passage was by the Cape of
Good Hope and St. Helena. We let go our anchor but
once the whole voyage, and that was at Puna, at the mouth
of the Guayaquil river, on the coast of Chili. We lay there
a week, but, with this exception, the Edward was actually
under her canvass the whole voyage, or eighteen months.
We did intend to anchor at St. Helena, but were forbidden
on account of Bonaparte, who was then a prisoner on the
Island. As we stood in, we were met by a man-of-war
brig, that kept close to us until we had sunk the heights, on
our passage off again. We were not permitted even to send
a boat in, for fresh grub.
I sold my voyage in the Edward for two hundred and
fifty dollars, and went back to my landlord, in Water street.
Of course, everybody was glad to see me, a sailor's
importance
in such places being estimated by the length of his
voyage. In Wall street they used to call a man a
hundred
thousand dollar man, and in Water, an eighteen
months, or a two years' voyage man. As none but
whalers, Indiamen, and Statesmen could hold out so long,
we were all A. No. 1, for a fortnight or three weeks. The
man-of-war's-man is generally most esteemed, his cruise
lasting three years; the
lucky
whaler comes next, and the
Canton-man third. The Edward had been a lucky ship,
and, insomuch, I had been a lucky fellow. I behaved far
better this time, however, than I had done on my return
from St. Domingo. I kept sober more, did not spend my
money as foolishly or as fast, and did not wait to be kicked
out of doors, before I thought of getting some more. When
I shipped anew, I actually left a hundred dollars behind me
in my landlord's hands; a very extraordinary thing for
Jack, and what is equally worthy of notice, I got it all
again, on my next return from sea.
My steadiness was owing, in a great measure, to the
following
circumstances. I fell in with two old
acquaintances
,
who had been in prison with me, of the names of
Tibbets and Wilson. This Tibbets was not the man who
had been sent to Bermuda with me, but another of the same
name. These men had belonged to the Gov. Tompkins
privateer
,
and had received a considerable sum in prize-money,
on returning home. They had used their money discreetly,
having purchased an English prize-brig, at a low price, and
fitted her out. On board the Tompkins, both had been
foremost hands, and in prison they had messed in our bay,
so that we had been hail-fellows-well-met, on Melville
Island. After getting this brig ready, they had been to the
West Indies in her, and were now about to sail for Ireland.
They wished me to go with them, and gave me so much
good advice, on the subject of taking care of my money,
that it produced the effect I have just mentioned.
The name of the prize-brig was the Susan, though I
forget
from what small eastern port she hailed. She was of
about two hundred tons burthen, but must have been old
and rotten. Tibbets was master, and Wilson was
chief-mate
.
I shipped as a sort of second-mate, keeping a
watch, though I lived forward at my own request. We
must have sailed about January, 1818, bound to Belfast.
There were fourteen of us, altogether, on board, most of
us down-easters. Our run off the coast was with a strong
north-west gale, which compelled us to heave-to, the sea
being too high for scudding. Finding that the vessel
laboured
very much, however, and leaked badly, we kept off
again, and scudded for the rest of the blow. On the whole,
we got out of this difficulty pretty well. We got but two
observations the whole passage, but in the afternoon of the
twenty-third day out, we made the coast of Ireland, close
aboard, in thick weather; the wind directly on shore,
blowing
a gale. The brig was under close-reefed topsails,
running
free, at the time, and we found it necessary to haul up.
We now discovered the defects of old canvass and old rigging,
splitting the fore-topsail, foresail, and fore-topmast-staysail,
besides carrying away sheets, &c. We succeeded in
hauling
up the foresail, however, and I went upon the yard and
mended it, after a fashion. It was now nearly night, and
it blew in a way to need two men to hold one man's hair
on his head. I cannot say I thought much of our
situation
,
my principal concern being to get below, with some
warm, dry clothes on. We saw nothing of the land after
the first half-hour, but at midnight we wore ship, and came
up on the larboard tack. The brig had hardly got round
before the fore-tack went, and the foresail split into ribands.
We let the sail blow from the yard. By this time, things
began to look very serious, though, for some reason, I felt
no great alarm. The case was different with Tibbets and
Wilson, who were uneasy about Cape Clear. I had had a
bit of a spat with them about waring, believing, myself,
that we should have gone clear of the Cape, on the
starboard
tack. This prevented them saying much to me, and
we had little communication with each other that night. To
own the truth, I was sorry I had shipped in such a craft.
Her owners were too poor to give a sea-going vessel a
proper
outfit, and they were too near my own level to create
respect.
The fore-topsail had been mended as well as the foresail,
and was set anew. The sheets went, however, about two
in the morning, and the sail flew from the reef-band like a
bit of muslin torn by a shop-boy. The brig now had
nothing
set but a close-reefed main-topsail, and this I expected,
every minute, would follow the other canvass. It rained,
blew tremendously, and the sea was making constant
breaches over us. Most of the men were fagged out, some
going below, while others, who remained on deck, did, or
could
do, nothing. At the same time, it was so dark that
we could not see the length of the vessel.
I now went aft to speak to Tibbets, telling him I thought
it was all over with us. He had still some hope, as the bay
was deep, and he thought light might return before we got
to the bottom of it. I was of a different opinion, believing
the brig then to be within the influence of the ground-swell,
though not absolutely within the breakers. All this time
the people were quiet, and there was no drinking. Indeed,
I hardly saw any one moving about. It was an hour after
the conversation with Tibbets, that I was standing, holding
on by the weather-main-clew-garnet, when I got a glimpse
of breakers directly under our lee. I sung out, there's
breakers, and everybody must shift for himself. At the
next instant, the brig rose on a sea, settled in the trough,
and struck. The blow threw me off my feet, though I held
on to the clew-garnet. Then I heard the crash of the
foremast
as it went down to leeward. The brig rolled over on
her beam-ends, but righted at the next sea, drove in some
distance, and down she came again, with a force that
threatened
to break her up. I bethought me of the main-mast,
and managed to get forward as far as the bitts, in order to
be out of its way. It was well I did, as I felt a movement
as if her upper works were parting from the bottom. I was
near no one, and the last person I saw, or spoke to on board,
was Tibbets, who was then standing in the companion-way.
This was an hour before the brig struck.
There might have been an interval of half a minute
between
the time I reached the windlass, and that in which
I saw a tremendous white foaming sea rolling down upon
the vessel. At this ominous sight, I instinctively seized the
bitts for protection. I can remember the rushing of the
water down upon me, and have some faint impressions of
passing through a mass of rigging, but this is all. When
I came to my senses, it was in an Irish mud-cabin, with an
old woman and her daughter taking care of me. My head
11
was bandaged, and most of the hair had been cut off in front.
I was stiff and sore all over me. Fortunately, none of my
bones were broken.
The account given me of what had passed, was this. I
was found by the old man, who lived in the hut, a fisherman
and the husband of my nurse, with some other persons, lying
on my face, between two shelves of rock. There was
nothing
very near me, not even a bit of wood, or a rope. Two
lads that belonged to the brig were found not far from me,
both alive, though both badly hurt, one of them having had
his thigh broken. Of the rest of the fourteen souls on board
the Susan, there were no traces. I never heard that even
their bodies were found. Tibbets and Wilson had gone with
their old prize, and anything but a prize did she prove to me.
I lost a good outfit, and, after belonging to her about three
weeks, here was I left naked on the shores of Ireland. I
am sorry to say, my feelings were those of repining, rather
than of gratitude. Of religion I had hardly a notion, and I
am afraid that all which had been driven into me in
childhood
,
was already lost. In this state of mind, I naturally
felt more of the hardships I had endured, than of the mercy
that had been shown me. I look back with shame at the
hardness of heart which rendered me insensible to the many
mercies I had received, in escaping so often from the perils
of my calling.
It was three days after the wreck, before I left my bed.
Nothing could have been kinder than the treatment I received
from those poor Irish people. Certainly no reward was
before
them, but that which Heaven gives the merciful; and
yet I could not have been more cared for, had I been their
own son. They fed me, nursed me, and warmed me,
without
receiving any other return from me than my thanks. I
staid with them three weeks, doing nothing on account of
the bruises I had received. The Susan's had been a
thorough
wreck. Not enough of her could be found, of which
to build a launch. Her cargo was as effectually destroyed
as her hull, and, to say the truth, it took but little to break
her up. As for the two lads, I could not get as far as the
cabin in which they had been put. It was two or three
miles along the coast, and, having no shoes, I could not
walk that distance over the sharp stones. Several messages
passed between us, but I never saw a single soul that
belonged
to the brig, after the last look I had of Tibbets in the
companion-way.
A coaster passing near the cabin, and it falling calm, the
fisherman went off to her, told my story, and got a passage
for me to Liverpool. I now took my leave of these honest
people, giving them all I hadmy sincere thanksand went
on board the sloop. Here I was well treated, nor did any
one expect me to work. We reached Liverpool the second
day, and I went and hunted up Molly Hutson, the landlady
with whom the crew of the Sterling had lodged, when
Captain
B had her. The old woman helped me to some
clothes, received me well, and seemed sorry for my
misfortunes
.
As it would not do to remain idle, however, I shipped
on board the Robert Burns, and sailed for New York within
the week. I got no wages, but met with excellent treatment,
and had a very short winter passage. In less than three
months after I left him, I was back again with my old
landlord
,
who gave me my hundred dollars without any difficulty.
I had sailed with him in the Sterling, and he always seemed
to think of me a little differently from what landlords
generally
think of Jack.
A good deal was said among my associates, now, about
the advantages of making a voyage to the coast of Ireland
for the purpose of smuggling tobacco, and I determined to
try my hand at one. Of the morality of smuggling I have
nothing to say. I would not make such a voyage now, if
I know myself; but poor sailors are not taught to make just
distinctions in such things, and the merchants must take
their share of the shame. I fear there are few merchants,
and fewer seamen, man-of-war officers excepted, who will
not smuggle.
[13]
[13]
Ned might have added few duchesses. The ambassadors' bags,
in Europe, might tell many a tale of
foulards
, &c., sent from one court
to another. The writer believes that the higher class of American
gentlemen and ladies smuggle less than those of any other country.
It should be remembered, too, that no seaman goes in a smuggler, that
is not sent by traders ashore.
Editor
.
I laid out most of my hundred dollars, in getting a new
outfit, and then shipped in a small pilot-boat-built schooner,
called the M'Donough, bound to Ireland, to supply such
honest fellows as my old fisherman with good tobacco, cheap.
Our cargo was in small bales, being the raw material,
intended
to be passed by hand. We had seventeen hands
before the mast, but carried no armament, pistols, &c.,
excepted
.
The schooner sailed like a witch, carrying only
two gaff-topsails. We made the land in fourteen days after
we left the Hook, our port being Tory Island, off the
north-west
coast of Ireland. We arrived in the day-time, and
showed a signal, which was answered in the course of the
day, by a smoke on some rocks. A large boat then came
off to us, and we filled her with tobacco the same evening.
In the course of the night, we had despatched four or five
more boats, loaded with the same cargo; but, as day
approached
,
we hauled our wind, and stood off the land. Next
night we went in, again, and met more boats, and the
succeeding
morning we hauled off, as before. When we saw
a boat, we hailed and asked if they were outward bound.
If the answer was satisfactory, we brailed the foresail and
permitted the boat to come alongside. In this manner we
continued shoving cargo ashore, for quite a week, sometimes
falling in with only one boat of a night, and, at others, with
three or four; just as it might happen. We had got about
two-thirds of the tobacco out, and a boat had just left us, on
the morning of the sixth or seventh day, when we saw a
man-of-war brig coming round Tory Island, in chase. At
this sight, we hauled up close on a wind, it blowing very
fresh. As the English never employed any but the fastest
cruisers for this station, we had a scratching time of it.
The brig sailed very fast, and out-carried us; but our little
schooner held on well. For two days and one night we had
it, tack and tack, with her. The brig certainly gained on
us, our craft carrying a balanced reefed-mainsail, bonnet off
the foresail and one reef in, and bonnet off the jib. The
flying-jib was inboard. At sunset, on the second night, the
brig was so near us, we could see her people, and it was
blowing fresher than ever. This was just her play, while
ours was in more moderate weather. Our skipper got
uneasy
,
now, and determined to try a trick. It set in dark
and rainy; and, as soon as we lost sight of the brig, we
tacked, stood on a short distance, lowered everything, and
extinguished all our lights. We lay in this situation three
hours, when we stuck the craft down again for Tory Island,
as straight as we could go. I never knew what became of
the brig, which may be chasing us yet, for aught I know,
for I saw no more of her. Next day we had the signal
flying
again, and the smoke came up from the same rock, as
before. It took us three days longer to get all the tobacco
ashore, in consequence of some trouble on the island; but
it all went in the end, and went clear, as I was told, one or
two boat-loads excepted. The cargo was no sooner out,
than we made sail for New York, where we arrived in
another
short passage. We were absent but little more than
two months, and my wages and presents came to near one
hundred dollars. I never tried the tobacco trade again.
CHAPTER XI.
I now
stayed ashore two months. I had determined to
study navigation, and to try to get off the forecastle, in
which wise course I was encouraged by several discreet
friends. I had fallen in with a young woman of respectable
character and agreeable person, and, to own the truth, was
completely in irons with her. I believe a mother is a good
deal more on the look-out than a father, in such matters;
for I was overhauled by the old woman, and questioned as
to my intentions about Sarah, whereas the old man was
somewhat more moderate. I confessed my wish to marry
her daughter; but the old woman thought I was too wild,
which was not Sarah's opinion, I believe. Had we been
left to ourselves, we should have got married; though I was
really desirous of going out once as an officer, before I took
so important a step. I have sometimes suspected that
Sarah's parents had a hand in getting me shipped, again, as
they were intimate with the captain who now proposed to
take me with him as his second-mate. I consented to go,
with some reluctance; but, on the whole, thought it was the
best thing I could do. My reluctance proceeded from a
11 *
desire to remain with Sarah, when the time came; though
the berth was exactly the thing I wanted, whenever I
reasoned
coolly on the subject.
I shipped, accordingly, in a vessel of the Costers', called
the William and Jane, bound to Holland and Canton, as her
second-mate. My leave-taking with Sarah was very tender;
and I believe we both felt much grieved at the necessity of
parting. Nothing occurred on the passage out worth
mentioning
.
I got along with my duty well enough, for I had
been broken-in on board the Sterling, and one or two other
vessels. We went to the Texel, but found some difficulty in
procuring dollars, which caused us to return to New York,
after getting only twenty thousand. We had no other return
cargo, with the exception of a little gin. We were absent
five months; and I found Sarah as pretty, and as true, as
ever. I did not quit the vessel, however; but, finding my
knowledge of the lunars too limited, I was obliged to go
backward a littlebecoming third-mate. We were a month
in New York, and it was pretty hard work to keep from eloping
with Sarah; but I clawed off the breakers as well as I could.
I gave her a silver thimble, and told her to take it to a smith,
and get our joint names cut on it, which she did. The
consequences
of this act will be seen in the end.
We had a little breeze on board the ship before we could
get off; the people refusing to sail with a new first-mate
that had joined her. It ended by getting another mate, when
we went to sea. I believe that no other vessel ever went
out with such articles as our crew insisted on. The men
stipulated for three quarts of water a day, and the forenoon's
watch below. All this was put in black and white, and it
gave us some trouble before we got to our destination.
Our passage out was a very long one, lasting two hundred
and ten days. When we got into the trades, we stripped
one mast after the other, to a girt-line, overhauling
everything
,
and actually getting new gangs of rigging up over
the lower-mast-heads. We were a long time about it, but
lost little or nothing in distance, as the ship was going before
the wind the whole time, with everything packed on the
masts that were rigged. Before overhauling the rigging,
we fell in with an English ship, called the General Blucher,
and kept company with her for quite a fortnight. While
the two ships were together, we were chased by a strange
brig, that kept in sight three or four days, evidently
watching
us, and both vessels suspected him of being a pirate.
As we had six guns, and thirty-one souls, and the Blucher
was, at least, as strong, the two captains thought, by
standing
by each other, they might beat the fellow off, should he
attack us. The brig frequently came near enough to get
a good look at us, and then dropped astern. He continued
this game several days, until he suddenly hauled his wind,
and left us. Our ship would have been a famous prize;
having, it was said, no less than two hundred and fifty
thousand Spanish dollars on board.
We parted company with the Blucher, in a heavy gale;
our ship bearing up for Rio. After getting rid of some of
our ballast, however, and changing the cargo of pig-lead,
our vessel was easier, and did not go in. Nothing further
occurred, worth mentioning, until we got off Van Diemen's
Land. Two days after seeing the land, a boy fell from the
fore-top-gallant yard, while reeving the studding-sail halyards.
I had just turned in, after eating my dinner, having the
watch below, when I heard the cry of a man overboard!
Running on deck, as I was, I jumped into a quarter-boat,
followed by four men, and we were immediately lowered
down. The ship was rounded-to, and I heard the poor
fellow
calling out to me by name, to save him. I saw him,
astern, very plainly, while on the ship's quarter; but lost
sight of him, as soon as the boat was in the water. The
skylight-hood had been thrown overboard, and was floating
in the ship's wake. We steered for that; but could neither
see nor hear anything more of the poor fellow. We got his
hat, and we picked up the hood of the skylight, but could
not find the boy. He had, unquestionably, gone down
before we reached the spot where he had been floating, as
his hat must have pointed out the place. We got the hat
first; and then, seeing nothing of the lad, we pulled back to
take in the hood; which was quite large. While employed
in taking it in, a squall passed over the boat; which nearly
blew it away from us. Being very busy in securing the
hood, no one had leisure to look about; but the duty was no
sooner done, than one of the men called out, that he could
not see the ship! Sure enough, the William and Jane had
disappeared! and there we were, left in the middle of the
ocean, in a six-oared pinnace, without a morsel of food, and I,
myself, without hat, shoes, jacket or trowsers. In a word,
I had nothing on me but my drawers and a flannel shirt.
Fortunately, the captain kept a breaker of fresh water in each
boat, and we had a small supply of this great requisite;
enough, perhaps, to last five men two or three days.
All our boats had sails; but those of the pinnace had been
spread on the quarter-deck, to dry; and we had nothing but
the ash to depend on. At first, we pulled to leeward; but
the weather was so thick, we could not see a cable's-length;
and our search for the vessel, in that direction, proved
useless
.
At the end of an hour or two, we ceased rowing, and
held a consultation. I proposed to pull in the direction of
the land; which was pulling to windward. If the ship should
search for us, it would certainly be in that quarter; and if
we should miss her, altogether, our only chance was in
reaching the shore. There, we might find something to
eat; of which there was little hope, out on the ocean. The
men did not relish the idea of quitting the spot; but, after
some talk, they came into my plan.
It remained thick weather all that afternoon, night, and
succeeding day, until about noon. We were without a
compass
,
and steered by the direction of the wind and sea.
Occasionally
it lightened up a little, so as to show us a star or
two, or during the day to permit us to see a few miles around
the boat; but we got no glimpse of the ship. It blew so
heavily that we made no great progress, in my judgment
doing very little more than keeping the boat head to sea.
Could we have pulled four oars, this might not have been
the case, but we took it watch and watch, two men pulling,
while two tried to get a little rest, under the shelter of the
hood. I steered as long as I could, but was compelled to
row part of the time to keep myself warm. In this manner
were passed about six-and-twenty of the most unpleasant
hours of my life, when some of us thought they heard the
report of a distant gun. I did not believe it; but, after
listening
attentively some ten or fifteen minutes, another report
was heard, beyond all dispute, dead to leeward of us!
This signal produced a wonderful effect on us all. The
four oars were manned, and away we went before the wind
and sea, as fast as we could pull, I steering for the reports
as they came heavily up to windward at intervals of about
a quarter of an hour. Three or four of these guns were
heard, each report sounding nearer than the other, to our
great joy, until I got a glimpse of the ship, about two miles
distant from us. She was on the starboard tack, close
hauled
,
a proof she was in search of us, with top-gallant-sails
set over single-reefed topsails. She was drawing ahead of
us fast, however, and had we not seen her as we did, we
should have crossed her wake, and been lost without a hope,
by running to leeward. We altered our course the instant
she was seen; but what could a boat do in such a sea,
pulling
after a fast ship under such canvass? Perhaps we felt
more keen anxiety, after we saw the ship, than we did
before
,
since we beheld all the risk we ran. Never shall I
forget
the sensations with which I saw her start her main-tack
and haul up the sail! The foresail and top-gallant-sail
followed
,
and then the main-yard came round, and laid the
topsail aback! Everything seemed to fly on board her, and
we knew we were safe. In a few minutes we were alongside,
The boat was at the davits, the helm was up, and the old
barky squared away for China.
We in the boat were all pretty well fagged out with
hunger
,
toil, and exposure. I was the worst off, having so
little
clothing in cool weather, and I think another day would
have destroyed us all, unless we had taken refuge in the
well-known dreadful alternative of seamen. The captain
was delighted to see us, as indeed were all hands. They
had determined to turn to windward, on short tacks, until
they made the land, the best thing that could have been
done, and the course that actually saved us.
When we got into the latitude of Port Jackson, the crew
was put on two quarts of water a man, three quarts having
been stipulated for in the articles. This produced a mutiny,
the men refusing duty. This was awkward enough, in that
distant sea. The captain took advantage of the men's
going
below, however, to secure the scuttle and keep them
there. He then mustered us, who lived aft, six men and
three boys, and laid the question before us,
whether we would
take the ship into Canton
, or go into Port Jackson, and get
some water. He admitted we were about seventy-five days'
run from Canton, but he himself leaned to the plan of
continuing
on our course. We saw all the difficulties before
us, and told him of them.
There were twenty men below, and to carry them eight
or ten thousand miles in that situation, would have been
troublesome, to say the least, and might have caused the
death of some among them. We were armed, and had no
apprehensions of the people, but we did not like to work a
ship of five hundred tons with so few hands, one-third of
whom were boys, so great a distance. The crew,
moreover
,
had a good deal of right on their side, the articles
stipulating
that they should have the water, and this water was
to be had a short distance to windward.
The captain yielded to our reasoning, and we beat up to
Port Jackson, where we arrived in three or four days. The
people were then sent to prison, as mutineers, and we
watered
the ship. We were in port a fortnight, thus
occupied
.
All this time the men were in gaol. No men were
to be had, and then arose the question about trusting the old
crew. There was no choice, and, the ship being ready to
sail, we received the people on board again, and turned
them all to duty. We had no further trouble with them,
however, the fellows behaving perfectly well, as men
commonly
will, who have been once put down. No mutiny is
dangerous when the officers are apprized of its existence,
and are fairly ready to meet it. The king's name is a
tower of strength.
We arrived at Canton in due time, and found our cargo
ready for us. We took it in, and sailed again, for the
Texel, in three weeks. Our passage to Europe was two
hundred and eleven days, but we met with no accident. At
the Texel I found two letters from New York, one being
from Sarah, and the other from a female friend. Sarah
was married to the very silversmith who had engraven our
names on the thimble! This man saw her for the first
time, when she carried that miserable thimble to him, fell
in love with her, and, being in good circumstances, her
friends prevailed on her to have him. Her letter to me
admitted
her error, and confessed her unhappiness; but there
was no remedy. I did not like the idea of returning to New
York, under the circumstances, and resolved to quit the
ship. I got my discharge, therefore, from the William and
Jane, and left her, never seeing the vessel afterwards.
There was a small Baltimore ship, called the Wabash, at
the Texel, getting ready for Canton, and I entered on board
her, as a foremast Jack, again. My plan was to quit her in
China, and to remain beyond the Capes for ever. The
disappointment
in my matrimonial plans had soured me, and I
wanted to get as far from America as I could. This was
the turning point of my life, and was to settle my position
in my calling. I was now twenty-seven, and when a man
gets stern-way on him, at that age, he must sail a good
craft ever to work his way into his proper berth again.
The Wabash had a good passage out, without any
unusual
occurrence. On her arrival at Canton, I told the
captain my views, and he allowed me to go. I was now
adrift in the Imperial Empire, with a couple of hundred
dollars in my pocket, and a chest full of good clothes. So
far all was well, and I began to look about me for a berth.
We had found an English country ship lying at Whampao,
smuggling opium, and I got on board of her, as third-mate, a
few days after I quitted the Wabash. This was the first
and only time I ever sailed under the English flag, for I do
not call my other passages in English vessels, sailing
under
the flag, though it was waving over my head. My new
ship was the Hope, of Calcutta, commanded by Captain
Kid, or Kyd, I forget which. The vessel was built of teak,
and had been a frigate in the Portuguese service. She was
so old no one knew exactly when she was built, but sailed
like a witch. Her crew consisted principally of Lascars,
with a few Europeans and negroes, as is usual in those
craft. My wages did not amount to much in dollars, but
everything was so cheap, they counted up in the long run.
I had perquisites, too, which amounted to something
handsome
.
They kept a very good table.
The Hope had a good deal of opium, when I joined her,
and it was all to be smuggled before we sailed. As this
trade has made a great deal of noise, latterly, I will relate
the manner in which we disposed of the drug. Of the
morality
of this species of commerce, I have no more to say in
its defence, than I had of the tobacco voyage, unless it be
to aver that were I compelled, now, to embark in one of the
two, it should be to give the countrymen of my honest
fisherman
cheap tobacco, in preference to making the Chinese
drunk on opium.
Our opium was packed in wooden boxes of forty
cylinders
,
weighing about ten pounds each cylinder. Of course
each box weighed about four hundred pounds. The main
cargo was cotton, and salt-petre, and ebony; but there were
four hundred boxes of this opium.
The sales of the article were made by the captain, up at
the factory. They seldom exceeded six or eight boxes at a
time, and were oftener two or three. The purchaser then
brought, or sent, an order on board the ship, for the delivery
of the opium. He also provided bags. The custom-house
officers did not remain in the ship, as in other countries, but
were on board a large armed boat, hanging astern. These
crafts are called Hoppoo boats. This arrangement left us
tolerably free to do as we pleased, on board. If an officer
happened to come on board, however, we had early notice
of it, of course. As third-mate, it was my duty to see the
boxes taken out of the hold, and the opium delivered. The
box was opened, and the cylinders counted off, and stowed
in the bags, which were of sizes convenient to handle. All
this was done on the gun-deck, the purchaser receiving
possession of his opium, on board us. It was his loss, if
anything failed afterwards.
As soon as the buyer had his opium in the bags, he
placed the latter near two or three open ports, amidships,
and hung out a signal to the shore. This signal was soon
answered, and then it was look out for the smuggling boats!
These smuggling boats are long, swift, craft, that have
double-banked paddles, frequently to the number of sixty
men. They are armed, and are swift as arrows. When
all is ready, they appear suddenly on the water, and dash
alongside of the vessel for which they are bound, and find
the labourers of the purchaser standing at the ports, with
the bags of cylinders ready. These bags are thrown into
the boat, the purchaser and his men tumble after them, and
away she paddles, like a racer. The whole operation
occupies
but a minute or two.
As soon as the Hoppoo boat sees what is going on, it
begins
to blow conches. This gives the alarm, and then follows
a chase from an armed custom-house boat, of which there
are many constantly plying about. It always appeared to
me that the custom-house people were either afraid of the
smugglers, or that they were paid for not doing their duty.
I never saw any fight, or seizure, though I am told such
sometimes happen. I suppose it is in China, as it is in
other parts of the world; that men occasionally do their
whole duty, but that they oftener do not. If the connivance
of custom-house officers will justify smuggling in China, it
will justify smuggling in London, and possibly in New
York.
We not only smuggled cargo out, but we smuggled cargo
in. The favourite prohibited article was a species of metal,
that came in plates, like tin, or copper, of which we took in
large quantities. It was brought to us by the
smuggling-boats
,
and thrown on board, very much as the opium was
taken out, and we stowed it away in the hold. All this was
done in the day-time, but I never heard of any one's
following
the article into the ship. Once there, it appeared to be
considered safe. Then we got sycee silver, which was
prohibited
for exportation. All came on board in the same
manner. For every box of opium sold, the mate got a china
dollar as a perquisite. Of course my share on four hundred
boxes came to one hundred and thirty-three of these dollars,
or about one hundred and sixteen of our own. I am ashamed
to say there was a great deal of cheating all round, each
party evidently regarding the other as rogues, and, instead
of doing as they
would
be done by, doing as they
thought
they
were
done by.
The Hope sailed as soon as the opium was sold, about a
month, and had a quick passage to Calcutta. I now began
to pick up a little Bengalee, and, before I left the trade, could
work a ship very well in the language. The Lascars were
more like monkeys than men aloft, though they wanted
strength. A topsail, that six of our common men would
furl, would employ twenty of them. This was partly from
habit, perhaps, though they actually want physical force.
They eat little besides rice, and are small in frame. We
had a curious mode of punishing them, when slack, aloft.
Our standing rigging was of grass, and wiry enough to cut
even hands that were used to it. The ratlines were not
12
seized to the forward and after shrouds, by means of eyes,
as is done in our vessels, but were made fast by a round
turn, and stopping back the ends. We used to take down all
the ratlines, and make the darkies go up without them. In
doing this, they took the rigging between the great and
second
toe, and walked up, instead of shinning it, like
Christians
.
This soon gave them sore toes, and they would beg
hard to have the ratlines replaced. On the whole, they were
easily managed, and were respectful and obedient. We had
near a hundred of these fellows in the Hope, and kept them
at work by means of a boatswain and four mates, all
countrymen
of their own. In addition, we had about thirty more
souls, including the Europeans  Christians, as we were
called!
At Calcutta we loaded with cotton, and returned to
Canton
,
having another short passage. We had no opium in
the ship, this time, it being out of season; but we smuggled
cargo in, as before. We lay at Whampao a few weeks, and
returned to Calcutta. By this time the Hope was dying of
old age, and Captain Kyd began to think, if he did not bury
her, she might bury him. Her beams actually dropped, as
we removed the cotton at Canton, though she still remained
tight. But it would have been dangerous to encounter heavy
weather in her.
A new ship, called the Hopping Castle, had been built by
Captain Kyd's father-in-law, expressly for him. She was
a stout, large vessel, and promised to sail well. The officers
were all transferred to her; but most of the old Lascars
refused to ship, on account of a quarrel with the boatswain.
This compelled us to ship a new set of these men, most of
whom were strangers to us.
By a law of Calcutta, if anything happens to a vessel
before she gets to sea, the people retain the two months'
advance it is customary to give them. This rule brought
us into difficulty. The Hopping Castle cleared for Bombay,
with a light cargo. We had dropped down the river,
discharged
the pilot, and made sail on our course, when a fire
suddenly broke up out of the fore-hatch. A quantity of
grass junk, and two or three cables of the same material,
were in that part of the ship, and they all burnt like tinder.
I went with the other officers and threw overboard the
powder
,
but it was useless to attempt extinguishing the flames.
Luckily, there were two pilot brigs still near us, and they
came alongside and received all hands. The Hopping
Castle
burnt to the water's edge, and we saw her wreck go
down. This was a short career for so fine a ship, and it
gave us all great pain; all but the rascals of Lascars. I
lost everything I had in the world in her, but a few clothes
I saved in a small trunk. I had little or no money, Calcutta
being no place for economy. In a country in which it is a
distinction to be a white man, and
called
a Christian, one
must maintain his dignity by a little extravagance.
Captain Kyd felt satisfied that the Lascars had set his
ship on fire, and he had us all landed on Tiger Island.
Here the serang, or boatswain, took the matter in hand, and
attempted to find out the facts. I was present at the
proceeding
,
and witnessed it all. It was so remarkable as to
deserve being mentioned. The men were drawn up in rings,
of twenty or thirty each, and the boatswain stood in the
centre. He then put a little white powder into each man's
hand, and ordered him to spit in it. The idea was that the
innocent men would spit without any difficulty, while the
mouths of the guilty would become too dry and husky to
allow them to comply. At any rate, the serang picked out
ten men as guilty, and they were sent to Calcutta to be tried.
I was told, afterwards, that all these ten men admitted their
guilt, criminated two more, and that the whole twelve were
subsequently hanged in chains, near Castle William. Of
the legal trial and execution I know nothing, unless by
report
;
but the trial by spittle, I saw with my own eyes; and
it was evident the Lascars looked upon it as a very serious
matter. I never saw criminals in court betray more
uneasiness
,
than these fellows, while the serang was busy with
them.
I was now out of employment. Captain Kyd wished me
to go on an indigo plantation, offering me high wages. I
never drank at sea, and had behaved in a way to gain his
confidence, I believe, so that he urged me a good deal to
accept his offers. I would not consent, however, being
afraid of death. There was a Philadelphia ship, called the
Benjamin Rush, at Calcutta, and I determined to join her.
By this time, I felt less on the subject of my disappointment,
and had a desire to see home, again. I shipped, accordingly,
in the vessel mentioned, as a foremast hand. We sailed
soon after, and had a pleasant passage to the Capes of the
Delaware, which I now entered, again, for the first time
since I had done so on my return from my original voyage
in the Sterling.
As soon as paid off, I proceeded to New York. I was
short of cash; and, my old landlord being dead, I had to
look about me for a new ship. This time, I went in a brig,
called the Boxer, a clipper, belonging to John Jacob Astor,
bound to Canton. This proved to be a pleasant and
successful
voyage, so far as the vessel was concerned, at least;
the brig being back at New York, again, eight months after
we sailed. I went in her before the mast.
My money was soon gone; and I was obliged to ship
again. I now went as second-mate, in the Trio; an old
English prize-ship, belonging to David Dunham. We were
bound to Batavia, and sailed in January. After being a
short time at sea, we found all our water gone, with the
exception
of one cask. The remainder had been lost by the
bursting of the hoops, in consequence of the water's having
frozen. We went on a short allowance; and suffered a good
deal by the privation. Our supercargo, a young gentleman
of the name of Croes, came near dying. We went on,
however, intending to go into one of the Cape de Verdes.
We got up our casks, and repaired them, in the meanwhile.
Off the Island of Fuego, we hove to, and found we could get
no water. We got a few goats, and a little fruit; but were
compelled to proceed. Luckily, it came on to rain very
hard, and we stopped all the scuppers, filling every cask we
had, in this easy manner. We began about eight at night,
and were through before morning. Capital water it proved;
and it lasted us to Batavia. There, indeed, it would even
have brought a premium; being so much better than
anything
to be had in that port. It changed; but sweetened
itself very soon.
We first went into Batavia, and entered the ship; after
which, we sailed for a roadstead, called Terragall, to take
in rice. The vessel was in ballast, and had brought money
to make her purchases with. We got our cargo off in boats,
and sailed for Batavia, to clear; all within a few weeks.
The second night out, the ship struck, in fair weather, and
a moderate sea, on a mud-bank; and brought up all
standing
.
We first endeavoured to force the vessel over the bank;
but this did not succeed; and, the tide leaving her, the ship
fell over on her bilge; bringing her gunwales under water.
Luckily, she lay quiet; though a good deal strained. The
captain now took a boat, and four men, and pulled ashore,
to get prows, to lighten the vessel. We had but eight men
before the mast, and six aft. This, of course, left only nine
souls on board. That night nothing occurred; but, in the
morning early, two piratical prows approached, and showed
a disposition to board us. Mr. Croes was the person who
saved the ship. He stuck up handspikes, and other objects,
about deck; putting hats and caps on them, so as to make
us appear very strong-handed. At the same time, we got a
couple of sixes to bear on the prows; and succeeded in
keeping
them at a safe distance. They hovered about until
sun-set
,
when they left us; pulling ashore. Just as they were
quitting us, twenty-seven boats hove in sight; and we made
a signal to them, which was not answered. We set them
down as enemies, too; but, as they came nearer, we
perceived
our own boat among them, and felt certain it was the
captain.
We discharged everything betwixt decks into the boats,
that night, and got the ship afloat before morning. We now
hove clear of the bank, restowed the cargo, and made sail
for Batavia. The ship leaked badly, and kept us hard at
the pumps. As there were no means for repairing the
vessel
where we were, it was resolved to take in extra hands,
ship two box-pumps, and carry the vessel to the Isle of
France, in order to repair her. I did not like the prospect
of such a passage, and confess I played old soldier to get
rid of it. I contrived to get, on a sick ticket, into the
hospital
,
and the ship sailed without me. At the Isle of France,
the Trio was condemned; her hulk being, in truth, much
worse than my own, docked though I was.
12 *
CHAPTER XII.
As
soon as the Trio was off, I got well. Little did I
then think of the great risk I ran in going ashore; for it
was almost certain death for an European to land, for any
length of time, at that season. Still less did I, or
could
I,
anticipate what was to happen to myself, in this very
hospital
,
a few years later; or how long I was to be one of its
truly suffering, and, I hope, repentant inmates. The consul
was frank enough to tell me that I had been shamming
Abraham; and I so far imitated his sincerity as distinctly
to state, it was quite true. I thought the old Trio ought to
have been left on the bank, where Providence had placed
her; but, it being the pleasure of her captain and the
supercargo
to take her bones to the Isle of France for burial, I
did not choose to go so far, weeping through the pumps, to
attend her funeral.
As the consul held my wages, and refused to give me any
money, I was compelled to get on board some vessel as soon
as I could. Batavia was not a place for an American
constitution
,
and I was glad to be off. I shipped, before the
mast, in the Clyde, of Salem, a good little ship, with good
living and good treatment. We sailed immediately, but not
soon enough to escape the Batavia fever. Two of the crew
died, about a week out, and were buried in the Straits of
Banca. The day we lost sight of Java Head, it came on to
blow fresh, and we had to take in the jib, and double-reef
the topsails. A man of the name of Day went down on the
bowsprit shrouds to clear the jib-sheets, when the ship made
a heavy pitch, and washed him away. The second mate
and myself got into the boat, and were lowered as soon as
the ship was rounded-to. There was a very heavy sea on,
but we succeeded in finding the poor fellow, who was
swimming
with great apparent strength. His face was towards
the boat, and, as we came near, I rose, and threw the blade
of my oar towards him, calling out to him to be of good
cheer. At this instant, Day seemed to spring nearly his
length out of water, and immediately sunk. What caused
this extraordinary effort, and sudden failure, was never
known. I have sometimes thought a shark must have struck
him, though I saw neither blood nor fish. The man was
hopelessly lost, and we returned to the ship, feeling as seamen
always feel on such occasions.
A few days later, another man died of the fever. This
left but five of us in the forecastle, with the ship a long way
to the eastward of the Cape of Good Hope. Before we got
up with the Cape, another foremast hand went crazy, and,
instead of helping us, became a cause of much trouble for
the rest of the passage. In the end, he died, mad. We had
now only three men in a watch, the officers included; and,
of course, it was trick and trick at the helm.
Notwithstanding
all this, we did very well, having a good run, until we
got on the coast, which we reached in the month of January.
A north-wester drove us off, and we had a pretty tough week
of it, but brought the ship up to the Hook, at the end of that
time, and anchored her safely in the East River. The Clyde
must have been a ship of about three hundred tons, and,
including
every one on board, nine of us sailed her from the
eastward of the Cape to her port, without any serious
difficulty
.
I did not stay long ashore, for the money went like smoke,
but shipped in a brig called the Margaret, bound to Belfast.
This vessel struck in the Irish channel, but she was backed
off with little difficulty, and got safe into her port. The
return
passage was pleasant, and without any accident.
Such a voyage left little to spend, and I was soon on the
look-out for a fresh berth. I shipped this time as mate, in
a brig called the William Henry, bound on a smuggling
voyage to the coast of Spain. We took in tobacco, segars,
&c. &c., and the brig dropped down to Staten Island. Here
I quarrelled with the captain about some cotton wick, and I
threw up my situation. I knew there were more ships than
parish churches, and felt no concern about finding a place in
one, up at town. The balance of my advance was paid
back, and I left the smuggling trade, like an honest man. I
only wish this change of purpose had proceeded from a better
motive.
My next windfall was Jack's berth on board a beautiful
little schooner called the Ida, that was to sail for Curaoa,
in the hope of being purchased by the governor of the island
for a yacht. I expected to find my way to the Spanish
main, after the craft was sold. We got out without any
accident, going into port of a Sunday morning. The same
morning, an English frigate and a sloop-of-war came in and
anchored. That afternoon these vessels commenced giving
liberty to their men. We were alongside of a wharf, and,
in the afternoon, our crew took a drift in some public
gardens
in the suburbs of the town. Here an incident occurred
that is sufficiently singular to be mentioned.
I was by myself in the garden, ruminating on the past,
and, I suppose, looking melancholy and in the market, when
I perceived an English man-of-war's-man eyeing me pretty
closely. After a while, he came up, and fell into discourse
with me. Something that fell from him made me distrust
him from the first, and I acted with great caution. After
sounding me for some time, he inquired if I had any berth.
I told him, no. He then went on, little by little, until he got
such answers as gave him confidence, when he let me into
the secret of his real object. He said he belonged to the
frigate, and had liberty until next morningthat he and four
of his shipmates who were ashore, had determined to get
possession of the pretty little Yankee schooner that was lying
alongside of the Telegraph, at the wharf, and carry her down
to Laguayra. All this was to be done that night, and he
wished me to join the party. By what fell from this man,
I made no doubt his design was to turn pirate, after he had
sold the flour then in the Ida. I encouraged him to go on,
and we drank together, until he let me into his whole plan.
The scheme was to come on board the schooner, after the
crew had turned in, to fasten all hands below, set the foresail
and jib, and run out with the land-breeze; a thing that was
feasible enough, considering there is never any watch kept
in merchant-vessels that lie at wharves.
After a long talk, I consented to join the enterprise, and
agreed to be, at nine o'clock, on board the Telegraph, a
Philadelphia ship, outside of which our schooner lay. This
vessel had a crew of blacks, and, as most of them were then
ashore, it was supposed many would not return to her that
night. My conspirator observedthe Yankees that
belong
to the schooner are up yonder in the garden, and will
be half drunk, so they will all be sound asleep, and can
give us little trouble. I remember he professed to have no
intention of hurting any of us, but merely to run away with
us, and sell the craft from under us. We parted with a
clear understanding of the manner in which everything was
to be done.
I know no other reason why this man chose to select me
for his companion in such an adventure, than the
circumstance
that I happened to be alone, and perhaps I may have
looked a little under the weather. He was no sooner gone,
however, than I managed to get near my shipmates, and to
call them out of the garden, one by one. As we went
away, I told them all that had happened, and we laid our
counter-plot. When we reached the Telegraph, it was near
night, and finding only two of the blacks on board her, we
let them into the secret, and they joined us, heart and hand.
We got something to drink, as a matter of course, and tried
to pass the time as well as we could, until the hour for
springing the mine should arrive.
Pretty punctually to the hour, we heard footsteps on the
quay, and then a gang of men stopped alongside of the ship.
We stowed ourselves under the bulwarks, and presently the
gentlemen came on board, one by one. The negroes were
too impatient, however, springing out upon their prey a little
too soon. We secured three of the rascals, but two escaped
us, by jumping down upon the quay and running.
Considering
we were all captains, this was doing pretty well.
Our three chaps were Englishmen, and I make no doubt
belonged to the frigate, as stated. As soon as they were
fairly pinned, and they understood there was no officer
among us, they began to beg. They said their lives would
be forfeited if we gave them up, and they entreated us to let
them go. We kept them about half an hour, and finally
yielded to their solicitations, giving them their liberty again.
They were very thankful for their escape, especially as I
told them what had passed between myself and the man in
the garden. This fellow was one of the two that escaped,
and had the appearance of a man who might very well
become
a leader among pirates.
The next day the two men-of-war went to sea, and I
make no doubt carried off the intended pirates in them. As
for us seamen, we never told our own officers anything
about the affair, for I was not quite satisfied with myself,
after letting the scoundrels go. One scarcely knows what
to do in such a case, as one does not like to be the means
of getting a fellow-creature hanged, or of letting a rogue
escape
.
A pirate, of all scoundrels, deserves no mercy, and
yet Jack does not relish the idea of being a sort of Jack
Ketch, neither. If the thing were to be done over again, I
think I should hold on to my prisoners.
We discharged our cargo of flour, and failing in the
attempt
to sell the schooner, we took in dye-wood, and
returned
to New York. I now made a serious attempt to
alter my mode of living, and to try to get up a few rounds
of the great ladder of life. Hitherto, I had felt a singular
indifference whether I went to sea as an officer, or as a
foremast Jack, with the exception of the time I had a
marriage
with Sarah in view. But I was now drawing near to
thirty, and if anything was to be done, it must be done at
once. Looking about me, I found a brig called the
Hippomenes
,
bound to Gibraltar, and back. I shipped before the
mast, but kept a reckoning, and did all I could to qualify
myself to become an officer. We had a winter passage out,
but a pleasant one home. Nothing worthy of being
recorded
,
however, occurred. I still continued to be tolerably
correct, and after a short stay on shore, I shipped in the
Belle Savage, commanded by one of the liberated Halifax
prisoners, who had come home in the Swede, at the time of
my own return. This person agreed to take me as chief
mate, and I shipped accordingly. The Belle Savage was a
regular Curacoa trader, and we sailed ten or twelve days
after the Hippomenes got in. Our passages both ways were
pleasant and safe, and I stuck by the craft, endeavouring to
be less thoughtless and careless about myself. I cannot
say, however, I had any very serious plans for making
provision for old age, my maxim being to live as I went
along.
Our second passage out to Curaoa, in the Belle Savage,
was pleasant, and brought about nothing worthy of being
mentioned. At Curaoa we took in mahogany, and in so
doing a particularly large log got away from us, and slid,
end on, against the side of the vessel. We saw no
consequences
at the time, and went on to fill up, with different
articles, principally dye-woods, coffee, cocoa, &c. We got
some passengers, among whom was a Jew merchant, who
had a considerable amount of money on board. When
ready, we sailed, being thirty souls in all, crew and
passengers
included.
The Belle Savage had cleared the islands, and was
standing
on her course, one day, with a fair wind and a five or
six knot breeze, under a fore-top-mast studding-sail,
everything
looking bright and prosperous. The brig must have
been about a day's run to the southward of Bermuda. It
was my watch below, but having just breakfasted, I was on
deck, and looking about me carelessly, I was struck with
the appearance of the vessel's being deeper than common.
I had a little conversation about it, with a man in the
forechains
,
who thought the same thing. This man leaned over,
in order to get a better look, when he called out that he
could see that we had started a butt! I went over,
immediately
,
and got a look at this serious injury. A butt had
started, sure enough, just under the chains, but so low down
as to be quite out of our reach. The plank had started
quite an inch, and it was loosened as much as two feet,
forward and aft. We sounded the pumps, as soon as
possible
,
and found the brig was half full of water!
All hands were now called to get both the boats afloat,
and there was certainly no time to be lost. The water rose
over the cabin-floor while we were doing it. We did not
stand to get up tackles, but cut away the rail and launched
the long-boat by hand. We got the passengers, men,
women
,
children, and servants into her, as fast as possible, and
followed ourselves. Fortunately, there had been a brig in
company for some time, and she was now less than two
leagues ahead of us, outsailing the Belle Savage a little. We
had hoisted our ensign, union down, as a signal of distress,
and well knew she must see that our craft had sunk, after
it happened, if she did not observe our ensign. She
perceived
the signal, however, and could not fail to notice the
manner in which the brig was all adrift, as soon as we
deserted
the helm. The strange brig had hauled up for us,
even before we got out the launch. This rendered any
supply
of food or water unnecessary, and we were soon ready
to shove off. I was in the small boat, with three men. We
pulled off a little distance, and lay looking at our sinking
craft with saddened eyes. Even the gold, that precious dust
which lures so many souls to eternal perdition, was
abandoned
in the hurry to save the remnants of lives to be passed
on earth. The Belle Savage settled quite slowly into the
ocean, one sail disappearing after another, her main-royal
being the last thing that went out of sight, looking like the
lug of a man-of-war's boat on the water. It is a solemn
thing to see a craft thus swallowed up in the great vortex
of the ocean.
The brig in sight proved to be the Mary, of New York,
from St. Thomas, bound home. She received us kindly,
and six days later landed us all at no great distance from
Fulton Market. When my foot touched the wharf, my
whole estate was under my hat, and my pockets were as
empty as a vessel with a swept hold. On the wharf, itself,
I saw a man who had been second-mate of the Tontine, the
little ship in which I had sailed when I first ran from the
Sterling. He was now master of a brig called the Mechanic,
that was loading near by, for Trinidad de Cuba. He
heard my story, and shipped me on the spot, at nine dollars
a month, as a forward hand. I began to think I was born
to bad luck, and being almost naked, was in nowise
particular
what became of me. I had not the means of getting
a mate's outfit, though I might possibly have got credit; but
at no period of my life did I run in debt. Here, then, my
craft got stern-way on her again, and I had a long bit of
rough water to go over.
The Mechanic sailed four or five days after the Mary
arrived, and I travelled the old road over again. Nothing
happened until we got to the southward of Cuba. But my
bad luck had thrown me into the West India trade at the
very moment when piracy was coming to its height in those
seas, though I never thought on the subject at all. Off the
Isle of Pines, one morning, we made a schooner and a sloop,
inshore of us, and both bore up in chase. We knew them
to be pirates, and crowded sail dead before the wind to get
clear. The captain determined, if necessary, to run down
as far as Jamaica, where he expected to fall in with some
of the English cruisers. The schooner sailed very fast, and
was for coming up with us, but they made the mistake of
setting a flying-topsail on board her, and from that moment
we dropped her. It was thought in our brig, that the little
craft buried too much, with such a pressure aloft. The
chase lasted all day, a Sunday, and a part of the night; but
the following morning nothing was to be seen of either of
our pursuers. Our captain, whose name was Ray, thought
he knew who commanded the schooner, a man who had
been his enemy, and it was believed the pirates knew our
brig, as she was a regular trader to Trinidad. This made
our captain more ticklish, and was the reason he was off so
soon.
When we found the coast clear, we hauled up, again, and
made our port without further molestation. The chase was
so common a thing, that little was said about the affair. We
discharged, took in a new cargo, and sailed for home in due
time. Care was had in sailing at an early hour, and we sent
a boat out to look if the coast were clear, before we put to
sea. We met with no interruption, however, reaching New
York in due time.
Captain Ray was desirous I should stick by the brig; but,
for some reason I cannot explain, I felt averse to returning
to Trinidad. I liked the vessel well enough, was fond of
the captain, and thought little of the pirates; and yet I felt
an unaccountable reluctance to re-shipping in the craft. It
was well I had this feeling, for, I have since heard, this very
schooner got the brig the next passage out, murdered all
hands, and burnt the vessel, in sight of the port! I set this
escape down, as one of the many unmerited favours I have
received from Providence.
My next berth was that of second-mate on board a new
ship, in the Charleston trade, called the Franklin. I made
the voyage, and, for a novelty, did not run in the southern
port, which was a rare circumstance in that place.
I got but twelve dollars, as dickey, in the Franklin, and
left her to get twenty, with the same berth, on board a ship
called the Foster, commanded by the same master as had
commanded the Jane, in my former voyage to Ireland.
The Foster was bound to Belfast, which port we reached
without any accident. We took in salt, and a few boxes of
linens, for Norfolk; arrived safe, discharged, and went up
the James river to City Point, after a cargo of tobacco.
13
Thence we sailed for Rotterdam. The ship brought back a
quantity of gin to New York, and this gin caused me some
trouble. We had a tremendous passage homeone of the
worst I ever experienced at sea. The ship's rudder got
loose, and was secured with difficulty. We had to reef all
three of our top-masts, also, to save the spars; after which
we could only carry double-reefed topsails. It was in the
dead of winter, and the winds hung to the westward for a
long time. The cook, a surly negro, was slack in duty, and
refused to make scous for us, though there were plenty of
potatoes on board. All the people but five were off duty,
and it came hard on those who kept watch. We determined,
at length, to bring the black to his senses, and I had him
seized to the windlass. Everybody but the captain took
three clips at him; the fellow being regularly cobbed,
according
to sea usage. This was lawful punishment for a cook.
We got our scous after this, but the negro logged the
whole transaction, as one may suppose. He was
particularly
set against me, as I had been ringleader in the cobbing.
The weather continued bad, the watches were much fagged,
and the ship gave no grog. At length I could stand it no
longer, or thought I could not; and I led down betwixt decks,
tapped a cask of gin, introduced the stem of a clean pipe,
and took a nip at the bowl. All my watch smoked this pipe
pretty regularly, first at one cask and then at another, until
we got into port. The larboard watch did the same, and I
do think the strong liquor helped us along that time. As
bad luck would have it, the cook's wood was stowed among
the casks, and, one morning, just as the last of us had
knocked off smoking, we saw the wool of this gentleman
heaving in sight, through the hatch by which we went down.
Still, nothing was said until we came to be paid off, when
the darky came out with his yarn. I owned it all, and
insisted
we never could have brought the ship in, unless we
had got the gin. I do believe both captain and owner were
sorry we had been complained of, but they could not
overlook
the matter. I was mulcted five-and-twenty dollars, and
left the ship. I know I did wrong, and I know that the
owners did what was right; but I cannot help thinking, bad
as gin is on a long pull, that this did us good. I was not
driven from the ship; on the contrary, both master and
owners wished me to remain; but I felt a little savage, and
quitted their employment.
That I did not carry a very bad character away with me,
is to be proved by the fact that I shipped, the same day, on
board the Washington, a vessel bound to London, and which
lay directly alongside of the Foster. I had the same berth
as that I had just left, with the advantage of getting better
wages. This voyage carried me to London for the first time
since I left it in the Sterling. Too many years had elapsed,
in the interval, for me to find any old acquaintances; and I
had grown from a boy to a man. Here I got a little insight
into the business of carrying passengers, our ship bringing
more or less, each passage. I stuck by the Washington a
year, making no less than three voyages in her; the last, as
her chief mate. Nothing occurred worth mentioning in the
four first passages across the Atlantic; but the fifth
produced
a little more variety.
The Washington had proved to be a leaky ship, every
passage I made in her. We had docked her twice in
London
,
and it had done her good. The first week out, on the
fifth passage, the ship proved tight, but the weather was
moderate
.
It came on to blow heavily, however, when we got
to the eastward of the Banks; and the vessel, which was
scudding under her close-reefed main-topsail and foresail,
laboured so much, that I became uneasy. I knew she was
overloaded, and was afraid of the effects of a gale. It was
my practice to keep one pump ready for sounding the wells,
and I never neglected this duty in my watch. When the
gale was at the height, in my forenoon's watch below, I felt
so uncomfortable, that I turned out and went on deck, in
nothing
but my trowsers, to sound, although I had sounded less
than two hours before, and found the water at the
sucking-height
,
only. To my surprise, it was now three feet!
This change was so great and so sudden, all of us thought
there must be some mistake. I carried the rod below, to dry
it, and covered the lower part with ashes. I could not have
been busy in drying the rod more than ten or fifteen minutes,
when it was lowered again. The water had risen several
inches in that short period!
All this looked very serious; and I began to think a third
craft was to founder under me. After a short consultation,
it was determined to lighten the ship. The foresail was
hauled up, the men got into the rigging to keep clear of the
seas, and the vessel was rounded-to. We then knocked
away the wash-boards in the wake of the two hatches, and
began to tumble the barrels of turpentine on deck. I never
felt so strong in my life, nor did so much work in so short a
time. During the labour I went below to splice the
main-brace
,
and, after putting a second-mate's nip of brandy into my
glass, filled it, as I supposed, with water, drinking it all down
without stopping to breathe. It turned out that my water
was high-proof gin; yet this draught had no more effect on
me than if it had been so much cold water. In ordinary
times, it would have made me roaring drunk.
We tumbled up all the cargo from betwixt decks, landing
it on deck, where it rolled into the sea of itself, and were
about to begin upon the lower hold, when the captain called
out avast, as the pumps gained fast. Half an hour later,
they sucked. This was joyful news, indeed, for I had
begun
to think we should be driven to the boats. Among the
cargo were some pickled calf-skins. In the height of the
danger I caught the cook knocking the head out of a cask,
and stowing some of the skins in a tub. Asking the reason
why he did this, he told me he wanted to take some of those
fine skins home with him! It was a pity they should be
lost!
As soon as the pumps sucked, the ship was kept away to
her course, and she proved to be as tight as a bottle. Eight
or ten days later, while running on our course under
studding-sails
,
we made a large vessel ahead, going before the
wind like ourselves, but carrying reefed topsails, with
top-gallant-sails
over them, and her ensign whipped. Of course
we neared her fast, and as we came up with her, saw that
she was full of men, and that her crew were pumping and
bailing. We knew how to pity the poor fellows, and
running
alongside, demanded the news. We were answered
first with three cheers, after which we heard their story.
The vessel was an English bark, full of soldiers, bound
to New Brunswick. She had sprung a leak, like ourselves,
and was only kept afloat by constant pumping and bailing.
She had put back for England on account of the wind and
the distance. Our captain was asked to keep near the
transport
,
and we shortened sail accordingly. For three days
and nights the two vessels ran side by side, within hail;
our passengers and officers drinking to theirs, and
vice vers
,
at dinner. On the fourth day, the weather being fine, the
wind fair, and our reckoning making us near the channel,
we told the Englishman we would run ahead, make the land,
and heave-to. We stood in so far that the poor fellows
owned afterwards they thought we had left them. This was
not our intention, however, for we no sooner made the land
than we hauled up, and brought them the joyful news of its
vicinity. They cheered us again, as we closed with them,
and both ships jogged on in company.
Next morning, being well in with the land, and many
vessels in sight, the Englishmen desired us to make sail, as
they could carry their bark into Falmouth. We did so,
and reached London, in due time. On our return to New
York, the Washington was sold, and I lost my preferment
in that employment, though I went with a character to
another
vessel, and got the same berth.
CHAPTER XIII.
My
next craft was the Camillus, a ship that was bound
to Greenock, via Charleston. We got to the latter port
without accident, and took in a cargo of cotton. The ship
was all ready for sailing of a Saturday, and the captain had
gone ashore, telling me he would be on board early in the
morning, when we could haul out and go to sea, should the
wind be favourable. I gave the people their Saturday's
night, and went into the cabin to freshen the nip, myself.
I took a glass or two, and certainly had more in me than is
good for a man, though I was far from being downright
drunk. In a word, I had too much, though I could have
carried a good deal more, on a pinch. The steward had
gone ashore, and there being no second-mate, I was all
alone.
In this state of things, I heard a noise, and went on deck
13 *
to inquire what was the matter. My old ship, the
Franklin
,
was shifting her berth, and her jib-boom had come foul
of our taffrail. After some hailing, I got on the taffrail to
shove our neighbour off, when, by some carelessness of my
own, I fell head-foremost, hitting the gunwale of the boat,
which was hanging, about half way up to the davits, into
the water. The tide set me away, and carried me between
the wharf and the ship astern of us, which happened to be
the William Thompson, Captain Thompson, owner
Thompson
,
mate Thompson, and all Thompson, as Mathews used
to have it. Captain Thompson was reading near the cabin
windows, and he luckily heard me groan. Giving the
alarm, a boat was got round, and I taken in. As the
night was dark, and I lost all consciousness after the fall, I
consider this escape as standing second only to that from
the shark in the West Indies, and old Trant's gun, the
night the Scourge went down. I did not recover my
recollection
for several hours. This was not the effect of liquor,
but of the fall, as I remember everything distinctly that
occurred
before I went from the taffrail. Still I confess that
liquor did all the mischief, as I had drunk just enough to
make me careless.
In the morning, I found myself disabled in the left
arm, and I went to a doctor. This gentleman said he
never told a fellow what ailed him until he got his whack.
I gave him a dollar, and he then let me into the secret.
My collar-bone was broken. And, now, says he, for
another dollar I'll patch you up. I turned out the other
Spaniard, when he was as good as his word. Going in the
ship, however, was out of the question, and I was obliged
to get a young man to go on board the Camillus in my
place; thus losing the voyage and my berth.
I was now ashore, with two or three months of drift
before
me. Since the time I joined the Washington, I had
been going regularly ahead, and I do think had I been able
to stick by the Camillus, I might have brought up a master.
I had laid up money, and being employed while in port,
I was gradually losing my taste for sailor amusements,
and getting more respect for myself. That fall from the
taffrail was a sad drawback for me, and I never recovered
the lee-way it brought about.
I was more than two months ashore, behaving myself
rationally on account of my arm. At the end of that time,
I went on board the Sally, a ship also bound to Greenock,
as her second-mate. This vessel belonged to Charleston,
and it was intended she should return to her own port. The
voyage turned out well, and my arm got as strong as ever.
On reaching Charleston, I left the craft, which was laid up,
and shipped in a schooner of the same name, bound to St.
Domingo, as her chief mate. This was no great craft,
certainly
,
though she proved a tight, wholesome sea-boat. We
went out without any accident, arriving in safety at Cape
Henry. After discharging cargo, and smuggling on board
a quantity of doubloons  four hundred and eighty, it was
said  we got under way for the island of Cuba. We
intended
to go into Matanzas, and kept along the coast. After
crossing the Windward Passage, we reached Cuba; and
were standing on, with a light wind, under our squaresail,
the morning of the third day out, when we saw a large boat,
carrying two sails, standing out from the shore, evidently in
chase of the schooner. We had on board eight souls, viz.
the owner, a Frenchman, who had been a dragoon in the
service of his own country, but who was now between
seventy
and eighty; the captain, myself, a boy, the cook, and
four men forward. We could see that there were nine men
in the boat. We had no arms in the schooner, not even a
pistol, and the men in the boat had muskets. We did not
ascertain this last fact, however, for some time. I thought
the strangers pirates the moment I saw them come out from
under the land, but the captain maintained that they were
turtle-men. The boat was rowing, and came up with us,
hand over hand. When near, they commenced firing
muskets
at us, to drive us below. All the crew forward, with
the cook, ran down into the forecastle, leaving no one on
deck but the captain, the old Frenchman, and myself. The
boy got into the companion-way.
What the others did on deck, as these gentry came
alongside
,
amusing themselves with keeping up a smart fire of
musketry, I do not know; but my own occupation was to
dodge behind the foremast. It was not long, however,
before
they came tumbling in, and immediately got possession
of the schooner. One or two came forward and secured the
forecastle hatch, to keep the people down. Then they
probably
felt that they were masters. One chap drew a
fearful-looking
knife, long, slender, sharp and glittering, and he
cut the halyards of the square-sail. All the men I saw in
the schooner struck me as Americans, or English, affecting
to be Spaniards. There is such a difference in the height,
complexion, and general appearance of the people of Spain,
and those of the two other countries, without reference to
the manner of speaking, that I do not think I could be
mistaken
.
I saw but one man among these pirates, whom I
took for a real Spaniard. It is true their faces were all
blacked to disguise them, but one could get enough glimpses
of the skin to judge of the true colour. There was no negro
among them.
The chap who cut away the square-sail halyards, I felt
certain was no Spaniard. The sail was no sooner down,
than he ran his knife along the head, below the bolt-rope, as
if to cut away the cloth with the least trouble to himself. I
was standing near, and asked him why he destroyed the
sail; if he wanted it, why he did not take it whole? At
this, he turned short round upon me, raised his arm, and
struck a heavy blow at me with his fearful-looking knife.
The point of the deadly weapon struck square on my
breast-bone
!
I fell, partly through the force of the blow, and
partly from policy; for I thought it safest to be lying on
my back. I got several hearty kicks, in addition to this
fierce attack, together with sundry curses in broken Spanish.
I spoke in English, of course; and that the man understood
me was clear enough by the expression of his countenance,
and his act. The wound was slight, though it bled a good
deal, covering my shirt and trowsers with blood, as much as
if I had been run through the heart. An inch or two, either
way, in the direction of the knife, would certainly have
killed me.
I do not know what might have been the end of this
affair, had not one of the pirates come forward, at this
critical
instant, and checked my assailant by shaking a finger
at him. This man, I feel very certain, I knew. I will not
mention his name, as there is a doubt; but I cannot think I
was mistaken. If I am right, he was a young man from
Connecticut, who sailed one voyage to Liverpool with me in
the Sterling. With that young man I had been very
intimate
,
and was oftener with him ashore than with any other
of the crew. His face was blackened, like those of all his
companions, but this did not conceal his air, manner, size,
eyes and voice. When he spoke, it was in a jargon of
broken English and broken Spanish, such as no man
accustomed
to either language from infancy would have used.
The same was true as to all the rest I heard speak, with the
exception of an old fellow in the boat, whom I shall presently
have occasion to mention, again.
The man I took to be my old shipmate, also seemed to
know me. I was but a lad when I quitted the Sterling, it is
true; but they tell me I have not altered a great deal in
general appearance. My hair is still black; and then, when
I was in the very prime of life, it must have been easy to
recognize me. So strongly was I impressed, at the time,
that I saw an old acquaintance, I was about to call him by
name, when, luckily, it crossed my mind this might be
dangerous
.
The pirates wished clearly to be unknown, and it
was wisest to let them think they were so. My supposed
shipmate, however, proved my friend, and I received no
more personal ill treatment after he had spoken to his
companion
.
I sometimes think he was the means, indeed, of
saving all our lives. He asked me if there was any money,
and, on my denying it, he told me they knew better: the
schooner was in ballast, and must have got something for
her outward cargo. I refused to tell, and he ordered me
into their boat, whither the captain had been sent before me.
In doing all this, his manner wore an appearance, to me, of
assumed severity.
The poor old Frenchman fared worse. They seemed to
know he was owner, and probably thought he could give
the best account of the money. At any rate, he was
unmercifully
flogged, though he held out to the last, refusing
to betray his doubloons. The boy was next attacked with
threats of throwing him overboard. This extracted the
secret
,
and the doubloons were soon discovered.
The captain and myself had been stowed under a
half-deck
,
in the boat, but as soon as the money was found, the
old Spaniard, who stood sentinel over us, was told to let us
out, that we might see the fun. There were the eight
scoundrels
,
paraded around the trunk of the schooner, dividing
the doubloons. As soon as this was done, we were told to
come alongside with our boat, which had been used to carry
us to the piratical craft. The captain got on board the Sally
and I was ordered to scull the rogues, in one gang, back to
their own craft. The scamps were in high spirits, seeming
much pleased with their haul. They cracked a good many
jokes at our expense, but were so well satisfied with their
gold, that they left the square-sail behind them. They had
robbed the cabin, however, carrying off, for me, a quadrant,
a watch, and a large portion of my clothes. The
forecastle
had not been entered, though the men had four hundred
dollars lying under a pile of dirt and old junk, to keep them
out of sight.
My supposed ship-mate bore me in mind to the last. When
we reached his craft, he poured out a glass of brandy and
offered it to me. I was afraid to drink, thinking it might
be poisoned. He seemed to understand me, and swallowed
it himself, in a significant manner. This gave me courage,
and I took the next nip without hesitation. He then told
me to shove off, which I did without waiting for a second
order. The pirates pulled away at the same time.
We were a melancholy party, as soon as we found ourselves
left to ourselves. The old Frenchman was sad enough, and
all of us pitied him. He made no complaint of the boy,
notwithstanding, and little was said among us about the
robbery
.
My wound proved trifling, though the old man was
so bruised and beaten that he could scarcely walk.
As soon as a breeze came, we went into Charleston,
having
no means to buy the cargo we had intended to get at
Matanzas. This was the first time I was ever actually
boarded by a pirate, although I had had several narrow
escapes before. The first was in the Sterling, off the coast
of Portugal; the next was in the William and Jane,
outward
bound to Canton; the third was on the bank, in the
Trio, off the coast of Java; and the fourth, in the Mechanic,
on the other side of Cuba. It was not the last of my affairs
with them, however, as will be seen in the sequel.
I went out in the Sally again, making a voyage to
Matanzas
and back, without any accident, or incident, worth
mentioning. I still intended to remain in this schooner, the
captain and I agreeing perfectly well, had I not been driven
out of her by one of those unlucky accidents, of which so
many have laid me athwart-hawse.
We were discharging sugar at Charleston, in very heavy
casks. The tide being in, the vessel's rail was higher than
the wharf, and we landed the casks on the rail, from which
they were rolled down some planks to the shore. Two
negroes
were stationed on the wharf to receive the casks, and
to ease them down. One of these fellows was in the
practice
of running up the planks, instead of standing at their
side and holding on to the end of the hogsheads. I
remonstrated
with him several times about the danger he ran, but
he paid no attention to what I said. At length my words
came true; a cask got away from the men, and rolled
directly
over this negro, flattening him like a bit of dough.
This was clearly an accident, and no one thought of
accusing
me of any connection with it. But the owner of the
black looked upon him as one would look upon a hack-horse
that had been lamed, or killed; and he came down to the
schooner, on hearing that his man was done for, swearing
I should pay for him! As for paying the price of an
athletic
nigger, it was even more impossible for me, than it
would seem it is for the great State of Pennsylvania to pay
the interest on its debt; and, disliking a lawsuit, I carried
my dunnage on board another vessel that same afternoon,
and agreed to work my passage to New York, as her
second-mate
.
The vessel I now went on board of was the Commodore
Rodgers, a regular liner between the two ports. We sailed
next morning, and I paid for the poor nigger with the
fore-topsail. The ship's husband was on board as we hauled
out, a man who was much in the habit of abusing the mates.
On this occasion he was particularly abusive to our chief
mate; so much so, indeed, that I remonstrated with the
latter
on his forbearance. Nothing came of it, however, though
I could not forget the character of the man who had used
such language. When we reached New York, our chief
mate left us, and I was offered the berth. It was a little
hazardous to go back to Charleston, but wages were low,
and business dull, the yellow fever being in New York; and
I thought, by a little management, I might give my nigger
owner a sufficient berth. I accordingly agreed to go.
When we got back to Charleston, our ship lay at her own
wharf, and I saw nothing of my chap. He worked up town,
and we lay low down. But another misfortune befel me,
that led even to worse consequences. The ship's husband,
who was so foul-mouthed, was as busy as ever,
blackguarding
right and left, and finding fault with everything. Our
cargo was nearly out, and this man and I had a row about
some kegs of white lead. In the course of the dialogue, he
called me a saucy son of a bh. This was too much
for my temper, and I seized him and sent him down the
hatchway. The fall was not great, and some hemp lay in
the wake of the hatch; but the chap's collar-bone went. He
sung out like a singing-master, but I did not stop to chime
in. Throwing my slate on deck in a high passion, I left the
ship and went ashore. I fell in with the captain on the
wharf, told him my story, got a promise from him to send
me my clothes, and vanished. In an hour or two, half the
constables in Charleston were in chase of me. I kept so
close they could not find me, lying snug for a couple of days.
This state of things could not last for ever. The
constables
were not half so ferocious as they seemed; for one
of them managed to get me off, on board a coaster, called
the Gov. Russel; where I engaged, I may say, as chief
mate and all hands. The Gov. Russel was a Buford trader,
making trips about fifteen or twenty leagues long. This was
the smallest navigation, and the smallest craft, a gun-boat
excepted, with which I ever had anything to do. The crew
consisted of two negroes, both slaves to the owner; while
the captain and myself were aft. Whether she would have
held so many, or not, I never knew, as the captain did not
join, while I belonged to her. The schooner lay three
miles below the town; and, in so much, was a good craft for
me; as no one would think of following an old Canton
trader into such a 'long-shore-looking thing. We busied
ourselves in painting her, and in overhauling her rigging;
while the ship's husband, and his myrmidons, amused
themselves
in searching for me up in town.
I had been on board the Gov. Russel three days, when it
came on to blow from the southward and westward, in true
southern style. The gale came on butt-end foremost; and
was thought to be as severe, as anything seen in the port
for many a year. Most of the shipping broke adrift from
the wharves; and everything that was anchored, a
man-of-war
and a revenue-cutter excepted, struck adrift, or dragged.
As for ourselves, we were lying at single anchor; and soon
began to walk down towards the bar. I let go the spare
anchor; but she snapped her cables, as if they had been
pack-thread; and away she went to leeward. Making sail
was out of the question, had any been bent, as ours were
not; and I had to let her travel her own road.
All this happened at night; when it was so dark, one
could not see, between the spray, the storm and the hour,
the length of the craft. I knew we were going towards the
ocean; and my great cause of apprehension was the bar.
Looking for the channel, was out of the question; I did not
know it, in the first place; and, had I been a branch-pilot,
I could not find it in the dark. I never was more completely
adrift, in my life, ashore or afloat. We passed a most
anxious hour, or two; the schooner driving, broadside-to, I
knew not whither, or to what fate. The two blacks were
frightened out of their wits; and were of no assistance to
me.
At length, I felt the keel come down upon the sands; and
then I knew we were on the bar. This happened amid a
whirlwind of spray; with nothing visible but the white foam
of the waters, and the breakers around us. The first blow
threw both masts out of the steps; ripping up the decks to a
considerable extent. The next minute we were on our
beam-ends; the sea making a clear breach over us. All we
could do, was to hold on; and this we did with difficulty.
I and the two blacks got on the weather-quarter of the
schooner, where we lashed ourselves with the main-sheet.
As this was a stout rope, something must part, before we
could be washed away. The craft made but two raps on
the bar, when she drifted clear.
I now knew we were at sea, and were drifting directly off
the coast. As we got into deep water, the sea did not make
such terrible surges over us; though they continued to break
over our quarter. The masts were thumping away; but for
this I cared little, the hold being full of water already. Sink
14
we could not, having a swept hold, and being built, in a great
measure, of pine. The schooner floated with about five feet
of her quarter-deck above water. Her bows had settled the
most; and this gave us rather a better chance aft.
Fortunately, we got the worst of this blow at the first go
off. The wind began to lessen in strength soon after we
passed the bar, and by daylight it only blew a stiff breeze.
No land was in sight, though I knew, by the colour of the
water, that we could not be a very great distance from the
coast. We had come out on an ebb-tide, and this had set
us off the land, but all that southern coast is so low, that it
was not to be seen from the surface of the ocean at any
great distance.
The day that succeeded was sad and dreary enough.
The weather was fine, the sun coming out even hot upon
us, but the wind continued to blow fresh off the land, and
we were drifting further out, every instant, upon the bosom
of the ocean. Our only hope was in falling in with some
coaster, and I began to dread drifting outside of their track.
We were without food or water, and were partly seated on
the rail, and partly supported by the main-sheet. Neither
of us attempted to change his berth that day. Little was
said between us, though I occasionally encouraged the
negroes
to hold on, as something would yet pick us up. I had
a feeling of security on this head that was unreasonable,
perhaps; but a sanguine temperament has ever made me a
little too indifferent to consequences.
Night brought no change, unless it was to diminish the
force of the wind. A short time before the sun set, one of
the negroes said to me, Masser Ned, John gone. I was
forward of the two blacks, and was not looking at them at
the time; I suppose I may have been dozing; but, on
looking
up, I found that one of the negroes had, indeed,
disappeared
.
How this happened I cannot say, as he appeared
to be well lashed; but I suppose he worked himself free,
and being exhausted, he fell into the water, and sunk before
I could get a glimpse of him. There was nothing to be
done, however, and the loss of this man had a tendency to
make me think our situation worse than it had before
seemed
to be. Some persons, all good Christians I should
suppose
,
will feel some curiosity to know whether a man in my
situation had no disposition to take a religious view of his
case, and whether his conscience did not apprise him of the
chances of perdition that seemed to stare him in the face.
In answer to this, I am compelled to say that no such
thoughts came over me. In all my risks and emergencies,
I am not sensible of having given a thought to my Maker.
I had a sense of fear, an apprehension of death, and an
instinctive
desire to save my life, but no consciousness of the
necessity of calling on any being to save my soul.
Notwithstanding
all the lessons I had received in childhood, I
was pretty nearly in the situation of one who had never
heard the name of the Saviour mentioned. The extent of
my reflections on such subjects, was the self-delusion of
believing that I was to save myselfI had done no great
harm, according to the notions of sailors; had not robbed;
had not murdered; and had observed the mariner's code of
morals, so far as I understood them; and this gave me a
sort of
claim
on the mercy of God. In a word, the future
condition of my soul gave me no trouble whatever.
I dare say my two companions on this little wreck had
the same indifference on this subject, as I felt myself. I
heard no prayer, no appeal to God for mercy, nothing
indeed
from any of us, to show that we thought at all on the
subject. Hunger gave me a little trouble, and during the
second night I would fall into a doze, and wake myself up
by dreaming of eating meals that were peculiarly grateful
to me. I have had the same thing happen on other
occasions
,
when on short allowance of food. Neither of the
blacks said anything on the subject of animal suffering, and
the one that was lost, went out, as it might be, like a
candle
.
The sun rose on the morning of the second day bright and
clear. The wind shifted about this time, to a gentle breeze
from the southward and eastward. This was a little
encouraging
,
as it was setting the schooner in-shore again, but
I could discover nothing in sight. There was still a good
deal of sea going, and we were so low in the water, that
our range of sight was very limited.
It was late in the forenoon, when the negro called out,
suddenly, Massa Ned, dere a vessel! Almost at the
same instant, I heard voices calling out; and, looking round,
I saw a small coasting schooner, almost upon us. She was
coming down before the wind, had evidently seen us some
time before we saw her, and now ranged up under our lee,
and hove-to. The schooner down boat, and took us on
board without any delay. We moved with difficulty, and I
found my limbs so stiff as to be scarcely manageable. The
black was in a much worse state than I was myself, and I
think twelve hours longer would have destroyed both of us.
The schooner that picked us up was manned entirely with
blacks, and was bound into Charleston. At the time she
fell in with us, we must have been twenty miles from the
bar, it taking us all the afternoon, with a fair wind, to reach
it. We went below, and as soon as I got in the cabin, I
discovered a kettle of boiled rice, on which I pounced like a
hawk. The negroes wished to get it away from me,
thinking
I should injure myself; but I would not part with it.
The sweetest meal I ever had in my life, was this rice, a
fair portion of which, however, I gave to my companion.
We had not fasted long enough materially to weaken our
stomachs, and no ill consequences followed from the
indulgence
.
After eating heartily, we both lay down on the
cabin
floor, and went to sleep. We reached the wharf about
eight in the evening. Just within the bar, the schooner was
spoken by a craft that was going out in search of the Gov.
Russel. The blacks told her people where the wreck was
to be found, and the craft stood out to sea.
I was strong enough to walk up to my boarding-house,
where I went again into quarantine. The Gov. Russel was
found, towed into port, was repaired, and went about her
business, as usual, in the Buford trade. I never saw her or
her captain again, however. I parted with the negro that
was saved with me, on the wharf, and never heard anything
about him afterwards, either. Such is the life of a sailor!
I was still afraid of the constables. So much damage
had been done to more important shipping, and so many
lives lost, however, that little was said of the escape of the
Gov. Russel. Then I was not known in this schooner by
my surname. When I threw the ship's husband down the
hold, I was Mr. Myers; when wrecked in the coaster, only
Ned.
CHAPTER XIV.
Notwithstanding
my comparative insignificance, there
was no real security in remaining long in Charleston, and
it was my strong desire to quit the place. As beggars
cannot be choosers, I was glad to get on board the schooner
Carpenter, bound to St. Mary's and Philadelphia, for, and
with, ship-timber, as a foremast hand. I got on board
undetected
,
and we sailed the same day. Nothing occurred until
after we left St. Mary's, when we met with a singular
accident
.
A few days out, it blowing heavy at the time, our
deck-load pressed so hard upon the beams as to loosen them,
and the schooner filled as far as her cargoyellow pine
would allow. This calamity proceeded from the fact, that
the negroes who stowed the craft neglected to wedge up the
beams; a precaution that should never be forgotten, with a
heavy weight on deck. No very serious consequences
followed
,
however, as we managed to drive the craft ahead,
and finally got her into Philadelphia, with all her cargo on
board. We did not lose a stick, which showed that our
captain was game, and did not like to let go when he had
once got hold. This person was a down-easter, and was
well acquainted with the Johnstons and Wiscasset. He
tried hard to persuade me to continue in the schooner as
mate, with a view to carrying me back to my old friends;
but I turned a deaf ear to his advice. To own the truth, I
was afraid to go back to Wiscassett. My own desertion
could not well be excused, and then I was apprehensive the
family might attribute to me the desertion and death of
young Swett. He had been my senior, it is true, and was
as able to influence me as I was to influence him; but
conscience
is a thing so sensitive, that, when we do wrong, it is
apt to throw the whole error into our faces.
Quitting the Carpenter in Philadelphia, therefore, I went
to live in a respectable boarding-house, and engaged to go
out in a brig called the Margaret, working on board as a
rigger and stevedore, until she should be ready to sail. My
berth was to be that of mate. The owner of this brig was
as notorious, in his way, as the ship's husband in Charleston.
14 *
I had heard his character, and was determined, if he
attempted
to ride me, as he was said to do many of his mates,
and even captains, he should find himself mounted on a
hard-going animal. One day, things came to a crisis. The
owner was on the wharf, with me, and such a string of abuse
as he launched out upon me, I never before listened to. A
crowd collected, and my blood got up. I seized the man,
and dropped him off the wharf into the water, alongside of
some hoop-poles, that I knew must prevent any accident.
In this last respect, I was sufficiently careful, though the
ducking was very thorough. The crowd gave three cheers,
which I considered as a proof I was not so very wrong.
Nothing was said of any suit on this occasion; but I walked
off, and went directly on board a ship called the
Coromandel
,
on which I had had an eye, as a lee, for several days.
In this vessel I shipped as second-mate; carrying with me
all the better character for the ducking given to the
notorious
.
The Coromandel was bound to Cadiz, and thence round
the Horn. The outward bound cargo was flour, but to which
ports we were going in South America, I was ignorant. Our
crew were all blacks, the officers excepted. We had a good
passage, until we got off Cape Trafalgar, when it came on
to blow heavily, directly on end. We lay-to off the Cape
two days, and then ran into Gibraltar, and anchored. Here
we lay about a fortnight, when there came on a gale from
the south-west, which sent a tremendous sea in from the
Atlantic
.
This gale commenced in the afternoon, and blew
very heavily all that night. The force of the wind increased,
little by little, until it began to tell seriously among the
shipping
,
of which a great number were lying in front of the
Rock. The second day of the gale, our ship was pitching
bows under, sending the water aft to the taffrail, while many
other craft struck adrift, or foundered at their anchors. The
Coromandel had one chain cable, and this was out. It was
the only cable we used for the first twenty-four hours. As
the gale increased, however, it was thought necessary to let
go the sheet-anchor, which had a hempen cable bent to it.
Our chain, indeed, was said to be the first that was ever used
out of Philadelphia, though it had then been in the ship for
sometime, and had proved itself a faithful servant the voyage
before. Unfortunately, most of the chain was out before we
let go the sheet-anchor, and there was no possibility of
getting
out a scope of the hempen cable. Dragging on shore,
where we lay, was pretty much out of the question, as the
bottom shelved inward, and the anchor, to come home, must
have gone up hill.
[14]
[14]
A friend, who was then American Consul at Gibraltar, and an old
navy officer, tells me Ned is mistaken as to the nature of the
anchorage
.
The ship was a little too far out for the best holding ground.
The same friend adds that the character of this gale is not at all
overcharged
,
the vessels actually lost, including small craft of every
description
,
amounting to the every way extraordinary number of just three
hundred and sixty-five.
Editor
.
In this manner the Coromandel rode for two nights and
two days, the sea getting worse and worse, and the wind, if
anything, rather increasing. We took the weight of the
last in squalls, some of which were terrific. By this time
the bay was well cleared of craft, nearly everything having
sunk, or gone ashore. An English packet lay directly ahead
of us, rather more than a cable's length distant, and she held
on like ourselves. The Governor Brooks, of Boston, lay
over nearer to Algesiras, where the sea and wind were a little
broken, and, of course, she made better weather than
ourselves
.
About eight o'clock, the third night, I was in the cabin,
when the men on deck sung out that the chain had gone.
At this time the ship had been pitching her spritsail-yard
under water, and it blew a little hurricane. We were on
deck in a moment, all hands paying out sheet. We brought
the ship up with this cable, but not until she got it nearly to
the better end. Unfortunately, we had got into shoal water,
or what became shoal water by the depth of the troughs. It
was said, afterwards, we were in five fathoms water at this
time, but for this I will not vouch. It seems too much water
for what happened. Our anchor, however, did actually lie
in sixteen fathoms.
We had hardly paid out the cable, before the ship came
down upon the bottom, on an even keel, apparently, with a
force that almost threw those on deck off their feet. These
blows were repeated, from time to time, at intervals of
several
minutes, some of the thumps being much heavier than
others. The English packet must have struck adrift at the
same time with ourselves, for she came down upon us,
letting
go an anchor in a way to overlay our cable. I suppose
the rocks and this sawing together, parted our hempen
cable
,
and away we went towards the shore, broadside-to. As
the ship drifted in, she continued to thump; but, luckily for
us, the sea made no breaches over her. The old
Coromandel
was a very strong ship, and she continued working her
way in shore, until she lay in a good substantial berth,
without
any motion. We manned the pumps, and kept the ship
tolerably free of water, though she lay over considerably.
The English packet followed us in, going ashore more
towards
the Spanish lines. This vessel bilged, and lost some
of her crew. As for ourselves, we had a comfortable berth,
considering the manner in which we had got into it. No
apprehension was felt for our personal safety, and perfect
order was observed on board. The men worked as usual,
nor was there any extra liquor drunk.
That night the gale broke, and before morning it had
materially moderated. Lighters were brought alongside,
and we began to discharge our flour into them. The cargo
was all discharged, and all in good order, so far as the
water
was concerned; though several of the keelson bolts were
driven into the ground tier of barrels. I am almost afraid
to tell this story, but I know it to be true, as I released the
barrels with my own hands. As soon as clear, the ship was
hove off into deep water, on the top of a high tide, and was
found to leak so much as to need a shore-gang at the pumps
to keep her afloat. She was accordingly sold for the
benefit
of the underwriters. She was subsequently docked and
sent to sea.
Of course, this broke up our voyage. The captain
advised
me to take a second-mate's berth in the Governor
Brooks, the only American that escaped the gale, and I did
so. This vessel was a brig, bound round the Horn, also,
and a large, new craft. I know of no other vessel, that lay
in front of the Rock that rode out this gale; and she did it
with two hempen cables out, partly protected, however, by
a good berth. There was a Swede that came back next day
to her anchorage, which was said to have got back-strapped,
behind the Rock, by some legerdemain, and so escaped
also. I do not know how many lives were lost on this
occasion
;
but the destruction of property must have been very
great.
Three weeks after the gale, the Governor Brooks sailed.
We had a hard time in doubling the Cape, being a fortnight
knocking about between Falkland and the Main. We were
one hundred and forty-four days out, touching nowhere,
until
we anchored at Callao. We found flour, of which our
cargo was composed, at seven dollars a barrel, with seven
dollar duty. The Franklin 74, was lying here, with the
Aurora English frigate, the castle being at war with the
people
inland. Our flour was landed, and what became of it
is more than I can tell.
We now took in ballast, and ran down to Guayaquil.
Here an affair occurred that might very well have given me
the most serious cause of regret, all the days of my life.
Our steward was a Portuguese negro, of the most vicious
and surly temper. Most of the people and officers were
really afraid of him. One evening, the captain and chief
mate being both ashore, I was sitting on deck, idle, and I
took a fancy to a glass of grog. I ordered the steward,
accordingly, to pour me out one, and bring it up. The man
pretended that the captain had carried off the keys, and no
rum was to be had. I thought this a little extraordinary;
and, as one would be very apt to be, felt much hurt at the
circumstance. I had never been drunk in the craft, and
was not a drunkard in one sense of the term, at all;
seldom
drinking so as to affect me, except when on a frolic,
ashore.
As I sat brooding over this fancied insult, however, I
smelt rum; and looking down the sky-light, saw this same
steward passing forward with a pot filled with the liquor. I
was fairly blinded with passion. Running down, I met the
fellow, just as he was coming out of the cabin, and brought
him up all standing. The man carried a knife along his
leg, a weapon that had caused a good deal of uneasiness in
the brig, and he now reached down to get it. Seeing there
was no time to parley, I raised him from the floor, and threw
him down with great force, his head coming under. There
he lay like a log, and all my efforts with vinegar and water
had no visible effect.
I now thought the man dead. He gave no sign of life
that I could detect, and fear of the consequences came over
me. The devil put it into my head to throw the body
overboard
,
as the most effectual means of concealing what I had
done. The steward had threatened to run, by swimming,
more than once, and I believe had been detected in making
such an attempt; and I fancied if I could get the body
through one of the cabin-windows, it would seem as if he
had been drowned in carrying his project into execution. I
tried all I could first to restore the steward to life; but
failing
of this, I actually began to drag him aft, in order to force
his body out of a cabin-window. The transom was high,
and the man very heavy; so I was a good while in
dragging
the load up to the necessary height. Just as I got it
there, the fellow gave a groan, and I felt a relief that I had
never before experienced. It seemed to me like a reprieve
from the gallows.
I now took the steward down, upon one of the lower
transoms
,
where he sat rubbing his head a few minutes, I
watching
him closely the whole time. At length he got up, and
staggered out of the cabin. He went and turned in, and I
saw no more of him until next day. As it turned out, good,
instead of harm, resulted from this affair; the black being
ever afterwards greatly afraid of me. If I did not break his
neck, I broke his temper; and the captain used to threaten
to set me at him, whenever he behaved amiss. I owned the
whole affair to the captain and mate, both of whom laughed
heartily at what had happened, though I rejoiced, in my
inmost heart, that it was no worse.
The brig loaded with cocao, in bulk, at Guayaquil, and
sailed for Cadiz. The passage was a fine one, as we
doubled
the Horn at midsummer. On this occasion we beat
round the cape, under top-gallant-sails. The weather was
so fine, we stood close in to get the benefit of the currents,
after tacking, as it seemed to me, within a league of the
land. Our passage to Cadiz lasted one hundred and
forty-one
,
or two, days, being nearly the same length as that out,
though much smoother.
The French had just got possession of Cadiz, as we got
in, and we found the white flag flying. We lay here a
month, and then went round to the Rock. After passing a
week at Gibraltar, to take in some dollars, we sailed for
New Orleans, in ballast. As I had been on twenty-two
dollars a month, there was a pretty good whack coming to
me, as soon as we reached an American port, and I felt a
desire to spend it, before I went to sea again. They wished
me to stick by the brig, which was going the very same
voyage over; but I could not make up my mind to travel
so long a road, with a pocket full of money. I had passed
so many years at sea, that a short land cruise was getting
to be grateful, as a novelty.
The only craft I could get on board of, to come round
into my own latitude, in order to enjoy myself in the old
way, was an eastern schooner, called the James. On board
this vessel I shipped as mate, bound to Philadelphia. She
was the most meagre craft, in the way of outfit, I ever put
to sea in. Her boat would not swim, and she had not a
spare spar on board her. In this style, we went jogging
along north, until we were met by a north-west gale,
between
Bermuda and Cape Hatteras, which forced us to
heave-to. During this gale, I had a proof of the truth that
where the treasure is, there will the heart be also.
I was standing leaning on the rail, and looking over the
schooner's quarter, when I saw what I supposed to be a
plank come up alongside! The idea of sailing in a craft of
which the bottom was literally dropping out, was not very
pleasant, and I thought all was lost. I cannot explain the
folly of my conduct, except by supposing that my many
escapes at sea, had brought me to imagine I was to be
saved, myself, let what would happen to all the rest on
board. Without stopping to reflect, I ran below and
socured
my dollars. Tearing up a blanket, I made a belt,
and lashed about twenty-five pounds weight of silver to my
body, with the prospect before me of swimming two or
three hundred miles with it, before I could get ashore. As
for boat, or spars, the former would not float, and of the
last there was not one. I now look back on my acts of this
day with wonder, for I had forgotten all my habitual
knowledge
of vessels, in the desire to save the paltry dollars.
For the first and only time in my life I felt avaricious, and
lost sight of everything in money!
It was my duty to sound the pumps, but this I did not
deem necessary. No sooner were the dollars secure, or,
rather, ready to anchor me in the bottom of the ocean, than
I remembered the captain. He was asleep, and waking
him up, I told him what had happened. The old man, a
dry, drawling, cool, downeaster, laughed in my face for my
pains, telling me I had seen one of the sheeting-boards, with
which he had had the bottom of the schooner covered, to
protect it from the worms, at Campeachy, and that I need
be under no concern about the schooner's bottom. This
was the simple truth, and I cast off the dollars, again, with
a sneaking consciousness of not having done my duty. I
suppose all men have moments when they are not exactly
themselves, in which they act very differently from what it
has been their practice to act. On this occasion, I was not
alarmed for myself, but I thought the course I took was
necessary
to save that dross which lures so many to
perdition
.
Avarice blinded me to the secrets of my own trade.
I had come all the way from New Orleans to
Philadelphia
,
to spend my four hundred dollars to my satisfaction.
For two months I lived respectably, and actually began to
go to church. I did not live in a boarding-house, but in a
private family. My landlady was a pious woman, and a
member of the Dutch Reformed Church, but her husband
was a Universalist. I must say, I liked the doctrine of the
last the best, as it made smooth water for the whole cruise.
I usually went with the man to church of a morning, which
was falling among shoals, as a poor fellow was striving to
get into port. I received a great deal of good advice from
my landlady, however, and it made so much impression on
me as to influence my conduct; though I cannot say it really
touched my heart. I became more considerate, and better
mannered, if I were not truly repentant for my sins. These
two months were passed more rationally than any time of
mine on shore, since the hour when I ran from the Sterling.
The James was still lying in Philadelphia, undergoing
repairs, and waiting for freight; but being now ready for
sea, I shipped in her again, on a voyage to St. Thomas,
with a cargo of flour. When we sailed, I left near a
hundred
dollars behind me, besides carrying some money to sea;
the good effects of good company. At St. Thomas we
discharged, and took in ballast for Turk's Island, where we
got a cargo of salt, returning with it to Philadelphia. My
conduct had been such on board this schooner, that her
commander, who was her owner, and very old, having
determined
to knock off going to sea, tried to persuade me to
stick by the craft, promising to make me her captain as soon
as he could carry her down east, where she belonged. I
now think I made a great mistake in not accepting this offer,
though I was honestly diffident about my knowledge of
navigation
.
I never had a clear understanding of the lunars,
though I worked hard to master them. It is true,
chronometers
were coming into general use, in large vessels, and I
could work the time; but a chronometer was a thing never
heard of on board the James. Attachment to the larger
towns, and a dislike for little voyages, had as much influence
on me as anything else. I declined the offer; the only
direct one ever made me to command any sort of craft, and
remained what I am. I had a little contempt, too, for
vessels
of such a rig and outfit, which probably had its influence.
I liked rich owners.
On my return to Philadelphia, I found the family in which
I had last lived much deranged by illness. I got my money,
but was obliged to look for new lodgings. The respectable
people with whom I had been before, did not keep lodgers, I
being their only boarder; but I now went to a regular
sailor's
boarding-house. There was a little aristocracy, it is
true, in my new lodgings, to which none but mates, dickies,
and thorough salts came; but this was getting into the
hurricane
latitudes as to morals. I returned to all my old
habits, throwing the dollars right and left, and forgetting all
about even a Universalist church.
A month cleaned me out, in such company. I spent
every cent I had, with the exception of about fifteen dollars,
that I had laid by as nest-eggs. I then shipped as
second-mate
,
in the Rebecca Simms, a ship bound to St. Jago de
Cuba, with flour. The voyage lasted four months;
producing
nothing of moment, but a little affair that was
personal
to myself, and which cost me nearly all my wages.
The steward was a saucy black; and, on one occasion, in
bad weather, he neglected to give me anything warm for
breakfast. I took an opportunity to give him a taste of the
end of the main-clew-garnet, as an admonisher; and there
15
the matter ended, so long as I remained in the ship. It
seemed quite right, to all on board, but the steward. He
bore the matter in mind, and set a whole pack of quakers on
me, as soon as we got in. The suit was tried; and it cost
me sixty dollars, in damages, beside legal charges. I dare
say it was all right, according to law and evidence; but I
feel certain, just such a rubbing down, once a week, would
have been very useful to that same steward. Well-meaning
men often do quite as much harm, in this world, as the
evil-disposed
.
Philanthropists of this school should not forget,
that, if colour is no sufficient reason why a man should be
always wrong, it is no sufficient reason why he should be
always right.
The lawsuit drove me to sea, again, in a very short time.
Finding no better berth; and feeling very savage at the
blindness of justice, I shipped before the mast, in the
Superior
,
an Indiaman, of quite eight hundred tons, bound to
Canton. This was the pleasantest voyage I ever made to
sea, in a merchantman, so far as the weather, and, I may
say, usage, were concerned. We lost our top-gallant-masts,
homeward bound; but this was the only accident that
occurred
.
The ship was gone nine months; the passage from
Whampao to the capes having been made in ninety-four
days. When we got in, the owners had failed, and there
was no money forthcoming, at the moment. To remain,
and libel the ship, was dull business; so, leaving a power of
attorney behind me, I went on board a schooner, called the
Sophia, bound to Vera Cruz, as foremast Jack.
The Sophia was a clipper; and made the run out in a few
days. We went into Vera Cruz; but found it nearly
deserted
.
Our cargo went ashore a little irregularly;
sometimes
by day, and sometimes by night; being assorted, and
suited to all classes of customers. As soon as ready, we
sailed for Philadelphia, again; where we arrived, after an
absence of only two months.
I now got my wages for the Canton voyage; but they
lasted me only a fortnight! It was necessary to go to sea,
again; and I went on board the Caledonia; once more
bound to Canton. This voyage lasted eleven months; but,
like most China voyages, produced no event of importance.
We lost our top-gallant-masts, this time, too; but that is
nothing unusual, off Good Hope. I can say but little, in
favour of the ship, or the treatment.
On getting back to Philadelphia, the money went in the
old way. I occasionally walked round to see my good
religious
friends, with whom I had once lived, but they ceased
to have any great influence over my conduct. As soon as
necessary, I shipped in the Delaware, a vessel bound to
Savannah
and Liverpool. Southern fashion, I ran from this
vessel in Savannah, owing her nothing, however, but was
obliged to leave my protection behind, as it was in the
captain's
hands. I cannot give any reason but caprice for
quitting this ship. The usage was excellent, and the wages
high; yet run I did. As long as the Delaware remained in
port, I kept stowed away; but, as soon as she sailed, I
came out into the world, and walked about the wharves as
big as an owner.
I now went on board a ship called the Tobacco Plant,
bound to Liverpool and Philadelphia, for two dollars a month
less wages, worse treatment, and no grog. So much for
following the fashion. The voyage produced nothing to be
mentioned.
On my return to Philadelphia, I resolved to shift my
ground, and try a new tack. I was now thirty-four, and
began to give up all thoughts of getting a lift in my
profession
.
I had got so many stern-boards on me, every time I
was going ahead, and was so completely alone in the world,
that I had become indifferent, and had made up my mind to
take things as they offered. As for money, my rule had
come to be, to spend it as I got it, and go to sea for more.
If I tumbled overboard, I said to myself, there is none
to cry over me; therefore let things jog on their own
course. All the disposition to morality that had been
aroused within me, at Philadelphia, was completely gone,
and I thought as little of church and of religion, as ever.
It is true I had bought a Bible on board the Superior, and
I was in the practice of reading in it, from time to time,
though it was only the narratives, such as those of Sampson
and Goliah, that formed any interest for me. The history
of Jonah and the whale, I read at least twenty times. I
cannot remember that the morality, or thought, or devotion
of a single passage ever struck me on these occasions. In
word, I read this sacred book for amusement, and not for
light.
I now wanted change, and began to think of going back
to the navy, by way of novelty. I had been round the
world once, had been to Canton five times, doubling the
Cape, round the Horn twice, to Batavia once, the
West-Indies
,
on the Spanish main, and had crossed the Atlantic
so often, that I thought I knew all the mile-stones. I had
seen but little of the Mediterranean, and fancied a
man-of-war's
cruise would show me those seas. Most of the Tobacco
Plants had shipped in Philadelphia, and I determined to go
with them, to go in the navy. There is a fashion in all
things, and just then it was the fashion to enter in the service.
I was shipped by Lieutenant M'Kean, now Commander
M'Kean, a grandson of the old Governor of Pennsylvania,
as they tell me. All hands of us were sent on board the
Cyane, an English prize twenty-gun ship, where we
remained
about six weeks. A draft was then made, and more
than a hundred of us were sent round to Norfolk, in a sloop,
to join the Delaware, 80, then fitting out for the
Mediterranean
.
We found the ship lying alongside the Navy-yard
wharf, and after passing one night in the receiving-ship,
were sent on board the two-decker. The Delaware soon
hauled out, and was turned over to Captain Downes, the
very officer who had almost persuaded me to go in that
ill-fated
brig, the Epervier.
I was stationed on the Delaware's forecastle, and was
soon ordered to do second captain's duty. We had for
lieutenants on board, Mr. Ramage, first, Messrs.
Williamson
,
Ten Eick, Shubrick, Byrne, Chauncey, Harris, and
several whose names I have forgotten. Mr. Ramage has
since been cashiered, I understand; and Messrs. Ten Eick,
Shubrick, Chauncey, Harris, and Byrne, are now all
commanders
.
The ship sailed in the winter of 1828, in the month of
January I think, having on board the Prince of Musignano,
and his family, who were going to Italy. This gentleman
was Charles Bonaparte, eldest son of Lucien, Prince of
Canino, they tell me, and is now Prince of Canino himself.
He had been living some time in America, and got a
passage
in our ship, on account of the difficulty of travelling in
Europe, for one of his name and family. He was the first,
and only Prince I ever had for a shipmate.
CHAPTER XV.
Our
passage out in the Delaware was very rough, the
ship rolling heavily. It was the first time she had been at
sea, and it required some little time to get her trim and
sailing
.
She turned out, however, to be a good vessel; sailing
fairly, steering well, and proving an excellent sea-boat. We
went into Algesiras, where we lay only twenty-four hours.
We then sailed for Mahon, but were met by orders off the
port, to proceed to Leghorn and land our passengers. I
have been told this was done on account of the Princess of
Musignano's being a daughter of the ex-King of Spain, and
it was not thought delicate to bring her within the territory
of the reigning king. I have even heard that the
commodore
was offered an order of knighthood for the delicacy he
manifested on this occasion, which offer he declined
accepting
,
as a matter of course.
The ship had a good run from off Mahon to Leghorn,
where we anchored in the outer roads. We landed the
passengers
the afternoon of the day we arrived. That very
night it came on to blow heavily from the northward and
eastward, or a little off shore, according to the best of my
recollection. This was the first time I ever saw preparations
made to send down lower yards, and to house top-masts
merchantmen not being strong-handed enough to cut such
capers with their sticks. We had three anchors ahead, if
not four, the ship labouring a good deal. We lost one man
from the starboard forechains, by his getting caught in the
buoy-rope, as we let go a sheet-anchor. The poor fellow
could not be picked up, on account of the sea and the
darkness
of the night, though an attempt was made to save him.
The next day the weather moderated a little, and we got
under way for Mahon. Our passage down was pleasant,
and this time we went in. Captain Downes now left us, and
15 *
Commodore Crane hoisted his broad-pennant on board us.
The ship now lay a long time in port. The commodore
went aloft in one of the sloops, and was absent several
months. I was told he was employed in making a treaty
with the Turks, but us poor Jacks knew little of such
matters
.
On his return, there was a regular blow-up with the
first-lieutenant, who left the ship, to nobody's regret, so far
as I know. Mr. Mix, who had led our party to the lakes in
1812, and was with us in all my lake service, and who was
Mr. Osgood's brother-in-law, now joined us as
first-lieutenant
.
I had got to be first-captain of the forecastle, a berth
I held to the end of the cruise.
The treatment on board this ship was excellent. The
happiest time I ever spent at sea, was in the Delaware.
After
Mr. Mix took Mr. Ramage's place, everybody seemed
contented, and I never knew a better satisfied ship's
company
.
The third year out, we had a long cruise off Cape
de Gatte, keeping the ship under her canvass quite three
months. We took in supplies at sea, the object being to
keep us from getting rusty. On the fourth of July we had
a regular holiday. At four in the morning, the ship was
close in under the north shore, and we wore off the land.
Sail was then shortened. After this, we had music, and
more saluting and grog. The day was passed merrily, and
I do not remember a fight, or a black eye, in the ship.
I volunteered to go one cruise in the Warren, under Mr.
Byrne. The present Commodore Kearny commanded this
ship, and he took us down to the Rock. The reason of our
volunteering was this. The men-of-war of the Dutch and
the French, rendezvoused at Mahon, as well as ourselves.
The French and our people had several rows ashore.
Which was right and which wrong, I cannot say, as it was
the Java's men, and not the Delaware's, that were engaged
in them, on our side. One of the Javas was run through
the body, and a French officer got killed. It was said the
French suspected us of a design of sending away the man
who killed their officer, and meant to stop the Warren, which
was bound to the Rock on duty. All I know is, that two
French brigs anchored at the mouth of the harbour, and
some of us were called on to volunteer. Forty-five of us
did so, and went on board the sloop.
After the Warren got under way, we went to quarters,
manning both batteries. In this manner we stood down
between the two French brigs, with top-gallant-sails furled
and the courses in the brails. We passed directly between
the two brigs, keeping a broadside trained upon each; but
nothing was said, or done, to us. We anchored first at the
Rock, but next day crossed over to the Spanish coast. In
a short time we returned to Mahon, and we volunteers went
back to the Delaware. The two brigs had gone, but there
was still a considerable French force in port. Nothing came
of the difficulty, however, so far as I could see or hear.
In the season of 1830, the Constellation, Commodore
Biddle
,
came out, and our ship and Commodore were relieved.
We had a run up as far as Sicily, however, before this took
place, and went off Tripoli. There I saw a wreck, lying
across the bay, that they told me was the bones of the
Philadelphia
frigate. We were also at Leghorn, several weeks,
the commodore going to some baths in the neighbourhood,
for his health.
Among other ports, the Delaware visited Carthagena,
Malta, and Syracuse. At the latter place, the ship lay six
weeks, I should think. This was the season of our arrival
out. Here we underwent a course of severe exercise, that
brought the crew up to a high state of discipline. At four
in the morning, we would turn out, and commence our work.
All the manuvres of unmooring, making sail, reefing,
furling
,
and packing on her again, were gone through, until the
people got so much accustomed to work together, the great
secret of the efficiency of a man-of-war, that the officer of
the deck was forced to sing out belay! before the yards
were up by a foot, lest the men should spring the spars.
When we got through this drill, the commodore told us we
would do, and that he was not ashamed to show us
alongside
of anything that floated. I do not pretend to give our
movements in the order in which they occurred, however,
nor am I quite certain what year it was the commodore
went up to Smyrna. On reflection, it may have been later
than I have stated.
Our cruise off Cape de Gatte was one of the last things
we did; and when we came back to Mahon, we took in
supplies
for America. We made the southern passage home,
and anchored in Hampton Roads, in the winter of 1831.
I believe the whole crew of the Delaware was sorry when
the cruise was up. There are always a certain number of
'long-shore chaps in a man-of-war, who are never satisfied
with discipline, and the wholesome restraints of a ship; but
as for us old salts, I never heard one give the Delaware a
bad name. We had heard an awful report of the
commodore
,
who was called a burster, and expected sharp times
under him; and his manner of taking possession was of a
nature to alarm us. All hands had been called to receive
him, and the first words he said were Call all hands to
witness punishment. A pin might have been heard falling
among us, for this sounded ominous. It was to clear the
brig, only, Captain Downes having left three men in it,
whom he would not release on quitting the vessel. The
offences were serious, and could not be overlooked. These
three chaps got it; but there was only one other man brought
regularly to the gangway while I was in the ship, and he
was under the sentence of a court, and belonged to the
Warren
.
As soon as the brig was cleared, the commodore told
us we should be treated as we treated others, and then turned
away among the officers. The next day we found we were
to live under a just rule, and that satisfied us. One of the
great causes of the contentment that reigned in the ship, was
the method, and the regularity of the hours observed. The
men knew on what they could calculate, in ordinary times,
and this left them their own masters within certain hours.
I repeat, she was the happiest ship I ever served in, though
I have always found good treatment in the navy.
I can say conscientiously, that were my life to be passed
over again, without the hope of commanding a vessel, it
should be passed in the navy. The food is better, the
service
is lighter, the treatment is better, if a man behave
himself
at all well, he is better cared for, has a port under his
lee in case of accidents, and gets good, steady, wages, with
the certainty of being paid. If his ship is lost, his wages
are safe; and if he gets hurt, he is pensioned. Then he is
pretty certain of having gentlemen over him, and that is a
great deal for any man. He has good quarters below; and
if he serve in a ship as large as a frigate, he has a cover
over his head, half the time, at least, in bad weather. This
is the honest opinion of one who has served in all sorts of
crafts, liners, Indiamen, coasters, smugglers, whalers, and
transient ships. I have been in a ship of the line, two
frigates
,
three sloops of war, and several smaller craft; and
such is the result of all my experience in Uncle Sam's navy.
No man can go to sea and always meet with fair-weather;
but he will get as little of foul in one of our vessels of war,
as in any craft that floats, if a man only behave himself. I
think the American merchantmen give better wages than
are to be found in other services; and I think the American
men-of-war, as a rule, give better treatment than the
American
merchantman. God bless the flag, I say, and this, too,
without the fear of being hanged!
The Delaware lay two or three weeks in the Roads
before
she went up to the Yard. At the latter place we began
to strip the ship. While thus employed, we were told that
seventy-five of us, whose times were not quite out, were to
be drafted for the Brandywine 44, then fitting out at New
York, for a short cruise in the Gulf. This was bad news,
for Jack likes a swing ashore after a long service abroad.
Go we must, and did, however. We were sent round to
New York in a schooner, and found the frigate still lying at
the Yard. We were hulked on board the Hudson until she
was ready to receive us, when we were sent to our new
vessel
.
Captain Ballard commanded the Brandywine, and
among her lieutenants, Mr. M'Kenny was the first. This
is a fine ship, and she got her name from the battle in
which La Fayette was wounded in this country, having
been first fitted out to carry him to France, after his last
visit to America. She is a first-class frigate, mounting
thirty long thirty-two's on her gun-deck; and I conceive it
to be some honour to a sailor to have it in his power to say
he has been captain of the forecastle in such a ship, for I
was rated in this frigate the same as I had been rated in the
Delaware; with this difference, that, for my service in the
Brandywine, I received my regular eighteen dollars a month
as a petty officer; whereas, though actually captain of the
Delaware's forecastle for quite two years, and second-captain
nearly all the rest of the time I was in the ship, I never got
more than seaman's wages, or twelve dollars a month. I
do not know how this happened, though I supposed it to
have arisen from some mistake connected with the
circumstance
that I was paid off for my services in the Delaware,
by the purser of the frigate. This was in consequence of
the transfer.
The Brandywine sailed in March for the Gulf. Our cruise
lasted about five months, during which time we went to Vera
Cruz, Pensacola, and the Havana. We appeared to me to
be a single ship, as we were never in squadron, and saw no
broad-pennant. No accident happened, the cruise being
altogether pleasant. The ship returned to Norfolk, and
twenty-five of us, principally old Delawares, were
discharged
,
our times being out. We all of us intended to
return to the frigate, after a cruise ashore, and we chartered a
schooner to carry us to Philadelphia in a body, determining
not to part company.
The morning the schooner sailed, I was leading the whole
party along one of the streets of Norfolk, when I saw
something
white lying in the middle of the carriage-way. It
turned out to be an old messmate, Jack Dove, who had been
discharged three days before, and had left us to go to
Philadelphia
,
but had been brought up by King Grog. While we
were overhauling the poor fellow, who could not speak, his
landlady came out to us, and told us that he had eat nothing
for three days, and did nothing but drink. She begged us
to take care of him, as he disregarded all she said. This
honest woman gave us Jack's wages to a cent, for I knew
what they had come to; and we made a collection of ten
dollars for her, calculating that Jack must have swallowed
that much in three days. Jack we took with us, bag and
hammock; but he would eat nothing on the passage, calling
out constantly for drink. We gave him liquor, thinking it
would do him good; but he grew worse, and, when we
reached Philadelphia, he was sent to the hospital. Here, in
the course of a few days, he died.
Never, in all my folly and excesses, did I give myself so
much up to drink, as when I reached Philadelphia this time.
I was not quite as bad as Jack Dove, but I soon lost my
appetite, living principally on liquor. When we heard of
Jack's death, we proposed among ourselves to give him a
sailor's funeral. We turned out, accordingly, to the number
of a hundred, or more, in blue jackets and white trowsers,
and marched up to the hospital in a body. I was one of the
leaders in this arrangement, and felt much interest in it, as
Jack had been my messmate; but, the instant I saw his
coffin, a fit of the horrors came over me, and I actually
left the place, running down street towards the river, as if
pursued by devils. Luckily, I stopped to rest on the stoop
of a druggist. The worthy man took me in, gave me some
soda water, and some good advice. When a little
strengthened
,
I made my way home, but gave up at the door. Then
followed a severe indisposition, which kept me in bed for a
fortnight, during which I suffered the torments of the damned.
I have had two or three visits from the horrors, in the
course of my life, but nothing to equal this attack. I came
near following Jack Dove to the grave; but God, in His
mercy, spared me from such an end. It is not possible for
one who has never experienced the effects of his excesses, in
this particular form, to get any correct notions of the
sufferings
I endured. Among other conceits, I thought the colour
which the tar usually leaves on seamen's nails, was the sign
that I had the yellow fever. This idea haunted me for days,
and gave me great uneasiness. In short, I was like a man
suspended over a yawning chasm, expecting, every instant,
to fall and be dashed to pieces, and yet, who could not die.
For some time after my recovery, I could not bear the
smell of liquor; but evil companions lured me back to my
old habits. I was soon in a bad way again, and it was only
owing to the necessity of going to sea, that I had not a
return of the dreadful malady. When I shipped in the
Delaware, I had left my watch, quadrant, and good clothes,
to the value of near two hundred dollars, with my present
landlord, and he now restored them all to me, safe and
sound. I made considerable additions to the stock of clothes,
and when I again went to sea, left the whole, and more, with
the same landlord.
Our plan of going back to the Brandywine was altered by
circumstances; and a party of us shipped in the
Monongahela
,
a Liverpool liner, out of Philadelphia. The cabin of
this vessel was taken by two gentlemen, going to visit
Europe, viz.: Mr. Hare Powell and Mr. Edward Burd; and
getting these passengers, with their families, on board, the
ship sailed. By this time, I had pretty much given up the
hope of preferment, and did not trouble myself whether I
lived forward or aft. I joined the Monongahela as a forward
hand, therefore, quite as well satisfied as if her chief mate.
We left the Delaware in the month of August, and, a
short time out, encountered one of the heaviest gales of wind
I ever witnessed at sea. It came on from the eastward, and
would have driven us ashore, had not the wind suddenly
shifted to south-west. The ship was lying-to, under bare
poles, pressed down upon the water in such a way that she
lay almost as steady as if in a river; nor did the force of
the wind allow the sea to get up. A part of the time, our
lee lower yard-arms were nearly in the water. We had
everything aloft, but sending them down was quite out of
the question. It was not possible, at one time, for a man to
go aloft at all. I tried it myself, and could with difficulty
keep my feet on the ratlins. I make no doubt I should have
been blown out of the top, could I have reached it, did I let
go my hold to do any work.
We had sailed in company with the Kensington, a corvette
belonging to the Emperor of Russia, and saw a ship, during
the gale, that was said to be she. The Kensington was
dismasted
,
and had to return to refit, but we did not part a
rope-yarn. When the wind shifted, we were on soundings;
and, it still continuing to blow a gale, we set the
main-topsail
close-reefed, and the fore-sail, and shoved the vessel off
the land at the rate of a steam-boat. After this, the wind
favoured us, and our passage out was very short. We
stayed but a few days in Liverpool; took in passengers, and
got back to Philadelphia, after an absence of a little more
than two months. The Kensington's report of the gale, and
of our situation, had caused much uneasiness in
Philadelphia
,
but our two passages were so short, that we brought
the news of our safety.
I now inquired for the Brandywine, but found she had
sailed for the Mediterranean. It was my intention to have
gone on board her, but missing this ship, and a set of
officers
that I knew, I looked out for a merchantman. I found
a brig called the Amelia, bound to Bordeaux, and shipped
in her before the mast.
The Amelia had a bad passage out. It was in the
autumn
,
and the brig leaked badly. This kept us a great
deal at the pumps, an occupation that a sailor does
anything
but delight in. I am of opinion that pumping a leaky
ship is the most detestable work in the world. Nothing but
the dread of drowning ought to make a man do it, although
some men will pump to save their property. As for myself,
I am not certain I would take twenty-four hours of hard
pumping to save any sum I shall probably ever own, or ever
did own.
After a long passage, we made the Cordovan, but, the
wind blowing heavy off the land, we could not get in for
near a fortnight. Not a pilot would come out, and if they
had, it would have done us no good. After a while, the
wind shifted, and we got into the river, and up to the town.
We took in a return cargo of brandy, and sailed for
Philadelphia
.
Our homeward-bound passage was long and
stormy, but we made the capes, at last. Here we were
boarded by a pilot, who told us we were too late; the
Delaware
had frozen up, and we had to keep away, with a
south-east wind, for New York. We had a bad time of it,
as soon as night came on. The gale increased, blowing
directly into the bight, and we had to haul up under
close-reefed
topsails and reefed foresail, to claw off the land.
The weather was very thick, and the night dark, and all
we could do was to get round, when the land gave us a
hint it was time. This we generally did in five fathoms
water. We had to ware, for the brig would not tack under
such short canvass, and, of course, lost much ground in so
doing. About three in the morning we knew that it was
nearly up with us. The soundings gave warning of this,
and we got round, on what I supposed would be the Amelia's
last leg. But Providence took care of us, when we could
not help ourselves. The wind came out at north-west, as
it might be by word of command; the mist cleared up, and
we saw the lights, for the first time, close aboard us. The
brig was taken aback, but we got her round, shortened sail,
and hove her to, under a closed-reefed main-topsail. We
now got it from the north-west, making very bad weather.
The gale must have set us a long way to leeward, as we
did not get in for a fortnight. We shipped a heavy sea,
that stove our boat, and almost swept the decks. We were
out of pork and beef, and our fire-wood was nearly gone.
16
The binnacle was also gone. As good luck would have it,
we killed a porpoise, soon after the wind shifted, and on
this we lived, in a great measure, for more than a week,
sometimes cooking it, but oftener eating it raw. At length
the wind shifted, and we got in.
I was no sooner out of this difficulty, than a hasty temper
got me into another. While still in the stream, an Irish
boatman called me a Yankee son of a , and I lent
him a clip. The fellow sued me, and, contriving to catch
me before I left the vessel, I was sent to jail, for the first and
only time in my life. This turned out to be a new and very
revolting school for me. I was sent among as precious a
set of rascals as New York could furnish. Their
conversation
was very edifying. One would tell how he cut the
hoses of the engines at fires, with razor-blades fastened to
his shoes; another, how many pocket-books he and his
associates had taken at this or that fire; and a third, the
manner of breaking open stores, and the best mode of
disposing
of stolen goods. The cool, open, impudent manner
in which these fellows spoke of such transactions, fairly
astounded me. They must have thought I was in jail for
some crime similar to their own, or they would not have
talked so freely before a stranger. These chaps seemed to
value a man by the enormity and number of his crimes.
At length the captain and my landlord found out where I
had been sent, and I was immediately bailed. Glad enough
was I to get out of prison, and still more so to get out of the
company I found in it. Such association is enough to
undermine
the morals of a saint, in a week or two. And yet these
fellows were well dressed, and well enough looking, and
might very well pass for a sort of gentlemen, with those who
had seen but little of men of the true quality.
I had got enough of law, and wished to push the matter
no farther. The Irishman was sent for, and I compromised
with him on the spot. The whole affair cost me my entire
wages, and I was bound over to keep the peace, for, I do not
know how long. This scrape compelled me to weigh my
anchor at a short notice, as there is no living in New York
without money. I went on board the Sully, thereforea
Havre linera day or two after getting out of the
atmosphere
of the City Hall. They may talk of Batavia, if they
please; but, in my judgment, it is the healthiest place of the
two.
Our passages, out and home, produced nothing worth
mentioning, and I left the ship in New York. My wages
went in the old way, and then I shipped in a schooner called
the Susan and Mary, that was about to sail for Buenos Ayres,
in the expectation that she would be sold there. The craft
was a good one, though our passage out was very long. On
reaching our port, I took my discharge, under the impression
the vessel would be sold. A notion now came over me, that
I would join the Buenos Ayrean navy, in order to see what
sort of a service it was. I knew it was a mixed American
and English affair, and, by this time, I had become very
reckless as to my own fate. I wished to do nothing very
wrong, but was incapable of doing anything that was very
right.
My windfall carried me on board a schooner, of eight or
ten guns, called the Suradaha. I did not ship, making an
arrangement by which I was to be left to decide for myself,
whether I would remain in her, or not. Although a pretty
good craft, I soon got enough of this service. In one week
I was thoroughly disgusted, and left the schooner. It is well
I did, as there was a
revolution
on board of her, a few
days later, and she was carried up the river, and, as I was
told, was there sunk. With her, sunk all my laurels in that
service.
The Susan and Mary was not sold, but took in hides for
New York. I returned to her, therefore, and we sailed for
home in due time. The passage proved long, but mild, and
we were compelled to run in, off Point Petre, Gaudaloupe,
where we took in some provisions. After this, nothing
occurred
until we reached New York.
I now shifted the name of my craft, end for end, joining
a half-rigged brig, called the Mary and Susan. I gained
little by the change, this vessel being just the worst-looking
hooker I did ever sail in. Still she was tight, strong enough,
and not a very bad sailing vessel. But, for some reason
or other, externals were not regarded, and we made
anything
but a holiday appearance on the water. I had seen
the time when I would disdain to go chief-mate of such
a looking craft; but I now shipped in her as a common
hand.
We sailed for Para, in Brazil, a port nearly under the
line, having gunpowder, dry-goods, &c. Our passage,
until
we came near the coast of South America, was good, and
nothing occurred to mention. When under the line,
however
,
we made a rakish-looking schooner, carrying two
topsails
,
one forenoon. We made no effort to escape, knowing
it to be useless. The schooner set a Spanish ensign, and
brought us to. We were ordered to lower our boat and to
go on board the schooner, which were done. I happened
to be at the helm, and remained in the Mary and Susan.
The strangers ordered our people out of the boat, and sent
an armed party in her, on board us. These men rummaged
about for a short time, and then were hailed from their
vessel
to know if we promised well. Our looks deceived the
head man of the boarders, who answered that we were
very
poor. On receiving this information, the captain of the
schooner ordered his boarding party to quit us. Our boat
came back, but was ordered to return and bring another
gang of the strangers. This time we were questioned about
canvass, but got off by concealing the truth. We had thirty
bolts on board, but produced only one. The bolt shown did
not happen to suit, and the strangers again left us. We
were told not to make sail until we received notice by signal,
and the schooner hauled her wind. After standing on some
time, however, these gentry seemed indisposed to quit us,
for they came down again, and rounded to on our
weather-beam
.
We were now questioned about our longitude, and
whether we had a chronometer. We gave the former, but
had nothing like the latter on board. Telling us once more
not to make sail without the signal, the schooner left us,
standing on until fairly out of sight. We waited until she
sunk her topsails, and then went on our course.
None of us doubted that this fellow was a pirate. The
men on board us were an ill-looking set of rascals, of all
countries. They spoke Spanish, but we gave them credit
for being a mixture. Our escape was probably owing to
our appearance, which promised anything but a rich booty.
Our dry-goods and powder were concealed in casks under
the ballast, and I suppose the papers were not particularly
minute. At any rate, when we got into Para, most of the
cargo went out of our schooner privately, being landed
from lighters. We had a passenger, who passed for some
revolutionary man, who also landed secretly. This
gentleman
was in a good deal of concern about the pirates,
keeping himself hid while they were near us.
CHAPTER XVI.
Our
passage from Para was good until the brig reached
the latitude of Bermuda. Here, one morning, for the first
time in this craft, Sundays excepted, we got a forenoon
watch below. I was profiting by the opportunity to do a
little
work for myself, when the mate, an inexperienced young
man, who was connected with the owners, came and ordered
us up to help jibe ship. It was easy enough to do this in
the watch, but he thought differently. As an old seaman,
I do not hesitate to say that the order was both inconsiderate
and unnecessary; though I do not wish to appear even to
justify my own conduct, on the occasion. A hasty temper
is one of my besetting weaknesses, and, at that time, I was
in no degree influenced by any considerations of a moral
nature, as connected with language. Exceedingly
exasperated
at this interference with our comfort, I did not hesitate
to tell the mate my opinion of his order. Warming with
my own complaints, I soon became fearfully profane and
denunciatory. I called down curses on the brig, and all
that belonged to her, not hesitating about wishing that she
might founder at sea, and carry all hands of us to the
bottom
of the ocean. In a word, I indulged in all that
looseness
and profanity of the tongue, which is common enough
with those who feel no restraints on the subject, and who
are highly exasperated.
I do think the extent to which I carried my curses and
wishes, on this occasion, frightened the officers. They said
nothing, but let me curse myself out, to my heart's content.
A man soon wearies of so bootless a task, and the storm
16 *
passed off, like one in the heavens, with a low rumbling. I
gave myself no concern about the matter afterwards, but
things took their course until noon. While the people were
at dinner, the mate came forward again, however, and called
all hands to shorten sail. Going on deck, I saw a very
menacing black cloud astern, and went to work, with a will,
to discharge a duty that everybody could see was necessary.
We gathered in the canvass as fast as we could; but,
before
we could get through, and while I was lending a hand
to furl the foresail, the squall struck the brig. I call it a
squall, but it was more like the tail of a hurricane. Most
of our canvass blew from the gaskets, the cloth going in
ribands. The foresail and fore-topsail we managed to save,
but all our light canvass went. I was still aloft when the
brig broached-to. As she came up to the wind, the
fore-topmast
went over to leeward, being carried away at the
cap. All the hamper came down, and began to thresh
against the larboard side of the lower rigging. Just at this
instant, a sea seemed to strike the brig under her bilge, and
fairly throw her on her beam-ends.
All this appeared to me to be the work of only a minute.
I had scrambled to windward, to get out of the way of the
wreck, and stood with one foot on the upper side of the bitts,
holding on, to steady myself, by some of the running
rigging
.
This was being in a very different attitude, but on
the precise spot, where, two or three hours before, I had
called on the Almighty to pour out his vials of wrath upon
the vessel, myself, and all she contained! At that fearful
instant, conscience pricked me, and I felt both shame and
dread, at my recent language. It seemed to me as if I had
been heard, and that my impious prayers were about to be
granted. In the bitterness of my heart, I vowed, should my
life be spared, never to be guilty of such gross profanity,
again.
These feelings, however, occupied me but a moment. I
was too much of a real sea-dog to be standing idle at a time
like that. There was but one man before the mast on whom
I could call for anything in such a strait, and that was a
New Yorker, of the name of Jack Neal. This man was
near me, and I suggested to him the plan of getting the
fore-top-mast
staysail loose, notwithstanding the mast was gone,
in the hope it might blow open, and help the brig's bows
round. Jack was a fellow to act, and he succeeded in
loosening
the sail, which did blow out in a way greatly to help
us, as I think. I then proposed we should clamber aft, and
try to get the helm up. This we did, also; though I
question
if the rudder could have had much power, in the
position
in which the brig lay.
Either owing to the fore-top-mast staysail, or to some
providential sea, the vessel did fall off, however, and
presently
she righted, coming up with great force, with a heavy
roll to windward. The staysail helped us, I feel persuaded,
as the stay had got taut in the wreck, and the wind had
blown out the hanks. The brig's helm being hard up, as
soon as she got way, the craft flew round like a top, coming
up on the other tack, in spite of us, and throwing her nearly
over again. She did not come fairly down, however, though
I thought she was gone, for an instant.
Finding it possible to move, I now ran forward, and
succeeded
in stopping the wreck into the rigging and bitts. At
this time the brig minded her helm, and fell off, coming under
command. To help us, the head of the spencer got loose,
from the throat-brail up, and, blowing out against the wreck,
the whole formed, together, a body of hamper, that acted as
a sort of sail, which helped the brig to keep clear of the
seas. By close attention to the helm, we were enabled to
prevent the vessel from broaching-to again, and, of course,
managed to sail her on her bottom. About sunset, it
moderated
,
and, next morning, the weather was fine. We then
went to work, and rigged jury-masts; reaching New York
a few days later.
Had this accident occurred to our vessel in the night, as
did that to the Scourge, our fate would probably have been
decided in a few minutes. As it was, half an hour, in the
sort of sea that was going, would have finished her. As for
my repentance, if I can use the term on such an occasion,
and for such a feeling, it was more lasting than thorough.
I have never been so fearfully profane since; and often,
when I have felt the disposition to give way to passion in
this revolting form, my feelings, as I stood by those bitts,
have recurred to my mindmy vow has been remembered,
and I hope, together, they did some good, until I was made
to see the general errors of my life, and the necessity of
throwing all my sins on the merciful interposition of my
Saviour.
I was not as reckless and extravagant, this time, in port,
as I had usually been, of late years. I shipped, before my
money was all gone, on board the Henry Kneeland, for
Liverpool, vi New Orleans. On reaching the latter port,
all hands of us were beset by the land-sharks, in the shape
of landlords, who told us how much better we should be off
by running, than by sticking by the ship. We listened to
these tales, and went in a body. What made the matter
worse, and our conduct the less excusable, was the fact, that
we got good wages and good treatment in the Henry
Kneeland
.
The landlords came with two boats, in the night; we
passed our dunnage down to them, and away we went, leaving
only one man on board. The very next day we all shipped
on board the Marian, United States' Revenue Cutter, where I
was rated a quarter-mate, at fifteen dollars a month;
leaving
seventeen to obtain this preferment!
We got a good craft for our money, however. She was
a large comfortable schooner, that mounted a few light guns,
and our duty was far from heavy. The treatment turned
out to be good, also, as some relief to our folly. One of
our Henry Kneelands died of the horrors before we got
to sea, and we buried him at the watering-place, near the
lower bar. I must have been about four months in the
Marion, during which time we visited the different keys, and
went into Key West. At this place, our crew became
sickly, and I was landed among others, and sent to a
boarding-house
.
It was near a month before we could get the
crew together again, when we sailed for Norfolk. At
Norfolk
,
six of us had relapses, and were sent to the hospital;
the cutter sailing without us. I never saw the craft
afterwards
.
I was but a fortnight in the hospital, the disease being
only the fever and ague. Just as I came out, the Alert, the
New York cutter, came in, and I was sent on board her.
This separated me from all the Henry Kneelands but one
old man. The Alert was bound south, on duty connected
with the nullification troubles; and, soon after I joined her,
she sailed for Charleston, South Carolina. Here a little
fleet of cutters soon collected; no less than seven of us
being at anchor in the waters of South Carolina, to prevent
any breach of the tariff laws. When I had been on board
the Alert about a month, a new cutter called the Jackson,
came in from New York, and being the finest craft on the
station, our officers and crew were transferred to her in a
body; our captain being the senior of all the revenue
captains
present.
I must have been at least six months in the waters of South
Carolina, thus employed. We never went to sea, but
occasionally
dropped down as far as Rebellion Roads. We
were not allowed to go ashore, except on rare occasions, and
towards the last, matters got to be so serious, that we
almost
looked upon ourselves as in an enemy's country.
Commodore Elliott joined the station in the Natchez
sloop-of-war
,
and the Experiment, man-of-war schooner, also
arrived and remained. After the arrival of the Natchez,
the Commodore took command of all hands of us afloat, and
we were kept in a state of high preparation for service. We
were occasionally at quarters, nights, though I never
exactly
knew the reasons. It was said attacks on us were
anticipated. General Scott was in the fort, and matters
looked very warlike, for several weeks.
At length we got the joyful news that nullification had
been thrown overboard, and that no more was to be
apprehended
.
It seems that the crews of the different cutters
had been increased for this particular service; but, now it
was over, there were more men employed than Government
had needed. We were told, in consequence, that those
among us who wished our discharges, might have them on
application.
I had been long enough in this 'long-shore service, and
applied to be discharged, under this provision. My time
was so near out, however, that I should have got away
soon, in regular course.
I now went ashore at Charleston, and had my swig, as
long as the money lasted. I gave myself no trouble about
the ship's husband, whose collar-bone I had broken; nor do
I now know whether he was then living, or dead. In a
word, I thought only of the present time; the past and the
future being equally indifferent to me. My old landlord
was dead; and I fell altogether into the hands of a new set.
I never took the precaution to change my name, at any
period of my life, with the exception, that I dropped the
Robert, in signing shipping-articles. I also wrote my name
Myers, instead of Meyers, as, I have been informed by my
sister, was the true spelling. But this proceeded from
ignorance
,
and not from intention. In all times, and seasons,
and weathers, and services, I have sailed as Ned Myers; and
as nothing else.
It soon became necessary to ship again; and I went on
board the Harriet and Jesse, which was bound to Havre de
Grace. This proved to be a pleasant, easy voyage; the
ship coming back to New York filled with passengers, who
were called Swiss; but most of whom, as I understand, came
from Wurtemberg, Alsace, and the countries on the Rhine.
On reaching New York, I went on to Philadelphia, to obtain
the effects I had left there, when I went out in the Amelia.
But my landlord was dead; his family was scattered; and
my property had disappeared. I never knew who got it;
but a quadrant, watch, and some entirely new clothes, went
in the wreck. I suppose I lost, at least, two hundred
dollars
,
in this way. What odds did it make to me? it would
have gone in grog, if it had not gone in this manner.
I staid but a short time in Philadelphia, joining a brig,
called the Topaz, bound to Havana. We arrived out, after
a short passage; and here I was exposed to as strong a
temptation to commit crime, as a poor fellow need encounter.
A beautiful American-built brig, was lying in port, bound to
Africa, for slaves. She was the loveliest craft I ever laid
eyes on; and the very sight of her gave me a longing to go
in her. She offered forty dollars a month, with the
privilege
of a slave and a half. I went so far as to try to get on
board her; but met with some difficulty, in having my things
seized. The captain found it out; and, by pointing out to
me the danger I ran, succeeded in changing my mind.
I will not deny, that I knew the trade was immoral; but
so is smuggling; and I viewed them pretty much as the
same thing, in this sense. I am now told, that the law of
this country pronounces the American citizen, who goes in
a slaver, a pirate; and treats him as such; which, to me,
seems very extraordinary. I do not understand, how a
Spaniard can do that, and be no pirate, which makes an
American a pirate, if he be guilty of it. I feel certain, that
very few sailors know in what light the law views slaving.
Now, piracy is robbing, on the high seas, and has always
been contrary to law; but slaving was encouraged by all
nations, a short time since; and we poor tars look upon the
change, as nothing but a change in policy. As for myself,
I should have gone in that brig, in utter ignorance of the
risks I ran, and believing myself to be about as guilty, in a
moral sense, as I was when I smuggled tobacco, on the
coast of Ireland, or opium in Canton.
[15]
[15]
This is the reasoning of Ned. I have always looked upon the
American law as erroneous in principle, and too severe in its
penalties
.
Erroneous in principle, as piracy is a crime against the law of
nations, and it is not legal for any one community to widen, or
narrow
,
the action of international law. It is peculiarly the policy of this
country, rigidly to observe this principle, since she has so many
interests
dependent on its existence. The punishment of death is too
severe, when we consider that nabobs are among us, who laid the
foundations of their wealth, as slaving
merchants
, when slaving
was
legal. Sudden mutations in morals, are not to be made by a dash of
the pen; and even public sentiment can hardly be made to consider
slaving much of a crime, in a slave-holding community. But, even
the punishment of death might be inflicted, without arrogating to
Congress a power to say what is, and what is not, piracy.
As the Topaz was coming out of the port of Havana,
homeward bound, and just as she was abreast of the Moro,
the brig carried away her bobstay. I was busy in helping
to unreeve the stay, when I was seized with sudden and
violent
cramps. This attack proved to be the cholera, which
came near carrying me off. The captain had me taken aft,
where I was attended with the greatest care. God be praised
for his mercy! I got well, though scarcely able to do any
more duty before we got in.
A short voyage gives short commons; and I was soon
obliged to look out for another craft. This time I shipped
in the Erie, Captain Funk, a Havre liner, and sailed soon
after. This was a noble ship, with the best of usage. Both
our passages were pleasant, and give me nothing to relate.
While I was at work in the hold, at Havre, a poor female
passenger, who came to look at the ship, fell through the
hatch, and was so much injured as to be left behind. I
mention the circumstance merely to show how near I was
to a meeting with my old shipmate, who is writing these
pages, and yet missed him. On comparing notes, I find he
was on deck when this accident happened, having come to
see after some effects he was then shipping to New York.
These very effects I handled, and supposed them to belong
to a passenger who was to come home in the ship; but, as
they were addressed to another name, I could not recognise
them. Mr. Cooper did not come home in the Erie, but
passed over to England, and embarked at London, and so
I failed to see him.
In these liners, the captains wish to keep the good men of
their crews as long as they can. We liked the Erie and
her captain so much, that eight or ten of us stuck by the
ship, and went out in her again. This time our luck was
not so good. The passage out was well enough, but
homeward-bound
we had a hard time of it. While in Havre,
too, we had a narrow escape. Christmas night, a fire broke
out in the cabin, and came near smothering us all, forward,
before we knew anything about it. Our chief mate, whose
name was Everdy,
[16]
[16]
Ned's pronunciation.
saved the vessel by his caution and
exertions; the captain not getting on board until the fire had
come to a head. We kept everything closed until an engine
was ready, then cut away the deck, and sent down the hose.
This expedient, with a free use of water, saved the ship. It
is not known how the fire originated. A good deal of
damage was done, and some property was lost.
Notwithstanding this accident, we had the ship ready for
sea early in January, 1834. For the first week out, we
met with head winds and heavy weather; so heavy,
indeed
,
as to render it difficult to get rid of the pilot. The
ship beat down channel with him on board, as low as the
Eddystone. Here we saw the Sully, outward bound,
running
up channel before the wind. Signals were exchanged,
and our ship, which was then well off the land, ran in and
spoke the Sully. We put our pilot on board this ship,
which was doing a good turn all round. The afternoon
proving fair, and the wind moderating, Captain Funk filled
and stood in near to the coast, as his best tack. Towards
night, however, the gale freshened, and blew into the bay,
between the Start Point and the Lizard, in a heavy, steady
manner.
The first thing was to ware off shore; after which, we
were compelled to take in nearly all our canvass. The
gale continued to increase, and the night set in dark.
There were plenty of ports to leeward, but it was ticklish
work to lose a foot of ground, unless one knew exactly
where he was going. We had no pilot, and the captain
decided
to hold on. I have seldom known it to blow harder
than it did that night; and, for hours, everything depended
on our main-topsail's standing, which sail we had set,
close-reefed
.
I did not see anything to guide us, but the
compass
,
until about ten o'clock, when I caught a view of a
light close on our lee bow. This was the Eddystone,
which-stands pretty nearly in a line between the Start and
the Lizard, and rather more than three leagues from the
17
land. As we headed, we might lay past, should
everything
stand; but, if our topsail went, we should have been
pretty certain of fetching up on those famous rocks, where
a three-decker would have gone to pieces in an hour's time
in such a gale.
I suppose we passed the Eddystone at a safe distance, or
the captain would not have attempted going to windward of
it; but, to me, it appeared that we were fearfully near. The
sea was breaking over the light tremendously, and could be
plainly seen, as it flashed up near the lantern. We went
by, however, surging slowly ahead, though our drift must
have been very material.
The Start, and the point to the westward of it, were still
to be cleared. They were a good way off, and but a little
to leeward, as the ship headed. In smooth water, and with
a whole-sail breeze, it would have been easy enough to lay
past the Start, when at the Eddystone, with a south-west
wind; but, in a gale, it is a serious matter, especially on a
flood-tide. I know all hands of us, forward and aft, looked
upon our situation as very grave. We passed several
uneasy
hours, after we lost sight of the Eddystone, before we
got a view of the land near the Start. When I saw it, the
heights appeared like a dark cloud hanging over us, and I
certainly thought the ship was gone. At this time, the
captain
and mate consulted together, and the latter came to us,
in a very calm, steady manner, and saidCome, boys;
we may as well go ashore without masts as with them, and
our only hope is in getting more canvass to stand. We
must turn-to, and make sail on the ship.
Everybody was in motion on this hint, and the first thing
we did was to board fore-tack. The clews of that sail came
down as if so many giants had hold of the tack and sheet.
We set it, double-reefed, which made it but a rag of a sail,
and yet the ship felt it directly. We next tried the
fore-topsail
,
close-reefed, and this stood. It was well we did, for I
feel certain the ship was now in the ground-swell. That
black hill seemed ready to fall on our heads. We tried the
mizen-topsail, but we found it would not do, and we furled
it again, not without great difficulty. Things still looked
serious, the land drawing nearer and nearer; and we tried
to get the mainsail, double-reefed, on the ship. Everybody
mustered at the tack and sheet, and we dragged down that
bit of cloth as if it had been muslin. The good ship now
quivered like a horse that is over-ridden, but in those liners
everything is strong, and everything stood. I never saw
spray thrown from a ship's bows, as it was thrown from the
Erie's that night. We had a breathless quarter of an hour
after the mainsail was set, everybody looking to see what
would go first. Every rope and bolt in the craft was tried
to the utmost, but all stood! At the most critical moment,
we caught a glimpse of a light in a house that was known
to stand near the Start; and the mate came among us, pointed
it out, and said, if we weathered
that
, we should go clear.
After hearing this, my eyes were never off that light, and
glad was I to see it slowly drawing more astern, and more
under our lee. At last we got it on our quarter, and knew
that we had gone clear! The gloomy-looking land
disappeared
to leeward, in a deep, broad bay, giving us plenty of
sea-room.
We now took in canvass, to ease the ship. The mainsail
and fore-topsail were furled, leaving her to jog along under
the main-topsail, foresail, and fore-topmast staysail. I look
upon this as one of my narrowest escapes from shipwreck;
and I consider the escape, under the mercy of God, to have
been owing to the steadiness of our officers, and the goodness
of the ship and her outfit. It was like pushing a horse to
the trial of every nerve and sinew, and only winning the
race under whip and spur. Wood, and iron, and cordage,
and canvass, can do no more than they did that night.
Next morning, at breakfast, the crew talked the matter
over. We had a hard set in this ship, the men being prime
seamen, but of reckless habits and characters. Some of the
most thoughtless among them admitted that they had prayed
secretly for succour, and, for myself, I am most thankful
that
I
did. These confessions were made half-jestingly, but
I believe them to have been true, judging from my own case.
It may sound bravely in the ears of the thoughtless and
foolish, to boast of indifference on such occasions; but, few
men can face death under circumstances like those in which
we were placed, without admitting to themselves, however
reluctantly, that there is a Power above, on which they must
lean for personal safety, as well as for spiritual support.
17
More than usual care was had for the future welfare of sailors
among the Havre liners, there being a mariners' church at
Havre, at which our captain always attended, as well as his
mates; and efforts were made to make us go also. The
effect was good, the men being better behaved, and more
sober, in consequence.
The wind shifted a day or two after this escape, giving
us a slant that carried us past Scilly, fairly out into the
Atlantic
.
A fortnight or so after our interview with the
Eddystone
we carried away the pintals of the rudder, which
was saved only by the modern invention that prevents the
head from dropping, by means of the deck. To prevent the
strain, and to get some service from the rudder, however,
we found it necessary to sling the latter, and to breast it
into the stern-post by means of purchases. A spar was laid
athwart the coach-house, directly over the rudder, and we
rove a chain through the tiller-hole, and passed it over this
spar. For this purpose the smallest chain-cable was used,
the rudder being raised from the deck by means of sheers.
We then got a set of chain-topsail sheets, parcelled them
well, and took a clove hitch with them around the rudder,
about half-way up. One end was brought into each
main-chain
,
and set up by tackles. In this manner the wheel did
tolerably well, though we had to let the ship lie-to in heavy
weather.
The chain sheets held on near a month, and then gave
way. On examination, it was found that the parcelling had
gone under the ship's counter, and that the copper had nearly
destroyed the iron. After this, we mustered all the chains
of the ship, of proper size, parcelled them very thoroughly,
got another clove hitch around the rudder as before, and
brought the ends to the hawse-holes, letting the bights fall,
one on each side of the ship's keel. The ends were next
brought to the windlass and hove taut. This answered pretty
well, and stood until we got the ship into New York. Our
whole passage was stormy, and lasted seventy days, as near
as I can recollect. The ship was almost given up when we
got in, and great was the joy at our arrival.
As the Erie lost her turn, in consequence of wanting
repairs
,
most of us went on board the Henry IVth, in the
same line. This voyage was comfortable, and successful,
a fine ship and good usage. On our return to New York
most of us went back to the Erie, liking both vessel and
captain, as well as her other officers. I went twice more
to Havre and back in this ship, making four voyages in her
in all. At the end of the fourth voyage our old mate left
us, to do business ashore, and we took a dislike to his
successor
,
though it was without trying him. The mate we
lost had been a great favourite, and we seemed to think if
he went we must go too. At any rate, nearly all hands
went to the Silvie de Grasse, where we got another good
ship, good officers, and good treatment. In fact, all these
Havre liners were very much alike in these respects, the
Silvie
de Grasse being the fourth in which I had then sailed,
and to me they all seemed as if they belonged to the same
family. I went twice to Havre in this ship also, when I left
her for the Normandy, in the same line. I made this change
in consequence of an affair about some segars in Havre, in
which I had no other concern than to father another man's
fault. The captain treated me very handsomely, but my
temperament is such that I am apt to fly off in a tangent
when anything goes up stream. It was caprice that took
me from the Silvie de Grasse, and put me in her
sisterliner
.
I liked the Normandy as well as the rest of these liners,
except that the vessel steered badly. I made only one
voyage
in her, however, as will be seen in the next chapter.
It will probably be said, the error is merely one of language; the
jurisdiction being clearly legal. Is this true? Can Congress, legally
or constitutionally, legislate for American citizens, when undeniably
within the jurisdiction of foreign states? Admit this as a principle,
and what is to prevent Congress from punishing acts, that it may be
the policy of foreign countries to exact from even casual residents.
If Congress can punish me, as a pirate, for slaving under a foreign
flag, and in foreign countries, it can punish me for carrying arms
against all American allies; and yet military service may be exacted
of even an American citizen, resident in a foreign state, under particular
circumstances. The same difficulty, in principle, may be extended to
the whole catalogue of legal crime.
Congress exists only for specified purposes. It can
punish
piracy,
but it cannot declare what shall, or shall not, be piracy; as this would
be invading the authority of international law. Under the general
power to pass laws, that are necessary to carry out the system, it can
derive no authority; since there can be no legal necessity for any
such double legislation, under the comity of nations. Suppose, for
instance, England should legalize slaving, again. Could the United
States claim the American citizen, who had engaged in slaving, under
the English flag, and from a British port, under the renowned
Ashburton
treaty? Would England give such a man up? No more
than she will now give up the slaves that run from the American
vessel
,
which is driven in by stress of weather. One of the vices of
philanthropy is to overreach its own policy, by losing sight of all
collateral principles and interests.
Editor
.
CHAPTER XVII.
I had
now been no less than eight voyages in the Havre
trade, without intermission. So regular had my occupation
become, that I began to think I was a part of a liner myself.
I liked the treatment, the food, the ships, and the officers.
Whenever we got home, I worked in the ship, at day's work,
until paid off; after which, no more was seen of Ned until
it was time to go on board to sail. When I got in, in the
Normandy, it happened as usual, though I took a short swing
17 *
only. Mr. Everdy, our old mate in the Erie, was working
gangs of stevedores, riggers, &c., ashore; and when I went
and reported myself to him, as ready for work in the
Normandy
again, he observed that her gang was full, but that,
by going up-town next morning, to the screw-dock, I should
find an excellent job on board a brig. The following day,
accordingly, I took my dinner in a pail, and started off for
the dock, as directed. On my way, I fell in with an old
shipmate in the navy, a boatswain's-mate, of the name of
Benson. This man asked me where I was bound with my
pail, and I told him. What's the use, says he, of
dragging
your soul out in these liners, when you have a
man-of-war
under your lee! Then he told me he meant to ship,
and advised me to do the same. I drank with him two or
three times, and felt half persuaded to enter; but,
recollecting
the brig, I left him, and pushed on to the dock. When
I got there, it was so late that the vessel had got off the dock,
and was already under way in the stream.
My day's work was now up, and I determined to make a
full holiday of it. As I went back, I fell in with Captain
Mix, the officer with whom I had first gone on the lakes, and
my old first-lieutenant in the Delaware, and had a bit of
navy talk with him; after which I drifted along as far as
the rendezvous. The officer in charge was Mr. M'Kenny,
my old first-lieutenant in the Brandywine, and, before I
quitted
the house, my name was down, again, for one of Uncle
Sam's sailor-men. In this accidental manner have I floated
about the world, most of my lifenot dreaming in the
morning
,
what would fetch me up before night.
When it was time to go off, I was ready, and was sent on
board the Hudson, which vessel Captain Mix then
commanded
.
I have the consolation of knowing that I never
ran, or thought of running, from either of the eleven
men-of-war
on board of which I have served, counting big and
little, service of days and service of years. I had so long a
pull in the receiving-ship, as to get heartily tired of her;
and, when an opportunity offered, I put my name down for
the Constellation 38, which was then fitting out for the West
India station, in Norfolk. A draft of us was sent round to
that ship accordingly, and we found she had hauled off from
the yard, and was lying between the forts. When I got on
board, I ascertained that something like fifty of my old liners
were in this very ship, some common motive inducing them
to take service in the navy, all at the same time. As for
myself, it happened just as I have related, though I always
liked the navy, and was ever ready to join a ship of war, for
a pleasant cruise.
Commodore Dallas's pennant was flying in the
Constellation
when I joined her. A short time afterwards, the ship
sailed for the West Indies. As there was nothing material
occurred in the cruise, it is unnecessary to relate things in
the order in which they took place. The ship went to
Havana, Trinidad, Curaoa, Laguayra, Santa Cruz, Vera
Cruz, Campeachy, Tampico, Key West, &c. We lay more
or less time at all these ports, and in Santa Cruz we had a
great ball on board. After passing several months in this
manner, we went to Pensacola. The St. Louis was with us
most of this time, though she did not sail from America in
company. The next season the whole squadron went to
Vera Cruz in company, seven or eight sail of us in all, giving
the Mexicans some alarm, I believe.
But the Florida war gave us the most occupation. I was
out in all sorts of ways, on expeditions, and can say I never
saw an Indian, except those who came to give themselves
up. I was in steamboats, cutters, launches, and on shore,
marching like a soldier, with a gun on my shoulder, and
precious duty it was for a sailor.
The St. Louis being short of hands, I was also drafted for
a cruise in her; going the rounds much as we had done in
the frigate. This was a fine ship, and was then commanded
by Captain Rousseau, an officer much respected and liked,
by us all. Mr. Byrne, my old shipmate in the Delaware,
went out with us as first-lieutenant of the Constellation, but
he did not remain out the whole cruise.
Altogether I was out on the West India station three
years, but got into the hospital, for several months of the
time, in consequence of a broken bone. While in the
hospital
,
the frigate made a cruise, leaving me ashore. On her
return, I was invalided home, in the Levant, Captain
Paulding
,
another solid, excellent officer. In a word, I was lucky
in my officers, generally; the treatment on board the frigate
being just and good. The duty in the Constellation was
very hard, being a sort of soldier duty, which may be very
well for those that are trained to it, but makes bad weather
for us blue-jackets. Captain Mix, the officer with whom I
went to the lakes, was out on the station in command of the
Concord, sloop of war, and, for some time, was in charge
of our ship, during the absence of Commodore Dallas, in
his own vessel. In this manner are old shipmates often
thrown together, after years of separation.
In the hospital I was rated as porter, Captain Bolton and
Captain Latimer being my commanding officers; the first
being in charge of the yard, and the second his next in rank.
From these two gentlemen I received so many favours, that
it would be ungrateful in me not to mention them. Dr.
Terrill
,
the surgeon of the hospital, too, was also exceedingly
kind to me, during the time I was under his care.
As I had much leisure time in the hospital, I took charge
of a garden, and got to be somewhat of a gardener. It was
said I had the best garden about Pensacola, which is quite
likely true, as I never saw but one other.
The most important thing, however, that occurred to me
while in the hospital, was a disposition that suddenly arose
in my mind, to reflect on my future state, and to look at
religious things with serious eyes. Dr. Terrill had some
blacks in his service, who were in the habit of holding little
Methodist meetings, where they sang hymns, and conversed
together seriously. I never joined these people, being too
white for that, down at Pensacola, but I could overhear them
from my own little room. A Roman Catholic in the
hospital
had a prayer-book in English, which he lent to me, and
I got into the habit of reading a prayer in it, daily, as a sort
of worshipping of the Almighty. This was the first act of
mine, that approached private worship, since the day I left
Mr. Marchinton's; if I except the few hasty mental petitions
put up in moments of danger.
After a time, I began to think it would never do for me, a
Protestant born and baptised, to be studying a Romish
prayer-book
;
and I hunted up one that was Protestant, and which
bad been written expressly for seamen. This I took to my
room, and used in place of the Romish book. Dr. Terrill
had a number of bibles under his charge, and I obtained one
of these, also, and I actually got into the practice of reading
a chapter every night, as well as of reading a prayer. I
also knocked off from drink, and ceased to swear. My
reading in the bible, now, was not for the stories, but
seriously
to improve my mind and morals.
I must have been several months getting to be more and
more in earnest on the subject of morality, if not of vital
religion, when I formed an acquaintance with a new
steward
,
who had just joined the hospital. This man was ready
enough to converse with me about the bible, but he turned
out to be a Deist. Notwithstanding my own disposition to
think more seriously of my true situation, I had many
misgivings
on the subject of the Saviour's being the Son of
God. It seemed improbable to me, and I was falling into
the danger which is so apt to beset the new beginnerthat
of self-sufficiency, and the substituting of human wisdom
for faith. The steward was not slow in discovering this;
and he produced some of Tom Paine's works, by way of
strengthening me in the unbelief. I now read Tom Paine,
instead of the bible, and soon had practical evidence of the
bad effects of his miserable system. I soon got stern-way
on me in morals; began to drink, as before, though seldom
intoxicated, and grew indifferent to my bible and
prayer-book
,
as well as careless of the future. I began to think
that the things of this world were to be enjoyed, and he was
the wisest who made the most of his time.
I must confess, also, that the bad examples which I saw set
by men professing to be Christians, had a strong tendency
to disgust me with religion. The great mistake I made was,
in supposing I had undergone any real change of heart.
Circumstances disposed me to reflect, and reflection brought
me to be serious, on subjects that I had hitherto treated with
levity; but the grace of God was still, in a great degree,
withheld from me, leaving me a prey to such arguments as
those of the steward, and his great prophet and master,
Mr. Paine.
In the hospital, and that, too, at a place like Pensacola,
there was little opportunity for me to break out into my old
excesses; though I found liquor, on one or two occasions,
even there, and got myself into some disgrace in
consequence
.
On the whole, however, the discipline, my
situation
,
and my own resolution, kept me tolerably correct. It
is the restraint of a ship that alone prevents sailors from
dying much sooner than they do; for it is certain no man
could hold out long who passed three or four months
every year in the sort of indulgencies into which I myself
have often run, after returning from long voyages. This is
one advantage of the navy; two or three days of riotous
living being all a fellow
can
very well get in a three years'
cruise. Any man who has ever been in a vessel of war,
particularly in old times, can see the effect produced by the
system, and regular living of a ship. When the crew first
came on board, the men were listless, almost lifeless, with
recent dissipation; some suffering with the horrors, perhaps;
but a few weeks of regular living would bring them all
round; and, by the end of the cruise, most of the people
would come into port, and be paid off, with renovated
constitutions
.
It is a little different, now, to be sure, as the men
ship for general service, and commonly serve a short
apprenticeship
in a receiving vessel, before they are turned
over to the sea-going craft. This brings them on board the
last in a little better condition than used to be the case; but,
even now, six months in a man-of-war is a new lease for a
seaman's life.
I say I got myself into disgrace in the hospital of
Pensacola
,
in consequence of my habit of drinking. The facts
were as follows, for I have no desire to conceal, or to
parade
before the world, my own delinquencies; but, I
confess
them with the hope that the pictures they present, may
have some salutary influence on the conduct of others.
The doctor, who was steadily my friend, and often gave me
excellent advice, went north, in order to bring his wife to
Pensacola. I was considered entitled to a pension for the
hurt which had brought me into the hospital, and the doctor
had promised to see something about it, while at
Washington
.
This was not done, in consequence of his not passing
through Washington, as had been expected. Now, nature
has so formed me, that any disgust, or disappointment,
makes me reckless, and awakens a desire to revenge
myself, on myself, as I may say. It was this feeling which
first carried me from Halifax; it was this feeling that made
me run from the Sterling; and which has often changed,
and sometimes marred my prospects, as I have passed
through life. As soon as I learned that nothing had been
said about my pension, this same feeling came over me,
and I became reckless. I had not drawn my grog for
months, and, indeed, had left off drinking entirely; but I
now determined to have my fill, at the first good
opportunity
.
I meant to make the officers sorry, by doing
something
that was very wrong, and for which I should be sorry
myself.
I kept the keys of the liquor of the hospital. The first
thing was to find a confederate, which I did in the person
of a Baltimore chap, who entered into my plan from pure
love of liquor. I then got a stock of the wine, and we went
to work on it, in my room. The liquor was sherry, and it
took nine bottles of it to lay us both up. Even this did not
make me beastly drunk, but it made me desperate and
impudent
.
I abused the doctor, and came very near putting
my foot into it, with Captain Latimer, who is an officer that
it will not do, always, to trifle with. Still, these gentlemen,
with Captain Bolton, had more consideration for me, than
I had for myself, and I escaped with only a good reprimand.
It was owing to this frolic, however, that I was invalided
homeas they call it out there, no one seeming to consider
Pensacola as being in the United States.
When landed from the Levant, I was sent to the Navy
Yard Hospital, Brooklyn. After staying two or three days
here, I determined to go to the seat of government, and take
a look at the great guns stationed there, Uncle Sam and all.
I was paid off from the Levant, accordingly, and leaving
the balance with the purser of the yard, I set off on my
journey, with fifty dollars in my pockets, which they tell
me is about a member of Congress' mileage, for the
distance
I had to go. Of course this was enough, as a
member
of Congress would naturally take care and give himself
as much as he wanted.
When I got on board the South-Amboy boat, I found a
party of Indians there, going to head-quarters, like myself.
The sight of these chaps set up all my rigging, and I felt
ripe for fun. I treated them to a breakfast each, and gave
them as much to drink as they could swallow. We all got
merry, and had our own coarse fun, in the usual
thoughtless
manner of seamen. This was a bad beginning, and,
by the time we reached a tavern, I was ready to anchor.
Where this was, is more than I know; for I was not in a
state to keep a ship's reckoning. Whether any of my
money
was stolen or not, I cannot say, but I know that some
of my clothes were. Next day I got to Philadelphia, where
I had another frolic. After this, I went on to Washington,
keeping it up, the whole distance. I fell in with a soldier
chap, who was out of cash, and who was going to
Washington
to get a pension, too; and so we lived in common.
When we reached Washington, my cash was diminished to
three dollars and a half, and all was the consequences of
brandy and folly. I had actually spent forty-six dollars
and a half, in a journey that might have been made with
ten, respectably!
I got my travelling companion to recommend a
boarding-house
,
which he did. I felt miserable from my excesses,
and went to bed. In the morning, the three dollars and a
half were gone. I felt too ill to go to the Department that
day, but kept on drinkingeating nothing. Next day, my
landlord took the trouble to inquire into the state of my
pocket, and I told him the truth. This brought about a
pretty free explanation between us, in which I was given to
understand that my time was up in that place. I afterwards
found out I had got into a regular soldier-house, and it was
no wonder they did not know how to treat an old salt.
Captain Mix had given me a letter to Commodore
Chauncey
,
who was then living, and one of the Commissioners. I
felt pretty certain the old gentleman would not let one of the
Scourges founder at head-quarters, and so I crawled up to
the Department, and got admission to him. The commodore
seemed glad to see me; questioned me a good deal about the
loss of the schooner, and finally gave me directions how to
proceed. I then discovered that my pension ticket had
actually reached Washington, but had been sent back to
Pensacola, to get some informality corrected. This would
compel me to remain some time at Washington. I felt
unwell, and got back to my boarding-house with these
tidings. The gentleman who kept the house was far from
being satisfied with this, and he gave me a hint that at once
put the door between us. This was the first time I ever had
a door shut upon me, and I am thankful it happened at a
soldier rendezvous. I gave the man all my spare clothes in
pawn, and walked away from his house.
I had undoubtedly brought on myself a fit of the horrors,
by my recent excesses. As I went along the streets, I
thought every one was sneering at me; and, though burning
with thirst, I felt ashamed to enter any house to ask even
for water. A black gave me the direction of the Navy
Yard, and I shaped my course for it, feeling more like lying
down to die, than anything else. When about half-way
across the bit of vacant land between the Capitol and the
Yard, I sat down under a high picket-fence, and the devil
put it into my head, that it would be well to terminate
sufferings
that seemed too hard to be borne, by hanging myself
on that very fence. I took the handkerchief from my neck,
made a running bow-line, and got so far as to be at work at
a standing bow-line, to hitch over the top of one of the poles
of the fence.
I now stood up, and began to look for a proper picket to
make fast to, when, in gazing about, I caught sight of the
must-heads of the shipping at the yard, and of the ensign
under which I had so long served! These came over me,
as a lighthouse comes over a mariner in distress at sea, and
I thought there must be friends for me in that quarter. The
sight gave me courage and strength, and I determined no old
shipmate should hear of a blue-jacket's hanging himself on
a picket, in a fit of the horrors. Casting off the bowlines, I
replaced the handkerchief on my neck, and made the best
of my way towards those blessed mast-heads, which, under
God's mercy, were the means of preventing me from
committing
suicide.
As I came up to the gate of the yard, the marine on post
sung out to me, Halloo, Myers, where are you come from?
You look as if you had been dragged through h, and beaten
with a soot-bag! This man, the first I met at the Navy
Yard, had been with me three years in the Delaware, and
knew me in spite of my miserable appearance. He advised
me to go on board the Fulton, then lying at the Yard, where
he said I should find several more old Delawares, who would
take good care of me. I did as he directed, and, on getting
on board, I fell in with lots of acquaintances. Some brought
me tea, and some brought me grog. I told my yarn, and
18
the chaps around me laid a plan to get ashore on liberty that
night, and raze the house from which I had been turned
away. But I persuaded them out of the notion, and the
landlord went clear.
After a while, I got a direction to a boarding-house near
the Yard, and went to it, with a message from my old
shipmates
that they would be responsible for the pay. But to
this the man would not listen; he took me in on my own
account, saying that no blue-jacket should be turned from
his
door, in distress. Here I staid and got a comfortable
night's rest. Next day I was a new man, holy-stoned the
decks, and went a second time to the Department.
All the gentlemen in the office showed a desire to serve
and advise me. The Pension Clerk gave me a letter to Mr.
Boyle, the Chief Clerk, who gave me another letter to
Commodore
Patterson, the commandant of the Navy-Yard. It
seems that government provides a boarding-house for us
pensioners
to stay in, while at Washington, looking after our
rights. This letter of Mr. Boyle's got me a berth in that house,
where I was supplied with everything, even to washing and
mending, for six weeks. Through the purser, I drew a
stock of money from the purser at New York, and now
began, again, to live soberly and respectably, considering
all things.
The house in which I lived was a sort of half-hospital,
and may have had six or eight of us in it, altogether.
Several of us were cripples from wounds and hurts, and,
among others, was one Reuben James, a thorough old
man-of-war's
man, who had been in the service ever since he was
a youth. This man had the credit of saving Decatur's life
before Tripoli; but he owned to me that he was not the
person who did it. He was in the fight, and boarded with
Decatur, but did not save his commander's life. He had
been often wounded, and had just had a leg amputated for
an old wound, received in the war of 1812, I believe. Liquor
brought him to that.
The reader will remember that the night the Scourge went
down I received a severe blow from her jib-sheet blocks. A
lump soon formed on the spot where the injury had been
inflicted, and it had continued to increase until it was now
as large as my fist, or even larger. I showed this lump to
James, one day, and he mentioned it to Dr. Foltz, the
surgeon
who attended the house. The doctor took a look at
my arm, and recommended an operation, as the lump would
continue to increase, and was already so large as to be
inconvenient
.
I cannot say that it hurt me any, though it
was an awkward sort of swab to be carrying on a fellow's
shoulder. I had no great relish for being carved, and think
I should have refused to submit to the operation, were it not
for James, who told me he would not be carrying Bunker
Hill about on
his
arm, and would show me his own stump
by way of encouragement. This man seemed to think an
old sailor ought to have a wooden leg, or something of the
sort, after he had reached a certain time of life. At all
events, he persuaded me to let the doctor go to work, and I
am now glad I did, as everything turned out well. Doctor
Foltz operated, after I had been about a week under
medicine
,
doing the job as neatly as man could wish. He told
me the lump he removed weighed a pound and three
quarters
,
and of course I was so much the lighter. I was about
a month, after this, under his care, when he pronounced me
to be sea-worthy again.
I now got things straight as regards my pension, for the
hurt received on board the Constellation. It was no great
matter, only three dollars a month, being one of the small
pensions; and the clerks, when they came to hear about the
hurt, for which Dr. Foltz had operated, advised me to get
evidence and procure a pension for
that
. I saw the
Secretary
,
Mr. Paulding, on this subject, and the gentlemen were
so kind as to overhaul their papers, in order to ascertain who
could be found as a witness. They wrote to Captain
Deacon
,
the officer who commanded the Growler; but he knew
nothing of me, as I never was on board his schooner. This
gentleman, however, wrote me a letter, himself, inviting me
to come and see him, which I had it not in my power to do.
I understand he is now dead. Mr. Trant had been dead
many years, and, as for Mr. Bogardus, I never knew what
became of him. He was not in the line of promotion, and
probably left the navy at the peace. In overhauling the
books, however, the pension-clerk came across the name
of Lemuel Bryant. This man received a pension for the
would he got at Little York, and was one of those I had
hauled into the boat when the Scourge went down. He was
then living at Portland, in Maine, his native State. Mr.
Paulding advised me to get his certificate, for all hands in
the Department seemed anxious I should not go away
without
something better than the three dollars a month. I
promised
to go on, and see Lemuel Bryant, and obtain his
testimony
.
Quitting Washington, I went to Alexandria and got on
board a brig, called the Isabella, bound to New York, at
which port we arrived in due time. Here I obtained the
rest of my money, and kept myself pretty steady, more on
account of my wounds, I fear, than anything else. Still I
drank too much; and by way of putting a check on myself,
I went to the Sailor's Retreat, Staten Island, and of course
got out of the reach of liquor. Here I staid eight or ten
days, until my wounds healed. While at the Retreat, the
last day I remained there indeed, which was a Sunday, the
physician came in, and told me that a clergyman of the
Dutch Reformed Church, of the name of Miller, was about
to have service down stairs, and that I had better go down
and be present. To this request, not only civilly but kindly
made, I answered that I had seen enough of the acts of
religious
men to satisfy me, and that I believed a story I was
then reading in a Magazine, would do me as much good as
a sermon. The physician said a little in the way of reproof
and admonition, and left me. As soon as his back was
turned, some of my companions began to applaud the spirit
I had shown, and the answer I had given the doctor. But
I was not satisfied with myself. I had more secret respect
for such things than I was willing to own, and conscience
upbraided me for the manner in which I had slighted so
well-meaning a request. Suddenly telling those around me
that my mind was changed, and that I
would
go below and
hear what was said, I put this new resolution in effect
immediately
.
I had no recollection of the text from which Mr. Miller
preached; it is possible I did not attend to it, at the moment
it was given out; but, during the whole discourse, I fancied
the clergyman was addressing himself particularly to me,
and that his eyes were never off me. That he touched my
conscience I know, for the effect produced by this sermon,
though not uninterruptedly lasting, is remembered to the
present hour. I made many excellent resolutions, and
secretly
resolved to reform, and to lead a better life. My
thoughts were occupied the whole night with what I had
heard, and my conscience was keenly active.
The next morning I quitted the Retreat, and saw no more
of Mr. Miller, at that time; but I carried away with me
many resolutions that would have been very admirable, had
they only been adhered to. How short-lived they were,
and how completely I was the slave of a vicious habit, will
be seen, when I confess that I landed in New York a good
deal the worse for having treated some militia-men who
were in the steamer, to nearly a dozen glasses of hot-stuff,
in crossing the bay. I had plenty of money, and a sailor's
disposition to get rid of it, carelessly, and what I thought
generously. It was Evacuation-Day, and severely cold,
and the hot-stuff pleased everybody, on such an occasion.
Nor was this all. In passing Whitehall slip, I saw the
Ohio's first-cutter lying there, and it happened that I not
only knew the officer of the boat, who had been one of the
midshipmen of the Constellation, but that I knew most of its
crew. I was hailed, of course, and then I asked leave to
treat the men. The permission was obtained, and this
second
act of liberality reduced me to the necessity of going
into port, under a pilot's charge. Still I had not absolutely
forgotten the sermon, nor all my good resolutions.
At the boarding-house I found a Prussian, named
Godfrey
,
a steady, sedate man, and I agreed with him to go to
Savannah, to engage in the shad-fishery, for the winter, and
to come north together in the spring. My landlord was not
only ill and poor, but he had many children to support, and
it is some proof that all my good resolutions were not
forgotten
,
that I was ready to go south before my money was
gone, and willing it should do some good, in the interval of
my absence. A check for fifty dollars still remained
untouched
,
and I gave it to this man, with the understanding
he was to draw the money, use it for his own wants, and
return it to me, if he could, when I got back. The money
was drawn, but the man died, and I saw no more of it.
Godfrey and I were shipped in a vessel called the William
Taylor, a regular Savannah packet. It was our intention
18 *
to quit her as soon as she got inby running, if necessary.
We had a bad passage, and barely missed shipwreck on
Hatteras, saving the brig by getting a sudden view of the
light, in heavy, thick weather. We got round, under
close-reefed
topsails, and that was all we did. After this, we had
a quick run to Savannah. Godfrey had been taken with
the small-pox before we arrived, and was sent to a hospital
as soon as possible. In order to prevent running, I feigned
illness, too, and went to another. Here the captain paid me
several visits, but my conscience was too much hardened by
the practices of seamen, to let me hesitate about continuing
to be ill. The brig was obliged to sail without me, and the
same day I got well, as suddenly as I had fallen ill.
I was not long in making a bargain with a fisherman to
aid in catching shad. All this time, I lived at a sailor
boarding-house
,
and was surrounded by men who, like myself,
had quitted the vessels in which they had arrived. One
night the captain of a ship, called the Hope, came to the
house to look for a crew. He was bound to Rotterdam, and
his ship lay down at the second bar, all ready for sea. After
some talk, one man signed the articles; then another, and
another, and another, until his crew was complete to one
man. I was now called on to ship, and was ridiculed for
wishing to turn shad-man. My pride was touched, and I
agreed to go, leaving my fisherman in the lurch.
The Hope turned out to be a regular down-east craft, and
I had been in so many flyers and crack ships as to be saucy
enough to laugh at the economical outfit, and staid ways of
the vessel. I went on board half drunk, and made myself
conspicuous for such sort of strictures from the first hour.
The captain treated me mildly, even kindly; but I stuck to
my remarks during most of the passage. I was a seaman,
and did my duty; but this satisfied me. I had taken a
disgust
to the ship; and though I had never blasphemed since
the hour of the accident in the way I did the day the Susan
and Mary was thrown on her beam-ends, I may be said to
have crossed the Atlantic in the Hope, grumbling and
swearing
at the ship. Still, our living and our treatment were
both good.
At Rotterdam, we got a little money, with liberty. When
the last was up, I asked for more, and the captain refused it.
This brought on an explosion, and I swore I would quit the
ship. After a time, the captain consented, as well as he
could, leaving my wages on the cabin-table, where I found
them, and telling me I should repeat of what I was then
doing. Little did I then think he would prove so true a
prophet.
CHAPTER XVIII.
I had
left the Hope in a fit of the sulks. The vessel
never pleased me, and yet I can now look back, and
acknowledge
that both her master and her mate were
respectable
,
considerate men, who had my own good in view more
than I had myself. There was an American ship, called
the Plato, in port, and I had half a mind to try my luck in
her. The master of this vessel was said to be a tartar,
however, and a set of us had doubts about the expediency
of trusting ourselves with such a commander. When we
came to sound around him, we discovered he would have
nothing to do with us, as he intended to get a crew of
regular
Dutchmen. This ship had just arrived from Batavia,
and was bound to New York. How he did this legally, or
whether he did it at all, is more than I know, for I only tell
what I was told myself, on this subject.
There was a heavy Dutch Indiaman, then fitting out for
Java, lying at Rotterdam. The name of this vessel was
the Stadtdeelso pronounced; how spelt, I have no idea
and I began to think I would try a voyage in her. As is
common with those who have great reason to find fault
with themselves, I was angry with the whole world. I
began to think myself a sort of outcast, forgetting that I
had deserted my natural relatives, run from my master, and
thrown off many friends who were disposed to serve me in
everything in which I could be served. I have a cheerful
temperament by nature, and I make no doubt that the
sombre
view I now began to take of things, was the effects of
drink. It was necessary for me to get to sea, for there I
was shut out from all excesses, by discipline and necessity.
After looking around us, and debating the matter among
ourselves, a party of five of us shipped in the Stadtdeel.
What the others contemplated I do not know, but it was
my intention to double Good Hope, and never to return.
Chances enough would offer on the other side, to make a
man comfortable, and I was no stranger
of
the ways of that
quarter of the world. I could find enough to do between
Bombay and Canton; and, if I could not, there were the
islands and all of the Pacific before me. I could do
a seaman's whole duty, was now in tolerable health and
strength, and knew that such men were always wanted.
Wherever a ship goes, Jack must go with her, and ships,
dollars and hogs, are now to be met with all over the globe.
The Stadtdeel lay at Dort, and we went to that place to
join her. She was not ready for sea, and as things moved
Dutchman fashion, slow and sure, we were about six weeks
at Dort before she sailed. This ship was a vessel of the
size of a frigate, and carried twelve guns. She had a crew
of about forty souls, which was being very short-handed.
The ship's company was a strange mixture of seamen,
though most of them came from the north of Europe.
Among us were Russians, Danes, Swedes, Prussians,
English
,
Americans, and but a very few Dutch. One of the
mates, and two of the petty officers, could speak a little
English. This made us eight who could converse in that
language. We had to learn Dutch as well as we could,
and made out tolerably well. Before the ship sailed, I
could understand the common orders, without much
difficulty
.
Indeed, the language is nothing but English a little
flattened down.
So long as we remained at Dort, the treatment on board
this vessel was well enough. We were never well fed,
though we got enough food, such as it was. The work
was hard, and the weather cold; but these did not frighten
me. The wages were eight dollars a month;I had
abandoned
eighteen, and an American ship, for this preferment!
A wayward temper had done me this service.
The Stadtdeel no sooner got into the stream, than there
was a great change in the treatment. We were put on an
allowance of food and water, in sight of our place of
departure
;
and the rope's-end began to fly round among the crew,
we five excepted. For some reason, that I cannot explain,
neither of us was ever struck. We got plenty of curses,
in Low Dutch, as we supposed; and we gave them back,
with interest, in high English. The expression of our faces
let the parties into the secret of what was going on.
It is scarcely necessary to add, that we English and
Americans
soon repented of the step we had taken. I heartily
wished myself on board the Hope, again, and the master's
prophecy became true, much sooner, perhaps, than he had
himself anticipated. This time, I conceive that my disgust
was fully justified; though I deserved the punishment I was
receiving, for entering so blindly into a service every way
so inferior to that to which I properly belonged. The
bread in this ship was wholesome, I do suppose, but it was
nearly black, and such as I was altogether unused to.
Inferior
as it was, we got but five pounds, each, per week. In
our navy, a man gets, per week, seven pounds of such bread
as might be put on a gentleman's table. The meat was little
better than the bread in quality, and quite as scant in
quantity
.
We got one good dish in the Stadtdeel, and that we
got every morning. It was a dish of boiled barley, of which
I became very fond, and which, indeed, supplied me with
the strength necessary for my duty. It was one of the best
dishes I ever fell in with at sea; and I think it might be
introduced
,
to advantage, in our service. Good food produces
good work.
As all our movements were of the slow and easy order,
the ship lay three weeks at the Helvoetsluys, waiting for
passengers
.
During this time, our party, three English and
two Americans, came to a determination to abandon the ship.
Our plan was to seize a boat, as we passed down channel,
and get ashore in England. We were willing to run all the
risks of such a step, in preference of going so long a
voyage
under such treatment and food. By this time, our
discontent
amounted to disgust.
At length we got all our passengers on board. These
consisted of a family, of which the head was said to be, or
to have been, an admiral in the Dutch navy. This
gentleman
was going to Java to remain; and he took with him
his wife, several children, servants, and a lady, who seemed
to be a companion to his wife. As soon as this party was
on board, the wind coming fair, we sailed. The Plato went
to sea in company with us, and little did I then think, while
wishing myself on board her, how soon I should be thrown
into this very shipthe last craft in which I ever was at sea.
I was heaving the lead as we passed her; our ship,
Dutchman
or not, having a fleet pair of heels. The Stadtdeel,
whatever might be her usage, or her food, sailed and worked
well, and was capitally found in everything that related to
the safety of the vessel. This was her first voyage, and
she was said to be the largest ship out of Rotterdam.
The Stadtdeel must have sailed from Helvoetsluys in May,
1839, or about thirty-three years after I sailed from New
York, on my first voyage, in the Sterling. During all this
time I had been toiling at sea, like a dog, risking my health
and life, in a variety of ways; and this ship, with my station
on board her, was nearly all I had to show for it! God be
praised! This voyage, which promised so little, in its
commencement
,
proved, in the end, the most fortunate of any in
which I embarked.
There was no opportunity for us to put our plans in
execution
,
in going down channel. The wind was fair, and it
blew so fresh, it would not have been easy to get a boat into
the water; and we passed the Straits of Dover, by day-light,
the very day we sailed. The wind held in the same
quarter
,
until we reached the north-east trades, giving us a quick
run as low down as the calm latitudes. All this time, the
treatment was as bad as ever, or, if anything, worse; and
our discontent increased daily. There were but one or two
native Hollanders in the forecastle, boys excepted; but
among them was a man who had shipped as an ordinary
seaman. He had been a soldier, I believe; at all events, he
had a medal, received in consequence of having been in one
of the late affairs between his country and Belgium. It is
probable this man may not have been very expert in a
seaman's
duty, and it is possible he may have been drinking,
though to me he appeared sober, at the time the thing
occurred
which I am about to relate. One day the captain fell
foul of him, and beat him with a rope severely. The ladies
interfered, and got the poor fellow out of the scrape; the
captain letting him go, and telling him to go forward. As
the man complied, he fell in with the chief mate, who
attacked
him afresh, and beat him very severely. The man
now went below, and was about to turn in, as the captain
had ordered,which renders it probable he had been
drinking
,when
the second mate, possibly ignorant of what had
occurred, missing him from his duty, went below, and beat
him up on deck again. These different assaults seem to
have made the poor fellow desperate. He ran and jumped
into the sea, just forward of the starboard
lower-studding-sail-boom
.
The ship was then in the north-east trades, and
had eight or nine knots way on her; notwithstanding, she
was rounded to, and a boat was loweredbut the man was
never found. There is something appalling in seeing a
fellow-creature
driven to such acts of madness; and the effect
produced on all of us, by what we witnessed, was profound
and sombre.
I shall not pretend to say that this man did not deserve
chastisement, or that the two mates were not ignorant of
what had happened; but brutal treatment was so much in
use on board this ship, that the occurrence made us five
nearly desperate. I make no doubt a crew of Americans,
who were thus treated, would have secured the officers, and
brought the ship in. It is true, that flogging seems
necessary
to some natures, and I will not say that such a crew
as ours could very well get along without it. But we might
sometimes be treated as men, and no harm follow.
As I have said, the loss of this man produced a great
impression in the ship, generally. The passengers appeared
much affected by it, and I thought the captain, in particular,
regretted it greatly. He might not have been in the least to
blame, for the chastisement he inflicted was such as masters
of ships often bestow on their men, but the crew felt very
indignant against the mates; one of whom was particularly
obnoxious to us all. As for my party, we now began to
plot, again, in order to get quit of the ship. After a great
deal of discussion, we came to the following resolution:
About a dozen of us entered into the conspiracy. We
contemplated no piracy, no act of violence, that should not
be rendered necessary in self-defence, nor any robbery,
beyond what we conceived indispensable to our object. As
the ship passed the Straits of Sunda, we intended to lower
as many boats as should be necessary, arm ourselves, place
provisions and water in the boats, and abandon the ship.
We felt confident that if most of the men did not go with us,
they would not oppose us. I can now see that this was a
desperate and unjustifiable scheme; but, for myself, I was
getting desperate on board the ship, and preferred risking
my life to remaining. I will not deny that I was a
ringleader
in this affair, though I know I had no other motive
than escape. This was a clear case of mutiny, and the only
one in which I was ever implicated. I have a thousand
times seen reason to rejoice that the attempt was never
made, since, so deep was the hostility of the crew to the
officers,the mates, in particular,that I feel persuaded a
horrible scene of bloodshed must have followed. I did not
think of this at the time, making sure of getting off
unresisted
;
but, if we had, what would have been the fate of a
parcel of seamen who came into an English port in ship's
boats? Tried for piracy, probably, and the execution of
some, if not all of us.
The ship had passed the island of St. Pauls, and we were
impatiently waiting for her entrance into the Straits of
Sunda, when an accident occurred that put a stop to the
contemplated mutiny, and changed the whole current, as I
devoutly hope, of all my subsequent life. At the calling of
the middle watch, one stormy night, the ship being under
close-reefed topsails at the time, with the mainsail furled, I
went on deck as usual, to my duty. In stepping across the
deck, between the launch and the galley, I had to cross
some spars that were lashed there. While on the pile of
spars, the ship lurched suddenly, and I lost my balance,
falling my whole length on deck, upon my left side.
Nothing
broke the fall, my arms being raised to seize a hold
above my head, and I came down upon deck with my
entire
weight, the hip taking the principal force of the fall.
The anguish I suffered was acute, and it was some time
before
I would allow my shipmates even to touch me.
After a time, I was carried down into the steerage, where
it was found necessary to sling me on a grating, instead of
a hammock. We had a doctor on board, but he could do
nothing for me. My clothes could not be taken off, and
there I lay wet, and suffering to a degree that I should find
difficult to describe, hours and hours.
I was now really on the stool of repentance. In body, I
was perfectly helpless, though my mind seemed more active
than it had ever been before. I overhauled my whole life,
beginning with the hour when I first got drunk, as a boy,
on board the Sterling, and underrunning every scrape I have
mentioned in this sketch of my life, with many of which I
have not spoken; and all with a fidelity and truth that
satisfy me that man can keep no log-book that is as
accurate
as his own conscience. I saw that I had been my own
worst enemy, and how many excellent opportunities of
getting
ahead in the world, I had wantonly disregarded.
Liquor
lay at the root of all my calamities and misconduct,
enticing me into bad company, undermining my health and
strength, and blasting my hopes. I tried to pray, but did
not know how; and, it appeared to me, as if I were lost,
body and soul, without a hope of mercy.
My shipmates visited me by stealth, and I pointed out to
them, as clearly as in my power, the folly, as well as the
wickedness, of our contemplated mutiny. I told them we
had come on board the ship voluntarily, and we had no
right to be judges in our own case; that we should have
done a cruel thing in deserting a ship at sea, with women
and children on board; that the Malays would probably
have cut our throats, and the vessel herself would have been
very apt to be wrecked. Of all this mischief, we should
have been the fathers, and we had every reason to be
grateful that our project was defeated. The men listened
attentively, and promised to abandon every thought of
executing
the revolt. They were as good as their words, and
I heard no more of the matter.
As for my hurt, it was not easy to say what it was. The
doctor was kind to me, but he could do no more than give
me food and little indulgencies. As for the captain, I think
he was influenced by the mate, who appeared to believe I
was feigning an injury much greater than I had actually
received. On board the ship, there was a boy, of good
parentage, who had been sent out to commence his career
at sea. He lived aft, and was a sort of genteel cabin-boy.
He could not have been more than ten or eleven years old
19
but he proved to be a ministering angel to me. He brought
me delicacies, sympathised with me, and many a time did
we shed tears in company. The ladies and the admiral's
children sometimes came to see me, too, manifesting much
sorrow for my situation; and then it was that my conscience
pricked the deepest, for the injury, or risks, I had
contemplated
exposing them to. Altogether, the scenes I saw daily,
and my own situation, softened my heart, and I began to
get views of my moral deformity that were of a healthful
and safe character.
I lay on that grating two months, and bitter months they
were to me. The ship had arrived at Batavia, and the
captain
and mate came to see what was to be done with me. I
asked to be sent to the hospital, but the mate insisted nothing
was the matter with me, and asked to have me kept in the
ship. This was done, and I went round to Terragall in her,
where we landed our passengers. These last all came and
took leave of me, the admiral making me a present of a
good jacket, that he had worn himself at sea, with a
quantity
of tobacco. I have got that jacket at this moment. The
ladies spoke kindly to me, and all this gave my heart fresh
pangs.
From Terragall we went to Sourabaya, where I prevailed
on the captain to send me to the hospital, the mate still
insisting
I was merely shamming inability to work. The
surgeons at Sourabaya, one of whom was a Scotchman,
thought with the mate; and at the end of twenty days, I was
again taken on board the ship, which sailed for Samarang.
While at Sourabaya there were five English sailors in the
hospital. These men were as forlorn and miserable as
myself
,
death grinning in our faces at every turn. The men
who were brought into the hospital one day, were often dead
the next, and none of us knew whose turn would come next.
We often talked together, on religious subjects, after our
own uninstructed manner, and greatly did we long to find
an English bible, a thing not to be had there. Then it was
I thought, again, of the sermon I had heard at the Sailors'
Retreat, of the forfeited promises I had made to reform; and,
more than once did it cross my mind, should God permit
me to return home, that I would seek out that minister, and
ask his prayers and spiritual advice.
On our arrival at Samarang, the mate got a doctor from
a Dutch frigate, to look at me, who declared nothing ailed
me. By these means nearly all hands in the ship were
set against me, but my four companions, and the little boy;
fancying that I was a skulk, and throwing labour on them.
I was ordered on deck, and set to work graffing ring-bolts
for the guns. Walk I could not, being obliged, literally, to
crawl along the deck on my hands and knees. I suffered
great pain, but got no credit for it. The work was easy
enough for me, when once seated at it, but it caused me
infinite
suffering to move. I was not alone in being thought a
skulk, however. The doctor himself was taken ill, and the
mate accused him, too, very much as he did me, of shirking
duty. Unfortunately, the poor man gave him the lie, by
dying.
I was kept at the sort of duty I have mentioned until the
ship reached Batavia again. Here a doctor came on board
from another ship, on a visit, and my case was mentioned.
The mate ordered me aft, and I crawled upon the
quarter-deck
to be examined. They got me into the cabin, where
the strange doctor looked at me. This man said I must be
operated on by a burning process, all of which was said to
frighten me to duty. After this I got down into the
forecastle
,
and positively refused to do anything more. There
I lay, abused and neglected by all but my four friends. I
told the mate I suffered too much to work, and that I must
be put ashore. Suffering had made me desperate, and I
cared not for the consequences.
Fortunately for me, there were two cases of fever and ague
in the ship. Our own doctor being dead, that of the admiral's
ship was sent for to visit the sick. The mate seemed
anxious to get evidence against me, and he asked the
admiral's
surgeon to come down and see me. The moment this
gentleman laid eyes on me, he raised both arms, and
exclaimed
that they were killing me. He saw, at once, that
I was no impostor, and stated as much in pretty plain
language
,
so far as I could understand what he said. The
mate appeared to be struck with shame and contrition; and
I do believe that every one on board was sorry for the
treatment
I had received. I took occasion to remonstrate with
the mate, and to tell him of the necessity of my being sent
immediately to the hospital. The man promised to
represent
my case to the captain, and the next day I was landed.
My two great desires were to get to the hospital and to
procure a bible. I did not expect to live; one of my legs
being shrivelled to half its former size, and was apparently
growing worse; and could I find repose for my body and
relief for my soul, I felt that I could be happy. I had heard
my American ship-mate, who was a New Yorker, a Hudson
river man, say he had a bible; but I had never seen it. It
lay untouched in the bottom of his chest, sailor-fashion. I
offered this man a shirt for his bible; but he declined
taking
any pay, cheerfully giving me the book. I forced the
shirt on him, however, as a sort of memorial of me. Now
I was provided with the book, I could not read for want of
spectacles. I had reached a time of life when the sight
begins
to fail, and I think my eyes were injured in Florida.
In Sourayaba hospital I had raised a few rupees by the sale
of a black silk handkerchief, and wanted now to procure a
pair of spectacles. I sold a pair of boots, and adding the
little sum thus raised to that which I had already, I felt
myself
rich and happy, in the prospect of being able to study
the word of God. On quitting the ship, everybody,
forward
and aft, shook hands with me, the opinion of the
man-of-war
surgeon suddenly changing all their opinions of me
and my conduct.
The captain appeared to regret the course things had
taken, and was willing to do all he could to make me
comfortable
.
My wages were left in a merchant's hands, and I
was to receive them could I quit this island, or get out of
the hospital. I was to be sent to Holland, in the latter case,
and everything was to be done according to law and right.
The reader is not to imagine I considered myself a suffering
saint all this time. On the contrary, while I was thought
an impostor, I remembered that I had shammed sickness in
this very island, and, as I entered the hospital, I could not
forget the circumstances under which I had been its tenant
fifteen or twenty years before. Then I was in the pride
of my youth and strength; and, now, as if in punishment
for the deception, I was berthed, a miserable cripple, within
half-a-dozen beds of that on which I was berthed when
feigning
an illness I did not really suffer. Under such
circumstances
,
conscience is pretty certain to remind a sinner of
his misdeeds.
The physician of the hospital put me on very low diet,
and gave me an ointment to smear myself with, as he
called it; and I was ordered to remain in my berth. By
means of one of the coolies of the hospital, I got a pair of
spectacles from the town, and such a pair, as to size and
form, that people in America regard what is left of them as
a curiosity. They served my purpose, however, and enabled
me to read the precious book I had obtained from my
northriver
shipmate. This book was a copy from the American
Bible Society's printing-office, and if no other of their works
did good, this must be taken for an exception. It has since
been placed in the Society's Library, in memory of the good
it has done.
My sole occupation was reading and reflecting. There I
lay, in a distant island, surrounded by disease, death daily,
nay hourly making his appearance, among men whose
language
was mostly unknown to me. It was several weeks
before I was allowed even to quit my bunk. I had begun
to pray before I left the ship, and this practice I continued,
almost hourly, until I was permitted to rise. A converted
Lascar was in the hospital, and seeing my occupation, he
came and conversed with me, in his broken English. This
man gave me a hymn-book, and one of the first hymns I
read in it afforded me great consolation. It was written by
a man who had been a sailor like myself, and one who had
been almost as wicked as myself, but who has since done a
vast deal of good, by means of precept and example. This
hymn-book I now read in common with my bible. But I
cannot express the delight I felt at a copy of Pilgrim's
Progress
which this same Lascar gave me. That book I
consider
as second only to the bible. It enabled me to
understand
and to apply a vast deal that I found in the word of
God, and set before my eyes so many motives for hope, that
I began to feel Christ had died for me, as well as for the rest
of the species. I thought if the thief on the cross could be
saved, even one as wicked as I had been had only to repent
and believe, to share in the Redeemer's mercy. All this
time I fairly pined for religious instruction, and my thoughts
would constantly recur to the sermon I had heard at the
19 *
Sailor's Retreat, and to the clergyman who had
preached
it.
There was an American carpenter in the Fever Hospital,
who, hearing of my state, gave me some tracts that he had
brought from home with him. This man was not pious,
but circumstances had made him serious; and, being about
to quit the place, he was willing to administer to my wants.
He told me there were several Englishmen and one
American
in his hospital, who wanted religious consolation greatly,
and he advised me to crawl over and see them; which I did,
as soon as it was in my power.
At first, I thought myself too wicked to offer to pray and
converse with these men, but my conscience would not let
me rest until I did so. It appeared to me as if the bible had
been placed in my way, as much for their use as my own,
and I could not rest until I had offered them all the
consolation
it was in my power to bestow. I read with these men
for two or three weeks; Chapman, the American, being the
man who considered his own moral condition the most
hopeless
.
When unable to go myself, I would send my books,
and we had the bible and Pilgrim's Progress, watch and
watch, between us.
All this time we were living, as it might be, on a bloody
battle-field. Men died in scores around us, and at the shortest
notice. Batavia, at that season, was the most sickly; and,
although the town was by no means as dangerous then as
it had been in my former visit, it was still a sort of
Golgotha
,
or place of skulls. More than half who entered the
Fever Hospital, left it only as corpses.
Among my English associates, as I call them, was a
young Scotchman, of about five-and-twenty. This man
had been present at most of our readings and conversations,
though he did not appear to me as much impressed with the
importance of caring for his soul, as some of the others.
One day he came to take leave of me. He was to quit the
hospital the following morning. I spoke to him concerning
his future life, and endeavoured to awaken in him some
feelings
that might be permanent. He listened with proper
respect, but his answers were painfully inconsiderate, though
I do believe he reasoned as nine in ten of mankind reason,
when they think at all on such subjects. What's the use
of my giving up so soon, he said; I am young, and
strong, and in good health, and have plenty of sea-room to
leeward of me, and can fetch up when there is occasion for
it. If a fellow don't live while he can, he 'll never live. I
read to him the parable of the wise and foolish virgins, but
he left me holding the same opinion, to the last.
Directly in front of my ward was the dead-house. Thither
all the bodies of those who died in the hospital were
regularly
carried for dissection. Scarcely one escaped being
subjected to the knife. This dead-house stood some eighty,
or a hundred, yards from the hospital, and between them
was an area, containing a few large trees. I was in the
habit, after I got well enough to go out, to hobble to one of
these trees, where I would sit for hours, reading and
meditating
.
It was a good place to make a man reflect on the
insignificance of worldly things, disease and death being all
around him. I frequently saw six or eight bodies carried
across this area, while sitting in it, and many were taken
to the dead-house, at night. Hundreds, if not thousands,
were in the hospital, and a large proportion died.
The morning of the day but one, after I had taken leave
of the young Scotchman, I was sitting under a tree, as
usual, when I saw some coolies carrying a dead body across
the area. They passed quite near me, and one of the coolies
gave me to understand it was that of this very youth! He
had been seized with the fever, a short time after he left me,
and here was a sudden termination to all his plans of
enjoyment
and his hopes of life; his schemes of future repentance.
Such things are of frequent occurrence in that island, but
this event made a very deep impression on me. It helped
to strengthen me in my own resolutions, and I used it, I
hope, with effect, with my companions whose lives were
still spared.
All the Englishmen got well, and were discharged.
Chapman
,
the American, however, remained, being exceedingly
feeble with the disease of the country. With this poor
young man, I prayed, as well as I knew how, and read,
daily, to his great comfort and consolation, I believe. The
reader may imagine how one dying in a strange land,
surrounded
by idolaters, would lean on a single countryman
who was disposed to aid him. In this manner did
Chapman
19*
lean on me, and all my efforts were to induce him to
lean on the Saviour. He thought he had been too great a
sinner to be entitled to any hope, and my great task was to
overcome in him some of those stings of conscience which
it had taken the grace of God to allay in myself. One day,
the last time I was with him, I read the narrative of the
thief on the cross. He listened to it eagerly, and when I
had ended, for the first time, he displayed some signs of
hope and joy. As I left him, he took leave of me, saying
we should never meet again. He asked my prayers, and I
promised them. I went to my own ward, and, while
actually
engaged in redeeming my promise, one came to tell
me he had gone. He sent me a message, to say he died a
happy man. The poor fellowhappy fellow, would be a
better termsent back all the books he had borrowed; and
it will serve to give some idea of the condition we were in,
in a temporal sense, if I add, that he also sent me a few
coppers, in order that they might contribute to the comfort
of his countrymen.
CHAPTER XIX.
About
three months after the death of Chapman, I was
well enough to quit the hospital. I could walk, with the aid
of crutches, but had no hope of ever being a sound man
again. Of course, I had an anxious desire to get home;
for all my resolutions, misanthropical feelings, and
resentments
,
had vanished in the moral change I had undergone.
My health, as a whole, was now good. Temperance,
abstinence
,
and a happy frame of mind, had proved excellent
doctors; and, although I had not, and never shall, altogether,
recover from the effects of my fall, I had quite done with
the horrors. The last fit of them I suffered was in the
deep conviction I felt concerning my sinful state. I knew
nothing of Temperance Societies  had never heard that
such things existed, or, if I had, forgot it as soon as heard;
and yet, unknown to myself, had joined the most effective
and most permanent of all these bodies. Since my fall, I
have not tasted spirituous liquors, except as medicine, and
in very small quantities, nor do I now feel the least desire
to drink. By the grace of God, the great curse of my life
has been removed, and I have lived a perfectly sober man
for the last five years. I look upon liquor as one of the
great agents of the devil in destroying souls, and turn from
it, almost as sensitively as I could wish to turn from sin.
I wrote to the merchant who held my wages, on the
subject
of quitting the hospital, but got no answer. I then
resolved to go to Batavia myself, and took my discharge
from the hospital, accordingly. I can truly say, I left that
place, into which I had entered a miserable, heart-broken
cripple, a happy man. Still, I had nothing; not even the
means of seeking a livelihood. But I was lightened of the
heaviest of all my burthens, and felt I could go through the
world rejoicing, though, literally, moving on crutches.
The hospital is seven miles from the town, and I went
this distance in a canal-boat, Dutch fashion. Many of these
canals exist in Java, and they have had the effect to make
the island much more healthy, by draining the marshes.
They told me, the canal I was on ran fifty miles into the
interior. The work was done by the natives, but under the
direction of their masters, the Dutch.
On reaching the town, I hobbled up to the merchant,
who gave me a very indifferent reception. He said I had
cost too much already, but that I must return to the
hospital
,
until an opportunity offered for sending me to Holland.
This I declined doing. Return to the hospital I would not,
as I knew it could do no good, and my wish was to get back
to America. I then went to the American consul, who
treated me kindly. I was told, however, he could do nothing
for me, as I had come out in a Dutch ship, unless I
relinquished
all claims to my wages, and all claims on the Dutch
laws. My wages were a trifle, and I had no difficulty in
relinquishing them, and as for claims, I wished to present
none on the laws of Holland.
The consul then saw the Dutch merchant, and the
matter
was arranged between them. The Plato, the very ship
that left Helvoetsluys in company with us, was then at
Batavia
,
taking in cargo for Bremenhaven. She had a new
captain
,
and he consented to receive me as a consul's man.
This matter was all settled the day I reached the town, and
I was to go on board the ship in the morning.
I said nothing to the consul about money, but left his
office with the expectation of getting some from the Dutch
merchant. I had tasted no food that day, and, on reaching
the merchant's, I found him on the point of going into the
country; no one sleeping in the town at that season, who
could help it. He took no notice of me, and I got no
assistance
;
perhaps I was legally entitled to none. I now sat
down on some boxes, and thought I would remain at that
spot until morning. Sleeping in the open air, on an empty
stomach, in that town, and at that season, would probably
have proved my death, had I been so fortunate as to escape
being murdered by the Malays for the clothes I had on.
Providence took care of me. One of the clerks, a
Portuguese
,
took pity on me, and led me to a house occupied by
a negro, who had been converted to Christianity. We met
with a good deal of difficulty in finding admission. The
black said the English and Americans were so wicked he
was afraid of them; but, finding by my discourse that I
was not one of the Christian heathen, he altered his tone,
and nothing was then too good for me. I was fed, and he
sent for my chest, receiving with it a bed and three blankets,
as a present from the charitable clerk. Thus were my
prospects
for that night suddenly changed for the better! I could
only thank God, in my inmost heart, for all his mercies.
The old black, who was a man of some means, was also
about to quit the town; but, before he went, he inquired if
I had a bible. I told him yes; still, he would not rest
until
he had pressed upon me a large bible, in English, which
language he spoke very well. This book had prayers for
seamen bound up with it. It was, in fact, a sort of
English
prayer-book, as well as bible. This I accepted, and
have now with me. As soon as the old man went away,
leaving his son behind him for the moment, I began to read
in my Pilgrim's Progress. The young man expressed a
desire to examine the book, understanding English perfectly.
After reading in it for a short time, he earnestly begged the
book, telling me he had two sisters, who would be infinitely
pleased to possess it. I could not refuse him, and he
promised
to send another book in its place, which I should find
equally good. He thus left me, taking the Pilgrim's
Progress
with him. Half an hour later a servant brought me
the promised book, which proved to be Doddridge's Rise and
Progress. On looking through the pages, I found a
Mexican
dollar wafered between two of the leaves. All this I
regarded as providential, and as a proof that the Lord would
not desert me. My gratitude, I hope, was in proportion.
This whole household appeared to be religious, for I passed
half the night in conversing with the Malay servants, on
the subject of Christianity; concerning which they had
already received many just ideas. I knew that my
teaching
was like the blind instructing the blind; but it had the
merit of coming from God, though in a degree suited to my
humble claims on his grace.
In the morning, these Malays gave me breakfast, and
then carried my chest and other articles to the Plato's boat.
I was happy enough to find myself, once more, under the
stars and stripes, where I was well received, and humanely
treated. The ship sailed for Bremen about twenty days
after I got on board her.
Of course, I could do but little on the passage. Whenever
I moved along the deck, it was by crawling, though I could
work with the needle and palm. A fortnight out, the
carpenter
,
a New York man, died. I tried to read and pray
with him, but cannot say that he showed any consciousness
of his true situation. We touched at St. Helena for water,
and, Napoleon being then dead, had no difficulty in getting
ashore. After watering we sailed again, and reached our
port in due time.
I was now in Europe, a part of the world that I had little
hopes of seeing ten months before. Still it was my desire
to get to America, and I was permitted to remain in the ship.
I was treated in the kindest manner by captain Bunting, and
Mr. Bowden, the mate, who gave me everything I needed.
At the end of a few weeks we sailed again, for New York,
where we arrived in the month of August, 1840.
I left the Plato at the quarantine ground, going to the
Sailor's Retreat. Here the physician told me I never could
recover the use of my limb as I had possessed it before, but
that the leg would gradually grow stronger, and that I might
get along without crutches in the end. All this has turned
out to be true. The pain had long before left me, weakness
being now the great difficulty. The hip-joint is injured, and
this in a way that still compels me to rely greatly on a stick
in walking.
At the Sailor's Retreat, I again met Mr. Miller. I now,
for the first time, received regular spiritual advice, and it
proved to be of great benefit to me. After remaining a
month at the Retreat, I determined to make an application
for admission to the Sailor's Snug Harbour, a richly
endowed
asylum for seamen, on the same island. In order to be
admitted, it was necessary to have sailed under the flag five
years, and to get a character. I had sailed, with two short
exceptions, thirty-four years under the flag, and I do believe
in all that time, the nineteen months of imprisonment
excluded
,
I had not been two years unattached to a ship. I
think I must have passed at least a quarter of a century out
of sight of land.
[17]
[17]
I find, in looking over his papers and accounts, that Ned,
exclusively
of all the prison-ships, transports, and vessels in which he made
passages, has belonged regularly to seventy-two different crafts! In
some of these vessels he made many voyages. In the Sterling, he
made several passages with the writer; besides four European voyages,
at a later day. He made four voyages to Havre in the Erie, which
counts as only one vessel, in the above list. He was three voyages to
London, in the Washington, &c. &c. &c.; and often made two
voyages
in the same ship. I am of opinion that Ned's calculation of his
having been twenty-five years out of sight of land is very probably
true. He must have
sailed, in all ways
, in near a hundred different
craft.
Editor
.
I now went up to New York, and hunted up captain Pell,
with whom I had sailed in the Sully and in the Normandy.
This gentleman gave me a certificate, and, as I left him,
handed me a dollar. This was every cent I had on earth.
Next, I found captain Witheroudt, of the Silvie de Grasse,
who treated me in precisely the same way. I told him I
had
one
dollar already, but he insisted it should be
two
.
With these two dollars in my pocket, I was passing up Wall
street, when, in looking about me, I saw the pension office.
The reader will remember that I left Washington with the
intention of finding Lemuel Bryant, in order to obtain his
certificate, that I might get a pension for the injury received
on board the Scourge. With this project, I had connected
a plan of returning to Boston, and of getting some
employment
in the Navy Yard. My pension-ticket had, in
consequence
,
been made payable at Boston. My arrival at New
York, and the shadding expedition, had upset all this plan;
and before I went to Savannah, I had carried my
pension-ticket
to the agent in this Wall street office, and requested
him to get another, made payable in New York. This was
the last I had seen of my ticket, and almost the last I had
thought of my pension. But, I now crossed the street, went
into the office, and was recognised immediately.
Everything
was in rule, and I came out of the office with fifty-six
dollars in my pockets! I had no thought of this pension,
at all, in coming up to town. It was so much money
showered
down upon me, unexpectedly.
For a man of my habits, who kept clear of drink, I was
now rich. Instead of remaining in town, however, I went
immediately down to the Harbour, and presented myself to
its respectable superintendant, the venerable Captain
Whetten
.
[18]
[18]
Pronounced, Wheaton.
Editor
.
I was received into the institution without any
difficulty
,
and have belonged to it ever since. My entrance at
Sailors' Snug Harbour took place Sept. 17, 1840; just one
month after I landed at Sailors' Retreat. The last of these
places is a seamen's hospital, where men are taken in only
to be cured; while the first is an asylum for worn-out
mariners
,
for life. The last is supported by a bequest made,
many years ago, by an old ship-master, whose remains lie
in front of the building.
Knowing myself now to be berthed for the rest of my
days, should I be so inclined, and should I remain worthy
to receive the benefits of so excellent an institution, I began
to look about me, like a man who had settled down in the
world. One of my first cares, was to acquit myself of the
duty of publicly joining some church of Christ, and thus
acknowledge my dependence on his redemption and mercy.
Mr. Miller, he whose sermons had made so deep an
impression
on my mind, was living within a mile and a half of the
Harbour, and to him I turned in my need. I was an
Episcopalian
by infant baptism, and I am still as much attached
to that form of worship, as to any other; but sects have little
weight with me, the heart being the main-stay, under God's
grace. Two of us, then, joined Mr. Miller's church; and I
have ever since continued one of his communicants. I have
not altogether deserted the communion in which I was
baptized
;
occasionally communing in the church of Mr. Moore.
To me, there is no difference; though I suppose more learned
Christians may find materials for a quarrel, in the
distinctions
which exist between these two churches. I hope never
to quarrel with either.
To my surprise, sometime after I was received into the
Harbour, I ascertained that my sister had removed to New
York, and was then living in the place. I felt it, now, to
be a duty to hunt her up, and see her. This I did; and we
met, again, after a separation of five-and-twenty years. She
could tell me very little of my family; but I now learned, for
the first time, that my father had been killed in battle.
Who, or what he was, I have not been able to ascertain,
beyond the facts already stated in the opening of the memoir.
I had ever retained a kind recollection of the treatment
of Captain Johnston, and accident threw into my way some
information concerning him. The superintendant had put
me in charge of the library of the institution; and, one day,
I overheard some visiters talking of Wiscasset. Upon this,
I ventured to inquire after my old master, and was glad to
learn that he was not only living, but in good health and
circumstances. To my surprise I was told that a nephew
of his was actually living within a mile of me. In
September
,
1842, I went to Wiscasset, to visit Captain Johnston,
and found myself received like the repentant prodigal. The
old gentleman, and his sisters, seemed glad to see me; and,
I found that the former had left the seas, though he still
remained a ship-owner; having a stout vessel of five
hundred
tons, which is, at this moment, named after our old
craft, the Sterling.
I remained at Wiscasset several weeks. During this
time, Captain Johnston and myself talked over old times, as
a matter of course, and I told him I thought one of our
old shipmates was still living. On his asking whom, I
inquired
if he remembered the youngster, of the name of
Cooper, who had been in the Sterling. He answered,
perfectly
well, and that he supposed him to be the Captain
Cooper who was then in the navy. I had thought so, too,
for a long time; but happened to be on board the Hudson,
at New York, when a Captain Cooper visited her. Hearing
his name, I went on deck expressly to see him, and was
soon satisfied it was not my old ship-mate. There are two
Captains Cooper in the navy,father and son,but neither
had been in the Sterling. Now, the author of many naval
tales, and of the Naval History, was from Cooperstown,
New York; and I had taken it into my head this was the
very person who had been with us in the Sterling. Captain
Johnston thought not; but I determined to ascertain the
fact, immediately on my return to New York.
Quitting Wiscasset, I came back to the Harbour, in the
month of November, 1842. I ought to say, that the men
at this institution, who maintain good characters, can always
get leave to go where they please, returning whenever they
please. There is no more restraint than is necessary to
comfort and good order; the object being to make old tars
comfortable. Soon after my return to the Harbour, I wrote
a letter to Mr. Fenimore Cooper, and sent it to his residence,
at Cooperstown, making the inquiries necessary to know if
he were the person of the same family who had been in the
Sterling. I got an answer, beginning in these wordsI
am your old ship-mate, Ned. Mr. Cooper informed me
when he would be in town, and where he lodged.
In the spring, I got a message from Mr. Blancard, the
keeper of the Globe Hotel, and the keeper, also, of Brighton,
near the Harbour, to say that Mr. Cooper was in town, and
wished to see me. Next day, I went up, accordingly; but
did not find him in. After paying one or two visits, I was
hobbling up Broadway, to go to the Globe again, when my
old commander at Pensacola, Commodore Bolton, passed
down street, arm-in-arm with a stranger. I saluted the
commodore
,
who nodded his head to me, and this induced the
stranger to look round. Presently I heard Ned! in a
voice that I knew immediately, though I had not heard it in
thirty-seven years. It was my old ship-matethe gentleman
who has written out this account of my career, from my
verbal narrative of the facts.
Mr. Cooper asked me to go up to his place, in the
country
,
and pass a few weeks there. I cheerfully consented,
and we reached Cooperstown early in June. Here I found
a neat village, a beautiful lake, nine miles long, and,
altogether
,
a beautiful country. I had never been as far from
the sea before, the time when I served on Lake Ontario
excepted. Cooperstown lies in a valley, but Mr. Cooper
tells me it is at an elevation of twelve hundred feet above
tide-water. To me, the clouds appeared so low, I thought
I could almost shake hands with them; and, altogether, the
air and country were different from any I had ever seen, or
breathed, before.
My old shipmate took me often on the Lake, which I will
say is a slippery place to navigate. I thought I had seen
all sorts of winds before I saw the Otsego, but, on this lake
it sometimes blew two or three different ways at the same
time. While knocking about this piece of water, in a good
stout boat, I related to my old shipmate many of the
incidents
of my wandering life, until, one day, he suggested it
might prove interesting to publish them. I was willing,
could the work be made useful to my brother sailors, and
those who might be thrown into the way of temptations like
those which came so near wrecking all my hopes, both for
this world, and that which is to come. We accordingly
went to work between us, and the result is now laid before
the world. I wish it understood, that this is literally my
own story, logged by my old shipmate.
It is now time to clew up. When a man has told all he
has to say, the sooner he is silent the better. Every word
that has been related, I believe to be true; when I am
wrong, it proceeds from ignorance, or want of memory. I
may possibly have made some trifling mistakes about dates,
and periods, but I think they would turn out to be few, on
inquiry. In many instances I have given my impressions,
which, like those of other men, may be right, or may be
wrong. As for the main facts, however, I know them to
be true, nor do I think myself much out of the way, in any
of the details.
This is the happiest period of my life, and has been so
since I left the hospital at Batavia. I do not know that I
have ever passed a happier summer than the present has
been. I should be perfectly satisfied with everything, did
not my time hang so idle on my hands at the Harbour. I
want something to occupy my leisure moments, and do not
despair of yet being able to find a mode of life more suitable
to the activity of my early days. I have friends enough
more than I deserve  and, yet, a man needs occupation,
who has the strength and disposition to be employed. That
which is to happen is in the hands of Providence, and I
humbly trust I shall be cared for, to the end, as I have been
cared for, through so many scenes of danger and trial.
My great wish is that this picture of a sailor's risks and
hardships, may have some effect in causing this large and
useful
class of men to think on the subject of their habits. I
entertain
no doubt that the money I have disposed of far worse
than if I had thrown it into the sea, which went to reduce
me to that mental hell, the `horrors,' and which, on one
occasion, at least, drove me to the verge of suicide, would
have formed a sum, had it been properly laid by, on which
I might now have been enjoying an old age of comfort and
respectability. It is seldom that a seaman cannot lay by a
hundred dollars in a twelvemonthoftentimes I have earned
double that amount, beyond my useful outlaysand a
hundred
dollars a year, at the end of thirty years, would give
such a man an independence for the rest of his days. This
is far from all, however; the possession of means would
awaken the desire of advancement in the calling, and
thousands
,
who now remain before the mast, would long since
have been officers, could they have commanded the
self-respect
that property is apt to create.
On the subject of liquor, I can say nothing that has not
often been said by others, in language far better than I can
use. I do not think I was as bad, in this respect, as
perhaps
a majority of my associates; yet, this narrative will
show how often the habit of drinking to excess impeded my
advance. It was fast converting me into a being inferior to
a man, and, but for God's mercy, might have rendered me
the perpetrator of crimes that it would shock me to think
of, in my sober and sane moments.
The past, I have related as faithfully as I have been able
so to do. The future is with God; to whom belongeth
power
,
and glory, for ever and ever!
THE END.